1 



57- 



H 



EVERYMAN'S LIBRARY 
EDITED BY ERNEST RHYS 



SCIENCE 



THE SCEPTICAL CHYMIST 
WITH AN INTRODUCTION BY 
M. M. PATTISON MUIR 



THE PUBLISHERS OF 

LlE ( E^/l < Rjr WILL BE PLEASED TO SEND 
FREELY TO ALL APPLICANTS A LIST 
OF THE PUBLISHED AND PROJECTED 
VOLUMES TO BE COMPRISED UNDER 
THE FOLLOWING THIRTEEN HEADINGS: 



TRAVEL ^ SCIENCE ^ FICTION 

THEOLOGY & PHILOSOPHY 

HISTORY ^ CLASSICAL 

FOR YOUNG PEOPLE 

ESSAYS ^ ORATORY 

POETRY & DRAMA 

BIOGRAPHY 

REFERENCE 

ROMANCE 



IN FOUR STYLES OF BINDING: CLOTH, 
FLAT BACK, COLOURED TOP ; LEATHER, 
ROUND CORNERS, GILT TOP; LIBRARY 
BINDING IN CLOTH, & QUARTER PIGSKIN 



LONDON: J. M. DENT & SONS, LTD. 
NEW YORK: E. P. DUTTON & CO. 



SCEPTICAL 
CHYMIST^X- 
BY THE HON. 
ROBERT 
BOYLE3 




LONDON: PUBLISHED 
byJ-M-DENT &-SONS-EP 
AND IN NEW YORK 
BY E-P- DUTTON^JCO 



INTRODUCTION 

Sceptical Chymist deals with the experimental evidence, 
and the reasoning based thereon, adduced by the " hermetick 
philosophers " that is, the followers of the Aristotelian 
doctrine to prove that all " mixt bodies " are compounded 
of four elements earth, air, fire, and water; and with the 
experiments and reasoning whereto the " vulgar spagyrists " 
of more than two centuries ago that is, those who analyse 
and synthesise material things appealed for proof of their 
assertion that the principles of things are three in number, 
and are salt, sulphur, and mercury. 

On the face of it, no great interest seems to belong now to 
a discussion about the four elements and the three principles, 
conducted at a time when physical science had not taken 
definite form, when men's ideas about the changes of material 
things were vague and inchoate, when exact methods of 
investigating these changes were unknown, when moral 
qualities were attributed to inanimate objects, and the 
examination of natural events was regarded as a part of 
" contemplative philosophy " rather than a branch of experi- 
mental inquiry. But, let the questions discussed by Boyle 
in The Sceptical Chymist be stated in then* most general form, 
the importance and interest of them are seen to be great 
and universal \ It is impossible to look around without 
noticing that most things are constantly changing. If spring 
is changing into summer as it is changing now scarce a 
moment passes unmarked by the coming of a deeper green; 
the laburnum, whose depending flowers were yesterday tipped 
with yellow, to-day delights the eye with a feast of colour; 
the apple blossom is fading and the fruit is setting; the 
meadows which a week ago were arrayed in the gorgeous 
yellow robes of king cups are now showing a more sober 
greenness; a morning visit to the garden reveals tenderly 
coloured shoots that were not visible yesterday; the orange- 
yellow of the gorse is duller than it was a week ago, and gives 
place to the purer colour of the broom. 

vii 

909 



viii The Sceptical Chymist 

One must ask many questions. How are these never- 
ending changes effected? Can we, by seeking, discover a 
limit to the changes of matter ? Can we discover the order 
and the method of the myriad metamorphoses that delight 
us? How shall we attain to some definite knowledge of 
nature's transmutations ? Shall we look inwards, and, con- 
structing a universe of our own, project that on to external 
nature; or shall we, as far as we can, put away all precon- 
ceived opinions, and painfully investigate objective facts, 
undeterred by the reproach that we are banishing poetry 
from nature, that we are dethroning divine reason, and taking 
crude empiricism to be our guide? These questions, and 
questions like these, have been asked by men during many 
milleniums. The Sceptical Chymist deals with such questions, 
and gives us deep-going objections to the answers given to 
them by the intellectualists of the seventeenth century, and 
the outlines of answers framed by a great scientific investi- 
gator of nature. It is true that Boyle lived before the methods 
of physical science had been classified and made incisive, 
before great conceptions, at once rigid and flexible, had been 
gained by students of natural science ; but it is also true that 
Boyle was a man of genius. It is the special prerogative of 
genius to go direct to the centre of things, to see what Clerk- 
Maxwell when a boy used to call "the particular go " of a 
thing, to seize the essential and let the unessentials pass. 
Like every true genius, Boyle was in advance of his time. 
The genius is not produced by the spirit of the age; it is the 
spirit of the age which is produced by the genius. We may 
greatly profit by the study of Boyle's book. 

The Honourable Robert Boyle was born at Lismore, in 
Ireland, in 1627. He was the seventh son of Richard Boyle, 
created Earl of Cork by James I. because of his civil and 
military services in Ireland, who was known in his own time 
as "The Great Earl of Cork." Robert Boyle began his 
education at Eton, where he went when he was eight years 
old ; at the age of twelve he was sent to Geneva ; he remained 
there for several years, under the care of a learned French 
gentleman. He visited Italy, spent a couple of years in 
France, and returned to settle on his estates at Stalbridge, 
in Dorsetshire, in 1644. After some years Boyle moved to 



Introduction ix 

Oxford, and, after some fourteen years' residence there, to 
London. Boyle spent his life in the experimental study of 
various branches of natural science, meditating and writing 
on theological subjects he learned Greek and Hebrew that 
he might read the Bible in the original languages and the 
active exercise of a large and generous benevolence. He was 
one of the founders, and afterwards for a time President, of 
the Royal Society. He died in 1691, and was buried in West- 
minster Abbey. Boyle published many works on scientific 
subjects, both in English and Latin. A collected edition of 
his scientific writings appeared in 1744, and another edition 
in 1772. The subjects which chiefly attracted Boyle's atten- 
tion, every one of which was greatly advanced and enriched 
by his experimental labours and sound reasoning, were these ; 
the pressure of air, the distribution of pressure in water / 
and other liquids, the phenomena of fire and flame, colour, L 
self-luminous substances, acids and alkalis, the qualities of 
volatility and fixedness in bodies, and, more especially, all 
questions connected with the composition and the qualities 
of material things, and with the nature of those simpler 
substances whereof " mixt bodies " are supposed to be com- 
pounded. 

The Sceptical Chymist was written when Boyle was about 
thirty-five years of age. Latin editions appeared at Geneva 
in 1677, and Rotterdam in 1679. The English edition was 
published at Oxford. The copy I have consulted has the 
date 1680 on the title page, and on the back of the page 
these words 

Mail 30. 1677. IMPRIMATUR. HEN. CLERKE 
Vice-Cane. Oxon 

In the Publisher's Advertisement to the Reader of Boyle's 
Experiments and Notes about the Producibleness of Chymical 
Principles, published at Oxford in 1680, it is stated that the 
first English edition of The Sceptical Chymist appeared in 
:66i. That date is confirmed by Boyle himself, in his Preface 
to the aforesaid Experiments and Notes. In that Preface 
Boyle says that an acquaintance of his had been told by a 
traveller that he had seen nine several Latin impressions of 



The Sceptical Chymist 



the book; "since when," Boyle adds, "another has been 
brought me made at Geneva." 

The Sceptical Chymist embodies the reasoned conceptions 
which Boyle had gained from the experimental investigation 
of many physical phenomena, and used as guides in the further 
prosecution of his inquiries. The book is more than an elegant 
and suggestive discourse on chemico-physical matters; it is 
an elucidation of the true method of scientific inquiry, and a 
powerful vindication of that method against the vain conceits 
of mere intellectualists called by Boyle " hermetick philo- 
sophers " who would make paramount the authority of 
what they are pleased to call the divine reason, of themselves 
or of others like them. The Sceptical Chymist upholds the 
claim of scientific method to be also the true method of 
philosophy. Not only because of the universality and im- 
portance of the particular scientific questions wherewith it 
is concerned, but also because of the human interests that 
vitalise every attempt to determine the nature of truth, and 
the ways of gaining truths, The Sceptical Chymist is a real, 
living book for intelligent men and women to-day. 

That we may understand the position taken by Boyle in 
dealing with the composition and qualities of material things, 
and the nature of the changes which these things exhibit, 
we must glance at the condition of chemistry and physics in 
the middle of the seventeenth cen,tj3gcj\ At that time the 
, ^alchemical scheme of things dominated most of those who 
K were inquiring into the transmutations of .^material sub- 
stances. That scheme was based on a ma-gigal conception 
of the world; that is, a conception of the world as the scene 
of a drama, awful in its consequences but simple in its setting 
and its unity, wherein man forms the central figure, which 
can be understood by looking inwards at one's thoughts and 
emotions, discovering in these a guide to the unity of external 
nature the conception assumes the unity and simplicity of 
nature and then forcing objective facts to take the form 
that is required by the intellectually constructed theory. 
When a magical theory of nature prevails, the impressions 
which external events produce on the senses of observers are 
corrected, not by careful reasoning and accurate experi- 
mentation, but by inquiring whether they fit into the scheme 



Introduction xi 

of things which has already been elaborated and accepted as 
the truth. Natural events become as clay in the hands of 
the intellectual potter, for whom " there is nothing good or 
bad but thinking makes it so." The assurance that all is 
simple, according to his conception of simplicity; the cer- 
tainty that the manifoldness of nature forms a unity, accord- 
ing to his notion of unity these lead him who starts with 
them, as they led the alchemists, to deal with objective facts" 
as to a great extent changeable at his pleasure, and so to the 
negation of law and order in the universe, other than the > 
law he has himself constructed, and the order he has spun 
from his own brain. 

He who accepts and realises the magical view of nature 
attributes to material objects, qualities, emotions, and moral 
tendencies, which are regarded by the scientific student of 
nature as meaningless when dissociated from human beings. 
An alchemical writer of the seventh century said: "Copper 
is like a man ; it has a soul and a body . . . the soul is the 
most subtile part. . . . The body is the ponderable, material, 
terrestrial thing, endowed with a shadow. ... It is necessary 
to deprive matter of its qualities in order to draw out its soul." 
In conformity with their determination to make nature simple, 
the older alchemists taught that all material things are built 
on the foundation of some or all of four elements. When they 
gave the names earth, air, fire, water, to their four elements, 
they did not mean these four things as they appear to the 
senses, but the soul, or subtile, imponderable, ethereal sub- 
stratum of the gross earth, air, fire, and water. It is not 
possible to attach any definite, clear meanings to alchemical 
writings about the four elements. Their indefiniteness was 
their strength. When a man's words mean anything, or 
everything, or nothing, and neither he nor any hearer of them 
knows exactly what they mean, they cover every possible 
contingency, and are full of solace to himself and to many 
others, because each hearer has his own particular way of 
allowing the words to reverberate in his brain and stir his 
emotions. As the plain man to-day is soothed and made 
comfortable by the assurance that certain phrases to which 
he attaches no definite meanings are really scientific, so 
when Boyle lived the plain man rested happily in the belief 



xii The Sceptical Chymist 

that the four elements were the last word of science regarding 
the structure of the materials of the world. 

When the alchemist was not in his workshop, hewas quite sure 
that he understood all the secrets of nature. With a light heart 
he " took upon him the mystery of things, as if he were God's 
spy." When he went into his laboratory, he was confronted 
by a thousand experimental difficulties, and found himself 
almost at a standstill. Two courses were open to him. He 
might give up his assured conviction that nature is simple, 
and works as he determined she should work, and endeavour 
to discover the real ways of nature's doings; or he might 
retain his intellectual conviction, but express it in terms 
which would cover his experimental data when they had 
been subjected to a not too difficult process of manipulation. 
He found it very hard to conduct transmutations in his 
laboratory; it was much easier to transmute his facts so as 
to bring them into harmony with his theory. Most of the 
" hermetick philosophers " and " spagyrists " of Boyle's 
tune we would call them physicists and chemists took the 
second of these courses. Boyle followed the first course, and 
besought others to follow it likewise. 

The loose thinking of the " hermetick philosophers " 
produced vague experimentation. They assumed, without 
proof, that fire is " a great opener of bodies; " that is, they 
supposed that the action of fire on a substance is to separate 
or resolve it into simpler constituents. Hence, their com- 
monest method of discovering the elements of a substance 
was to heat it. The upholder of the Aristotelian doctrine in 
The Sceptical Chymist thinks he has demonstrated the four 
elements when he appeals to the burning of a piece of wood. 
He says: " If you will but consider a piece of green wood 
burning in a chimney, you will readily discern in the dis- 
banded parts of it the four elements. . . . The fire discovers 
itself in the flame by its own light ; the smoke by ascending 
to the top of the chimney, and then readily vanishing into 
air, like a river losing itself in the sea, sufficiently manifests 
to what element it belongs and gladly returns. The water 
in its own form boiling and hissing at the ends of the burning 
wood betrays itself to more than one of our senses; and the 
ashes by their weight, their fineness, and their dryness, put 



Introduction xiii 

it past doubt that they belong to the element of earth." 
The man who gives this description of the resolution of wood 
into the four elements makes an apology to his hearers for 
" building upon such an obvious and easy analysis; " but he 
urges that "it is very agreeable to the goodness of nature, 
to disclose even in some of the most obvious experiments 
that men make, a truth so important and so requisite to be 
taken notice of by them." 

Boyle went to the root of the matter. He showed that 
the assumption that fire always acts as an " opener of bodies " 
was not in accordance with experimentally determined facts. 
He asked what was meant by the simplification of material 
substances. He demanded some workable criterion of simpli- 
fication and complication. He refused to accept the untried, 
superficial, uncriticised impressions of the senses. He said 
that the conception expressed by the word element must be 
made clearer; that before inquirers argued about the separa- 
tion of a substance into its elements, they must attach definite, 
and, above all, workable, meanings to their terms. I shall 
indicate Boyle's conception of element after giving a short 
account of the three principles of the " vulgar spagyrists." 

Nearly a hundred years before Boyle was born, an extra- 
ordinary genius appeared in Europe, known as Paracelsus, 
a name given to him by Trimethius, Abbot of Spannheim, 
his father in alchemy. Paracelsus was born near Zurich 
about the year 1493. He studied medicine at Basle, wandered 
over Europe and the nearer East, lectured in the University 
of Ba,sle, from whence he was driven by the authorities 
because of his turbulent spirit, and died about 1540 at 
Salzburg, where he had found rest under the protection of 
the Archbishop. 

Paracelsus broke away from the teachers of authority. 
He abused the medical men of his time for seeking their 
knowledge from ancient books, and besought them and all 
men to go to nature and learn wisdom there. He tried to 
put his own doctrine into practice, to examine natural events 
first, and to found his theories on the results of observation 
and experiment. Paracelsus did his best. What he said of 
those who endeavoured to follow the method of observation 
and experiment war true of .himself. "They are not given 



xiv The Sceptical Chymist 

to idleness, nor go in a proud habit, or plush and velvet 
garments, . . . but diligently follow their labours, sweating 
whole days and nights by their furnaces. . . . They put their 
fingers among coals, into clay and filth, not into gold rings. 
They are sooty and black, like smiths and miners, and do not 
pride themselves upon clean and beautiful faces." 

No wonder that the followers of the Aristotelian method 
spoke of those who used experiments as their guide as " sooty 
empiricks." But after a time Paracelsus found the task 
too hard. 

" The lyffe so short ; the craft so long to lerne ; 
Th' assay so harde, so sharp the conquering." 

He had no accurate instruments, no definite hypothesis to 
guide him, no tangible clue to the manifold and seemingly 
contradictory results of his experiments. He fell into the 

v old error; he looked inwards for all knowledge. Leaving 
the tremendous undertaking of trying to find what the uni- 
verse really is, he set his intellect to the easy business of 
creating his own world, and soothed but deadened his emotions 
by looking on the world he had himself created and finding 
it very good. Nevertheless, Paracelsus gave a great impetus 
in the right direction to those who seek the truths of nature. 
The alchemical writings of his successors abound in passages 
like that wherein the author of The Only Way (1677) beseeches 
his readers " to enlist under the standard of that method 
which proceeds in strict obedience to the teaching of nature 
... in short, the method which nature herself pursues in 
the bowels of the earth." 

The alchemists who worked much in laboratories found 
three substances of great use to them in their experiments 
salt, sulphur, and mercury. Gradually they came to look 
on these as the simpler things by the admixture whereof 
many more complex things are formed. But, saturated as 
these men were with semi-magical ways of looking at nature, 
they were forced to think of these three substances as owing 
their efficacy in bringing about material changes to an inner, 
hidden soul or essence in each. They began to distinguish 

/ between ordinary, tangible salt, sulphur, and mercury, and 
the efficacious essences of them. As they could not say what 



Introduction xv 

they meant by the essence or soul of a thing, they continued 
to uselfte ordinary terms, but to attach unutterable meanings 
to the words salt, sulphur, mercury, (They seemed to think 
that the difficulty was overcome by calling salt, sulphur, and 
mercury The Three Principles there always has been an 
extraordinarily soothing power in large words spelt with 
capital letters. And so the mark of the newer school, the 
school of Paracelsus, as opposed to the older " hermetick 
philosophers," came to be that the former asserted that 
mixed bodies are formed by the compounding of the three 
Principles, while the latter remained true to the four Elements. 

Boyle found the same fault with the Principles of the 
" vulgar spagyrists " as he found with the Elements of the 
" hermetick philosophers." " Tell me what you mean by your 
Principles and your Elements," he cried; " then I can discuss 
them with you as working instruments for advancing know- 
ledge." In The Sceptical Chymist, Boyle pleads for lucidity 
of expression, for the destruction of the tyranny of phrases, 
for clearing the mind of vague theories which rest on no basis 
of sound, tested, experimental results. " I have long ob- 
served," he says, " that those dialectical subtleties, that the 
schoolmen too often employ about physiological " we would 
say physical " mysteries, are wont much more to declare 
the wit of him that uses them, than increase the knowledge 
or remove the doubts of sober lovers of truth. And such 
captious subtleties do indeed often puzzle and sometimes 
silence men, but rarely satisfy them." He accuses the Chy- 
mists of his day of " playing with names at pleasure." He 
says that they " write darkly, not because they think their 
notions too precious to be explained, but because they fear 
that if they were explained, men would discern that they are 
far from being precious." " They could scarce keep them- 
selves from being confuted," he exclaims, " but by keeping 
themselves from being clearly understood." He will give 
no thanks to him who " darkens what he should clear up, 
and makes me add the trouble of guessing at the sense of 
what he equivocally expresses, to that of examining the tru 
of what he seems to deliver." 

The Sceptical Chymist is written in the form of a dialogue, 
chiefly between Themistius, who upholds the doctrines of the 



xvi The Sceptical Chymist 

" hermetick philosophers," and Carneades, who expresses 
the opinions and urges the arguments of Boyle. Themistius 
would fain base his arguments on the homogeneity and unity 
of the whole Aristotelian teaching; he is anxious to show 
that the existence of the four elements follows necessarily 
from the doctrine of " the kinds of simple motion belonging 
to simple bodies." He asserts that the upholders of the four 
elements " value reason so highly, and are furnished with 
arguments enough drawn from thence, to be satisfied that 
there rmist be four elements, though no man had ever yet 
made any sensible trial to discover their number." He is 
very averse to descend to experimental evidence. " It is 
much more high and philosophical to discover things a priori 
than a posteriori. And therefore the Peripateticks have not 
been very solicitous to gather experiments to prove their 
doctrines, contenting themselves with a few only, to satisfy 
those that are not capable of a nobler conviction. And indeed 
they employ experiments rather to illustrate than to demon- 
strate their doctrines." 

Carneades (that is, Boyle) insists on dragging the philosopher 
back to facts and reasoned hypotheses. He proclaims that 
careful verification of facts must go before attempts to express 
in general terms the features common to many facts. He 
does not deny the usefulness of principles as means for bring- 
ing into one point of view material changes which are really 
similar; but he reiterates the assertion, based on experience, 
that the similarities between certain natural events can be 
grasped only by making many experiments, each of which 
is suggested by the results of those which preceded it; that 
to begin with grandiose phrases and make these take the 
place of discreet, particular facts, is fatal to the progress of 
genuine knowledge. Boyle knew that the high-sounding 
phrases of the peripatetics and the spagyrists distorted then- 
vision, and made them see in nature only what they wanted 
to see. In one of his essays Boyle said 

" I remember Mr. R., the justly famous maker of dioptical 
glasses, for merriment telling one that came to look upon a 
great tube of his of thirty foot long, that he saw through it 
in a mill six miles off a great spider in the midst of her web; 
the credulous man, though at first he said he discerned no 



Introduction xvii 

such thing, at length confessed he saw it very plainly, and 
wondered he had discovered her no sooner." 

A method which began at the wrong end could not produce 
results of any lasting value. Boyle certainly did not think 
much of the results of the chemical inquiries of his contem- 
poraries. 

" Methinks the Chymists, in their searches after truth, are \ 
not unlike the navigators of Solomon's Tarshish fleet, who I 
brought home from their long and perilous voyages, not only 
gold, and silver, and ivory, but apes and peacocks too: for / 
so the writings of several (for I say not all) of your hermetick '^ 
philosophers present us, together with diverse substantial 
and noble experiments, theories, which either like peacock's 
feathers make a great show, but are neither solid nor useful, 
or else like apes, if they have some appearance of being 
rational, are blemished with some absurdity or other, that, 
when they are attentively considered, make them appear 
ridiculous." 

Boyle did not merely find fault with what he considered 
the false methods of inquiry into nature's workings which 
prevailed when he wrote; he did not merely lay down in 
wide and loose statements what he considered to be the true 
method; he took particular instances of definite statements, 
discreet experiments, and stated clearly the meaning he 
attached to these statements, and the method to be followed 
hi these experiments. Take, for instance, what he says about 
Elements and Principles 

"I ... must not look upon any body as a true principle 
or element, but as yet compounded, which is not perfectly 
homogeneous, but is further resoluble into any number of 
distinct substances, how small soever. ... I mean by 
elements, as those Chymists that speak plainest do by their 
principles, certain primitive and simple, or perfectly un- 
mingled bodies; which not being made of any other bodies, 
or of one another, are the ingredients of which all those 
called perfectly mixt bodies are immediately compounded, 
and into which they are ultimately resolved: now whether 
there be any one such body to be constantly met with in all, 
and each, of those that are said to be elemented bodies, is the 
thing I now question." 



xviii The Sceptical Chymist 

This is very clear. The only thing wanting is an experi- 
mental method of determining whether a given substance is, 
or is not, an element, in Boyle's meaning of the word element. 
As concerns the uses to be made in science of the notion of 
element or principle, Boyle said 

"The main thing that has recommended the chymical 
principles to more discerning men, seems to be, that by the 
help of a few simple ingredients . . . associated in differing 
proportions, all mixt bodies may be compounded; and so 
men may acquaint themselves with the natures of a multi- 
tude of bodies, by first knowing the natures but of a few. . . . 
It is now tune to consider not of how many Elements it is 
possible that nature may compound mixt bodies, but (at 
least, as far as the ordinary experiments of Chymists will 
inform us) of how many she doth make them up." 

This is the true scientific method of gaining knowledge 
that is lasting and always widening. Hypotheses are sug- 
gested by facts that have been rigorously verified, although 
not exhaustively examined; and these hypotheses are used 
as instruments for expressing the relations of the facts to each 
other, and for indicating lines of inquiry which are likely to 
lead to the discovery of other related facts. Hypotheses 
that do not work in this way are dropped, and others are 
tried. By their fruits they are judged. Finally, many hypo- 
theses are included in a theory which expresses the essential 
features of all the hypotheses, correlates all the facts, and 
" charms magic casements opening on the foam of perilous 
seas," whereon he who shall boldly use the theory may voyage 
to other " faery lands " that are not " forlorn." 

Boyle was always seeking what he called " the true and 
fundamental causes " of natural phenomena. He tells us 
definitely what he understands by elements, and says that 
" those Chymists that speak plainest " attach the same 
meaning to both words, Element and Principle. Boyle 
preferred the former word to the latter. He saw the dangers 
that lurk in the use of the word Principle ; a word which 
seems to imply, and was used to imply, the efficacious essence 
of a thing, something different and apart from the group of 
co-existent properties which affects the senses. Principle is a 
term which, when used in the elucidation of the composition 



Introduction xix 

of material things, almost necessarily carries with it the 
theory of the existence of a substratum common to many 
substances, and remaining unchanged in the passage from 
one correlated group of properties to another. A study of 
Boyle's writings shows that he was feeling his way towards 
the scientific, the pragmatic conceptions that, in so far as 
accurate knowledge goes, a material substance is a co-existent 
group of properties, is one end of a chain which at its other 
end we call sense-impressions, and that the notion of an 
unchangeable substratum adds, and can add, nothing to our 
knowledge of material things, but leads only to intellectual- 
istic discussions which militate against the advance of scientific, 
that is, accurate, imaginative knowledge. 

The weak point in Boyle's argument is his failure to find 
an experimental means of determining whether a specified 
substance is or is not an element. He had not shaken him- 
self quite free from the trammels of the hermetic, or, to use 
a more modern term, the intellectualistic method of examining 
nature. Until delicate instruments for determining changes 
of weight had been perfected, the way was not made clear 
for the use of the purely pragmatic conception of Element. 
When, about a hundred years after the appearance of The 
Sceptical Chymist, Lavoisier gave to chemists the description 
of an element as a substance which has not been separated 
into simpler substances, and added to this the practical test 
of simplification, chemistry advanced by leaps and bounds. 
Lavoisier's pragmatic descriptions of element and simplifica- 
tion were these a material substance is to be classed as 
elementary when from a determinate weight of it are ob- 
tained other substances, the weight of each of which is less 
than the weight of the original, and the sum of the weights 
of which is equal to the weight of the original; and the 
original weight of the first substance is formed by bringing 
together, under proper conditions, the separate weights of 
the other substances. 

Boyle was seeking some property which remains unchanged 
when others undergo modification, in order that he might 
use that property as the mark of an element. In The Sceptical 
Chymist he passes in review the properties used for this 
purpose by his contemporaries, and rejects them all as un- 



xx The Sceptical Chymist 

satisfactory, unreal, transient, indefinite. He suggests tests 
of elenientariness, but is not satisfied with his own sugges- 
tions. , He knew by experience the mirage-producing power 
of phrases. He rejects with contumely what he calls " that 
sanctuary of the ignorant, occult qualities; " and, therefore, 
he did not fall into the deadening error of substituting a 
mere word principle, essence, efficacious power, or the like 
for the measurable property which he was seeking. Boyle 
supposed that material things may, very probably, be com- 
posed of many exceedingly minute particles. He called 
" the bulk and figure of the smallest parts of bodies " the 
" more catholic and fruitful accidents of the elementary 
matter; " and supposed that from these " may spring a great 
variety of textures, upon whose account a multitude of com- 
pound bodies may very much differ from one another." He 
often returns to the conception of minute particles in motion. 
Sometimes he advances so near to modern scientific notions 
as to suggest that matter and motion are the only essential, 
" catholic " postulates, and that from these alone a working 
plan of the material universe may be constructed. 

Lavoisier found the test of elementariness after which 
Boyle was seeking; Dalton began the teaching of how to 
measure the relative weights of the minute particles of bodies ; 
then matter and motion became indeed " the catholic and 
fruitful accidents " in the hands of those who coming after 
Boyle followed the path he had opened. 

Although the details of many, perhaps most, of Boyle's 
arguments against the four elements of the peripatetics, and 
the three principles of the vulgar spagyrists, have not any 
very great interest for modern physicists and chemists, never- 
theless the acuteness of Boyle's reasoning must impress every 
intelligent reader, the soundness of his philosophy must come 
home to scientific students of nature, the wide and generous 
views he takes of natural phenomena and of the scope of 
natural science must encourage all who seek clear and imagin- 
ative knowledge, and his constant striving after lucidity 
both of thought andTUxBression, his justness of phrasing, 
53 his humorous fairness to his opponents, must delight 
every admirer of literary power. n| 

The great importance of The Sceptical Chymist consists in 



Introduction xxi 

Boyle's reiteration of proofs that nature is not simple, but 
rather overpoweringly complex; of proofs that it is wise to / 
doubt every short and easy road to natural truths; that it / 
is vain and foolish to rest on suppositions because they are 
said to " stand to reason," to adopt them as foundations 
unless they are based on valid arguments and well-tested 
observations; that it is a mark of inferior intelligence and 
cramped imagination to be dazzled by strange experiments 
or high-sounding phraseology; that, above all, "occult 
qualities " are nothing but " the sanctuary of ignorance." 

" What I have hitherto discoursed," Boyle says at the 
beginning of Part III. of his book, " has, I presume, shown you, 
that a considering man may very well question the truth of 
those very suppositions which Chymists as well as Peripate- 
ticks, without proving, take for granted; and upon which 
depends the validity of the inferences they draw from their 
experiments. ... It will now be seasonable for me to pro- 
ceed to the consideration of the experiments themselves, 
wherein they are wont so much to triumph and glory. And 
these will the rather deserve a serious examination, because 
those that alledge them are wont to do it with so much con- 
fidence and ostentation, that they have hitherto imposed 
upon almost all persons, without excepting philosophers and 
physicians themselves, who have read their books, or heard 
them talk. For some learned men have been rather content 
to believe what they so boldly affirm, than be at the trouble 
and charge, to try whether or no it be true. . . . The gener- 
ality even of learned men, seeing the Chymists (not con- 
tenting themselves with the schools to amuse the world with 
empty words) actually perform diverse strange things . . . 
are forward to think it but just as well as modest, that accord- 
ing to the Logicians' rule, the skilful artists should be credited 
in their own art; especially when those things whose nature 
they so confidently take upon them to teach others, are 
not only productions of their own skill, but such as others 
know not else what to make of." 

M. M. PATTISON MUIR. 



xxii The Sceptical Chymist 



BIBLIOGRAPHY 

Among his numerous works are: Essay on Seraphic Love, 1660; New 
Experiments, Physico-Mechanical, touching the Spring of the Air and its 
Effects, etc., 1660, and edition (with Defence against Linus}, 1662; 
Certain Physiological Essays, 1661 ; The Sceptical Chymist, 1661 ; Some 
Considerations touching the Usefulness of Experimental Natural Philo- 
sophy, 1663, 2nd part, 1671; Experiments and Considerations touching 
Colours, 1663; Some Considerations touching the Style of the Holy 
Scriptures, 1663; Occasional Reflections upon Several Subjects, 1664; 
New Experiments and Observations touching Cold, or an Experimental 
History of Cold, begun 1665 ; Origin of Forms and Qualities, 1666; Hydro- 
statical Paradoxes, 1666; A Continuation of New Experiments, Physico- 
Mechanical, touching the Spring and Weight of the Air and their Effects, 
1669; Tracts about the Cosmical Qualities of Things, 1670; An Essay 
about the Origin and Virtues of Gems, 1672; The Excellency of Theology 
compared with Natural Philosophy, 1673; Some Considerations about the 
Reconcilableness of Reason and Religion, 1675; On the Mechanical 
Origin of Heat and Cold, 1675; Historical Account of a Degradation of 
Gold, 1678; The Aerial Noctiluca, 1680; The Icy Noctiluca, 1682; Third 
series of Experiments, Physico-Mechanical, touching the Spring and Weight 
of the Air, 1682; Memoirs for the Natural History of the Human Blood, 
1684; On the Porosity of Bodies, 1684; Of the High Veneration Man's 
Intellect owes to God, 1685, with other treatises (Sacred Classics), 1685; 
Of the Great Effects of Even, Languid, and Uneven Motion, 1685 ; A Free 
Enquiry into the Vulgarly received Notion of Nature, 1686; The Martyr- 
dom of Theodora, and of Didymus, 1687, 1703 ; A Disquisition Concerning 
the Final Causes of Things, 1688; Medicina Hydrostatica, 1690; The 
Christian Virtuoso, 1690; Experimenta et Observationes Physicae, part i., 
1691. And posthumously published, The General History of the Air, 
designed and begun 1692; General History of the Natural History Of a 
Country (for travellers and navigators), 1692; Medicinal Experiments, 
3 vols., 1692-4. 

WORKS: Edited by T. Birch, with Life of Author, 5 vols., 1744: 6 ' 
1772; An Epitome of his writings, 1699-1700; of his Theological 
1715; of his Philosophical, 1725. 

LIFE: Memoirs by Birch, in Works; R. B. Hone (Lives of Em 
Christians), 1837; G. G. Perry, 1863. 






CONTENTS 



PAGE 

I 



INTRODUCTORY PREFACE ........ 

PHYSIOLOGICAL CONSIDERATIONS TOUCHING THE EXPERIMENTS 

WONT TO BE EMPLOYED TO EVINCE EITHER THE FOUR PERI- 

PATETICK ELEMENTS, OR THE THREE CHYMICAL PRINCIPLES 

OF MIXT BODIES ........ n 

THE FIRST PART ......... 29 

THE SECOND PART ......... 63 

fejE THIRD PART ......... 94 

FOURTH PART 113 

FIFTH PART ......... 154 

SIXTH PART 186 

ICLUSION .......... 226 



INTRODUCTORY PREFACE TO THE 
FOLLOWING TREATISE 

To give the reader an account, why the following treatise 
is suffered to pass abroad so maimed and imperfect, I must 
inform him that 'tis now long since, that to gratify an_ 
ingenious gentleman, I set down some of the reasons that 
kept me from fully acquiescing either in the peripatetical, 
or in the chymical doctrine, of the material principles of 
mixt bodies. This discourse some years after falling 
into the hands of some learned men, had the good luck to 
be so favourably received and advantagiously spoken of 
by them, that having had more than ordinary invitations 
given me to make it public, I thought fit to review it, 
that I might retrench some things that seemed not so fit 
to be shewn to every reader, and substitute some of those 
other things that occurred to me of the trials and observa- 
tions I had since made: What became of my papers, I 
elsewhere mention in a Preface where I complain of it: 
but since I writ that, I found many sheets that belonged 
to the subjects I am now about to discourse of. Where- 
fore seeing that I had then in my hands as much of the 
first dialogue as was requisite to state the case, and serve 
for an introduction as well to the conference betwixt 
Carneades and Eleutherius, as to some other dialogues, 
which for certain reasons are not herewith published, I 
resolved to supply, as well as I could, the contents of a 
paper belonging to the second of the following discourses, 
which I could not possibly retrieve, though it were the chief 
of them all. And having once more tried the opinion of 
friends, but not the same, about this imperfect work, I 
found it such, that I was content in compliance with their 
desires, that not only it should be published, but that it 
should be published as soon as conveniently might be. 
I had indeed all along the dialogues spoken of myself as 



2 The Sceptical Chymist 

of a third person; for they containing discourses which 
were among the first treatises that I ventured long ago 
to write of matters philosophical, I had reason to desire, 
with the painter, to latere pone tabulam, and hear what 
men would say of them, before I owned myself to be their 
author. But besides that now I find, 'tis not unknown to 
many who it is that writ them, I am made to believe that 
'tis not inexpedient they should be known to come from 
a person altogether a stranger to chymical affairs. And 
I made the less scruple to let them come abroad uncom- 
pleated, partly because my affairs and pre-ingagements 
to publish divers other treatises allowed me small hopes of 
being able in a great while to complete those dialogues, 
and partly because I am not unapt to think, that they may 
come abroad seasonably enough, though not for the 
author's reputation, yet for other purposes. For I observe, 
that of late chymistry begins, as indeed it deserves, to be 
cultivated by learned men who before despised it; and 
to be pretended to by many who never cultivated it, that 
they may be thought not to be ignorant of it : whence it is 
come to pass, that divers chymical notions about matters 
philosophical are taken for granted and employed, and 
so adopted by very eminent writers both naturalists 
and physicians. Now this I fear may prove somewhat 
prejudicial to the advancement of solid philosophy: for 
though I am a great lover of chymical experiments, and 
though I have no mean esteem of divers chymical remedies, 
yet I distinguish these from their notions about the causes 
of things and their manner of generation. And for ought 
I can hitherto discern, there are a thousand phenomena in 
nature, besides a multitude of accidents relating to the 
human body, which will scarcely be clearly and satis- 
factorily made out by them that confine themselves to 
deduce things from salt, sulphur, and mercury, and the 
other notions peculiar to the chymists, without taking 
much more notice than they are wont to do, of the motions 
and figures, of the small parts of matter and the other 
more catholic and fruitful affections of bodies. Where- 
fore it will not perhaps be now unseasonable to let our 
Carneades warne men, not to subscribe to the grand doctrine 



Introductory Preface 3 

of the chymists touching their three hypostatical prin- 
ciples, till they have a little examined it, and considered 
how they can clear it from his objections, divers of 
which 'tis like they may never have thought on; since 
a chymist scarce would, and none but a chymist could 
propose them. I hope also it will not be unaccept- 
able to several ingenious persons, who are unwilling to 
determine of any important controversie, without a 
previous consideration of what may be said on both sides, 
and yet have greater desires to understand chymical 
matters than opportunities of learning them, to find here 
together, besides several experiments of my own pur- 
posely made to illustrate the doctrine of the elements, 
divers others scarce to be met with, otherwise then 
scattered among many chymical books: and to find 
these associated experiments so delivered as that an 
ordinary reader, if he be but acquainted with the usual 
chymical termes, may easily enough understand them; 
and even a wary one may safely rely on them. These 
things I add, because a person anything versed in the 
writings of chymists cannot but discern by their obscure, 
ambiguous, and almost aenigmatical way of expressing 
what they pretend to teach, that they have no mind to be 
understood at all, but by the sons of Art (as they call them), 
nor to be understood even by these without difficulty and 
hazardous trials. Insomuch that some of them scarce 
ever speak so candidly, as when they make use of that 
known chymical sentence : Ubi palam locuti fumus, ibi 
nihil diximus. And as the obscurity of what some writers 
deliver makes it very difficult to be understood; so the 
unfaithfulness of too many others makes it unfit to be 
relied upon. For though unwillingly, yet I must for the 
truth sake, and the reader's, warne him not to be forward 
to believe chymical experiments when they are set down 
only bv way of prescriptions, and not of relations; that is, 
unless he that delivers them mentions his doing it upon 
his own particular knowledge, or upon the relation of 
some credible person, avowing it upon his own experi- 
ence. For I am troubled, I must complain, that even 
eminent writers, both physitians and philosophers, whom 



4 The Sceptical Chymist 

I can easily name, if it be required, have of late suffered 
themselves to be so far imposed upon, as to publish and 
build upon chymical experiments, which questionless they 
never tried ; for if they had, they would, as well as I, have 
found them not to be true. And indeed it were to be 
wished, that now that those begin to quote chymical 
experiments that are not themselves acquainted with 
chymical operations, men would leave off that indefinite 
way of vouching the chymists say this, or the chymists 
affirm that, and would rather for each experiment they 
alleged name the author or authors upon whose credit 
they relate it; for, by this means they would secure 
themselves from the suspicion of falsehood (to which 
the other practice exposes them), and they would leave 
the reader to judge of what is fit for him to believe of 
what is delivered, whilst they employ not their own great 
names to countenance doubtful relations; and they 
will also do justice to the inventors or publishers of the 
true experiments, as well as upon the obtruders of false 
ones. Whereas by that general way of quoting the 
chymists, the candid writer is defrauded of the particular 
praise, and the impostor escapes the personal disgrace 
that is due to him. 

The remaining part of this Preface must be imployed 
in saying something for Carneades, and something for 
myself. 

And first, Carneades hopes that he will be thought to 
have disputed civilly and modestly enough for one that 
was to play the antagonist and the sceptic. And if he 
anywhere seem to slight his adversaries tenents and argu- 
ments, he is willing to have it looked upon as what he was 
induced to, not so much by his opinion of them, as the 
examples of Themistius and Philoponus, and the custom 
of such kind of disputes. 

Next, in case that some of his arguments shall not be 
thought of the most cogent sort that may be, he hopes it 
will be considered that it ought not to be expected that 
they should be so. For, his part being chiefly but to 
propose doubts and scruples, he does enough, if he shews 
that his adversaries arguments are not strongly concluding, 



Introductory Preface 5 

though his own be not so neither. And if there should 
appear any disagreement betwixt the things he delivers 
in divers passages, he hopes it will be considered, that it 
is not necessary that all the things a sceptic proposes 
should be consonant; since it being his work to suggest 
doubts against the opinion he questions, it is allowable 
for him to propose two or more several hypotheses about 
the same thing: and to say that it may be accounted for 
this way, or that way, or the other way, though these 
wayes be perhaps inconsistent among themselves. Because 
it is enough for him, if either of the proposed hypotheses 
be but as probable as that he calls in question. And if 
he propose many that are each of them probable, he does 
the more ratify his doubts, by making it appear the more 
difficult to be sure, that that way which they all differ 
from is the true. And our Carneades by holding the nega- 
tive, has this advantage, that if among all the instances 
he brings to invalidate the vulgar doctrine of those he 
disputes with, any one be irrefragable, that alone is suffi- 
cient to overthrow a doctrine which universally asserts 
what he opposes. For, it cannot be true, that all bodies 
whatsoever that are reckoned among the perfectly mixt 
ones, are compounded of such a determinate number of 
such or such ingredients, in case any one such body can be 
produced that is not so compounded; and he hopes too, that 
accurateness will be the less expected from him, because 
his undertaking obliges him to maintain such opinions in 
chymistry, and that chiefly by chymical arguments, as 
are contrary to the very principles of the chymists, from 
whose writings it is not therefore like he should receive 
any intentional assistance, except from some passages of 
the bold and ingenious Helmont, with whom he yet dis- 
agrees in many things (which reduce him to explicate 
divers chymical phsenomena, according to other notions): 
and of whose ratiocinations, not only some seem very 
extravagant, but even the rest are not wont to be as con- 
siderable as his experiments. And though it be true 
indeed, that some Aristotelians have occasionally written 
against the chymical doctrine he oppugnes, yet since they 
have done it according to their principles, and since our 



6 The Sceptical Chymist 

Carneades must as well oppose their hypothesis as that 
, of the spagyrist, he was fain to fight his adversaries with 
his own weapons, those of the peripatetic being improper 
if not hurtful for a person of his tenets; besides that 
those Aristotelians (at least those he met with), that have 
written against the chymists, seem to have had so little 
experimental knowledge in chymical matters, that by 
their frequent mistakes and unskilful way of oppugning, 
they have too often exposed themselves to the derision of 
their adversaries, for writing so confidently against what 
they appeare so little to understand. 

And lastly, Carneades hopes he shall do the ingenious 
this piece of service, that by having thus drawn the 
chymists' doctrine out of their dark and smokie labora- 
tories, and both brought it into the open light, and shewn 






the weakness of their proofs, that have hitherto been wont 
to be brought for it, either judicious men shall henceforth 
be allowed calmly and after due information to disbelieve 
it, or those abler chymists, that are zealous for the reputa- 
tion of it, will be obliged to speak plainer than hitherto 
has been done, and maintain it by better experiments and 
arguments than those Carneades hath examined : so that 
he hopes the curious will one way or other derive either 
satisfaction or instruction from his endeavours. And as 
he is ready to make good the profession he makes in the 
close of his discourse, of being ready to be better informed, 
so he expects either to be indeed informed, or to be let 
alone. For though, if any truly knowing chymists shall 
think fit in a civil and rational way to shew him any truth 
touching the matter in dispute that he yet discernes not, 
Carneades will not refuse either to admit, or to own a 
conviction: yet if any impertinent person shall, either to 
get himselfe a name, or for what other end soever, wilfully 
or carelessly mistake the state of the controversie, or the 
sense of his arguments, or shall rail instead of arguing, as 
hath been done of late in print by divers chymists; or 
lastly, shall write against them in a canting way, I mean 
shall express himselfe in ambiguous or obscure termes, or 
argue from experiments,, not intelligibly enough delivered, 
Carneades professes that he values his time so much, as 



Introductory Preface 7 

not to think the answering such trifles worth the loss 
of it. 

And now having said thus much for Carneades, I hope 
the reader will give me leave to say something for myself. 

And first, if some morose readers shall find fault with 
my having made the interlocutors upon occasion comple- 
ment with one another, and that I have almost all along 
written these dialogues in a style more fashionable than 
that of mere scholars is wont to be, I hope I shall be 
excused by them that shall consider, that to keep a due 
decorum in the discourses it was fit that in a book written 
by a gentleman, and wherein only gentlemen are intro- 
duced as speakers, the language should be more smooth 
and the expressions more civil than is usual in the more 
scholastic way of writing. And indeed, I am not sorry 
to have this opportunity of giving an example how to 
manage even disputes with civility; whence perhaps 
some readers will be assisted to discern a difference betwixt 
bluntness of speech and strength of reason, and find that 
a man may be a champion for truth without being an 
enemy to civility; and may confute an opinion without 
railing at them that hold it; to whom he that desires to 
convince and not to provoke them, must make some 
amends by his civility to their persons, for his severity to 
their mistakes; and must say as little else as he can to 
displease them, when he says that they are in an error. 

But perhaps other readers will be less apt to find fault 
with the civility of my disputants than the chymists will 
be, upon the reading of some passages of the following 
dialogue, to accuse Carneades of asperity. But if I have 
made my sceptic sometimes speak slightingly of the 
opinions he opposes, I hope it will not be found that I have 
done any mere than became the part he was to act of an 
opponent: especially if what I have made him say be com- 
pared with what the prince of the Romane orators himself 
makes both great persons and friends say of one another's 
opinions, in his excellent dialogues, De Natura Deorum: 
and i shall scarce be suspected of partiality in the case, 
by them that take notice that there is full as much (if not 
far more) liberty of slighting their adversaries tenets 



- 



8 The Sceptical Chymist 

to be met with in the discourses of those with whom 
Carneades disputes. Nor need I make the interlocutors 
speak otherwise than freely in a dialogue, wherein it was 
sufficiently intimated that I meant not to declare my own 
opinion of the arguments proposed, much lesse of the 
whole controversy itself e, otherwise than as it may by an 
attentive reader be guessed at by some passages of 
Carneades (I say some passages, because I make not all 
that he says, especially in the heat of disputation, mine), 
partly in this discourse, and partly in some other l dialogues 
betwixt the same speakers (though they treat not im- 
mediately of the elements) which have long lain by me, 
and expect the entertainement that these present dis- 
courses will meet with. And indeed they will much 
mistake me, that shall conclude from what I now publish, 
that I am at defiance with chymistry, or would make my 
readers so. I hope the Specimina I have lately published 
of an attempt to shew the usefulness of chymical experi- 
ments to contemplative philosophers, will give those that 
read them other thoughts of me, and I had a design (but 
wanted opportunity) to publish with these papers an essay 
I have lying by me, the greater part of which is apologetical 
for one sort of chy mists. And at least, as for those that 
know me, I hope the pain I have taken in the fire will both 
convince them that I am far from being an enemy to the 
chymist's art (though I am no friend to many that disgrace 
it by professing it), and persuade them to believe me when 
I declare that I distinguish betwixt those chymists that 
are either cheats, or but laborants, and the true adepti; 
by whome could I enjoy their conversation, I would both 
willingly and thankfully be instructed; especially con- 
cerning the nature and generation of metals : and possibly, 
those that know how little I have remitted of my former 
addictedness to make chymical experiments, will easily 
believe that one of the chief designes of this sceptical dis- 
course was, not so much to discredit chymistry, as to give 

1 The Dialogues here meant are those about Heat, Fire, Flame, 
etc. (seen by two secretaries of the Royal Society), that the author 
somewhere complaines to have been missing with other things of 
his presently after the hasty removal of his goods by night in the 
great fire of London. 



Introductory Preface 9 

an occasion and a kind of necessity to the more knowing 
artists to lay aside a little of their over-great reservedness, 
and either explicate or prove the chymical theory better 
than ordinary chymists have done, or by enriching us 
with some of their nobler secrets to evince that their art is 
able to make amends even for the deficiencies of their 
theory: and thus much I shall make bold to add, that 
we shall much undervalue chymistry, if we imagine that 
it cannot teach us things far more useful, not only to 
physic but to philosophy, than those that are hitherto 
know to vulgar chymists. And yet as for inferior spagy- 
rists themselves, they have by their labours deserved so 
well of the commonwealth of learning, that methinks 'tis 
pity they should ever misse the truth which they have 
so industriously sought. And though I be no admirer of 
the theorical part of their art, yet my conjectures will 
much deceive me, if the practical part be not hereafter 
much more cultivated than hitherto it has been, and do 
not both employ philosophy and philosophers, and hope to 
make men such. Nor would I, that have been diverted 
by other studies as well as affairs, be thought to pretend 
being a profound spagyrist, by finding so many faults in 
the doctrine wherein the generality of chymists scruples 
not to acquiesce: for besides that 'tis most commonly far 
easier to frame objections against any proposed hypothesis 
than to propose an hypothesis not liable to objections, 
(besides this I say) 'tis no such great matter, if whereas 
beginners in chymistry are commonly at once imbued 
with the theory and operations of their profession, I who 
had the good fortune to learn the operations from illiterate 
persons, upon whose credit I was not tempted to take up 
any opinion about them, should consider things with lesse 
prejudice, and consequently with other eyes than the 
generality of learners; and should be more disposed to 
accommodate the phenomena that occurred to me to other 
notions than to those of the spagirists. And having at 
first entertained a suspicion that the vulgar principles were 
lesse general and comprehensive, or lesse considerately 
deduced from chymical operations, than was believed, it 
was not uneasie for me both to take notice of divers phaeno- 



io The Sceptical Chymist 

mena, overlooked by prepossest persons, that seemed 
not to suite so well with the hermetical doctrine; and to 
devise some experiments likely to furnish me with objec- 
tions against it, not known to many, that having practised 
chymistry longer perchance than I have yet lived, may 
have far more experience than I of particular processes. 

To conclude, whether the notions I have proposed, and 
the experiments I have communicated, be considerable, 
or not, I willingly leave others to judge; and this only I 
shall say for myself, that I have endeavoured to deliver 
matters of fact so faithfully, that I may as well assist 
the lesse skilful readers to examine the chymical hypo- 
thesis, as provoke the spagirical philosophers to illustrate 
it: which if they do, and that either the chymical opinion, 
or the peripatetic, or any other theory of the elements 
differing from that I am most inclined to, shall be intel- 
ligibly explicated, and duly proved to me; what I have 
hitherto discoursed will not hinder it from making a 
proselyte of a person that loves fluctuation of judgment 
little enough to be willing to be eased of it by anything 
but error. 



PHYSIOLOGICAL CONSIDERATIONS 

TOUCHING THE EXPERIMENTS WONT TO BE 
EMPLOYED TO EVINCE EITHER THE FOUR 
PERIPATETICK ELEMENTS, OR THE THREE 
CHYMICAL PRINCIPLES OF MIXT BODIES 

PART OF THE FIRST DIALOGUE 

I PERCEIVE that divers of my friends have thought it very 
strange to hear me speak so irresolvedly, as I have been 
wont to do, concerning those things which some take to 
be the elements, and others to be the principles of all 
mixt bodies. But I blush not to acknowledge that I 
much less scruple to confess that I doubt when I do so, 
than to profess that I know what I do not: and I should 
have much stronger expectations than I dare yet entertain, 
to see philosophy solidly established, if men would more 
carefully distinguish those things that they know from 
those that they ignore or do but think, and then explicate 
clearly the things they conceive they understand, acknow- 
ledge ingenuously what it is they ignore, and profess so 
candidly their doubts, that the industry of intelligent 
persons might be set on work to make further enquiries, 
and the easiness of less discerning men might not be 
imposed on.^But because a more particular accompt 
will probably be expected of my unsatisfiedness not only 
with the peripatetic, but with the chymical doctrine of 
the primitive ingredients of bodies: it may possibly serve 
to satisfy others of the excusableness of my dissatisfaction 
to peruse the ensuing relation of what passed a while since 
at a meeting of persons of several opinions, in a place that 
need not here be named; where the subject, whereof 
we have been speaking, was amply and variously dis- 
coursed of. 

ii 



1 2 The Sceptical Chymist 

It was on one of the fairest dayes of this summer that the 
inquisitive Eleutherius came to invite me to make a visit 
with him to his friend Carneades. I readily consented to 
this motion, telling him that if he would but permit me to 
go first and make an excuse at a place not far off, where I 
had at that hour appointed to meet, but not about a 
business either of moment, or that could not well admit 
of a delay, I would presently wait on him, because of my 
knowing Carneades to be so conversant with nature and 
with furnaces, and so unconfined to vulgar opinions, that 
he would probably by some ingenious paradox or other 
give our mindes at least a pleasing exercise, and perhaps 
enrich them with some solid instruction. Eleutherius 
then first going with me to the place where my apology 
was to be made, I accompanied him to the lodging of 
Carneades, where when we were come, we were told by 
the servants that he was retired with a couple of friends 
(whose names they also told us) to one of the arbours in his 
garden, to enjoy under its coole shades a delightful pro- 
tection from the yet troublesome heat of the sun. 

Eleutherius being perfectly acquainted with that garden 
immediately led me to the arbour, and relying on the 
intimate familiarity that had been long cherished betwixt 
him and Carneades; in spite of my reluctancy to what 
might look like an intrusion upon his privacy, drawing me 
by the hand, he abruptly entered the arbour, where we 
found Carneades, Philoponus, and Themistius, sitting 
close about a little round table, on which, besides paper, 
pen, and inke, there lay two or three open books ; Carneades 
appeared not at all troubled at this surprise, but rising 
from the table, received his friend with open looks and 
armes, and welcoming me also with his wonted freedom 
and civility, invited us to rest ourselves by him, which, 
as soon as we had exchanged with his two friends (who 
were ours also) the civilities accustomed on such occasions, 
we did. And he presently after we had seated ourselves, 
shutting the books that lay open, and turning to us with 
a smiling countenance, seemed ready to begin some such 
unconcerning discourse as is wont to pass, or rather waste, 
the time in promiscuous companies. 



Physiological Considerations 13 

But Eleutherius guessing at what he meant to do, pre- 
vented him by telling him, I perceive, Carneades, by the 
books that you have been now shutting, and much more 
by the posture wherein I found persons so qualified to 
discourse of serious matters, and so accustomed to do it, 
that you three were, before our coming, engaged in some 
philosophical conference, which I hope you will either 
prosecute, and allow us to be partakers of, in recompense 
of the freedome we have used in presuming to surprise you, 
or else give us leave to repair the injury we should other- 
wise do you, by leaving you to the freedom we have inter- 
rupted, and punishing ourselves for our boldness by 
depriving ourselves of the happiness of your company. 
With these last words he and I rose up, as if we meant to 
be gone : but Carneades suddenly laying hold on his arme, 
and stopping him by it, smilingly told him, We are not so 
forward to lose good company as you seem to imagine; 
especially since you are pleased to desire to be present at 
what we shall say about such a subject as that you found 
us considering. For that, being the number of the 
elements, principles, or material ingredients of bodies, 
is an enquiry whose truth is of that importance, and of that 
difficulty, that it may as well deserve, as require, to be 
searched into by such skilful indagators of nature as your- 
selves. And therefore we sent to invite the bold and 
acute Leucippus to lend us some light by his atomical 
paradox, upon which we expected such pregnant hints, 
that 'twas not without a great deal of trouble that we 
had lately word brought us that he was not to be found; 
and we had likewise begged the assistance of your presence 
and thoughts, had not the messenger we employed to 
Leucippus informed us that as he was going he saw you 
both pass by towards another part of the town; and this 
frustrated expectation of Leucippus his company, who 
told me but last night that he would be ready to give me 
a meeting where I pleased to-day, having very long sus- 
pended our conference about the freshly mentioned sub- 
ject, it was so newly begun when you came in, that we shall 
scarce need to repeat anything to acquaint you with what 
had passed betwixt us before your arrival, so that I cannot 



14 The Sceptical Chymist 

but look upon it as a fortunate accident that you should 
come so seasonably, to be not hearers alone, but we hope 
interlocutors at our conference. For we shall not only 
allow of your presence at it, but desire your assistance in 
it; which I add both for other reasons, and because 
though these learned gentlemen (says he, turning to his 
two friends) need not fear to discourse before any 
auditory, provided it be intelligent enough to understand 
them, yet for my part (continues he with a new smile) 
I shall not dare to vent my unpremeditated thoughts 
before two such critics, unless by promising to take your 
turnes of speaking, you will allow me mine of quarrelling 
with what has been said. He and his friends added 
divers things to convince us that they were both desirous 
that we should hear them, and resolved against our doing 
so, unless we allowed them sometimes to hear us. Eleu- 
therius, after having a while fruitlessly endeavoured to 
obtain leave to be silent, promised he would not be so 
alwayes, provided that he were permitted according to 
the freedom of his genius and principles to side with one 
of them in the managing of one argument, and, if he saw 
cause, with his antagonist, in the prosecution of another, 
without being confined to stick to any one party or opinion, 
which was after some debate accorded him. But, I con- 
scious of my own disabilities, told them resolutely that I 
was as much more willing, as more fit, to be a hearer than 
a speaker among such knowing persons, and on so abstruse 
a subject. And that therefore I beseeched them without 
necessitating me to proclaim my weaknesses, to allow me 
to lessen them by being a silent auditor of their discourses : 
to suffer me to be at which I could present them no motive, 
save that their instructions would make them in me a more 
intelligent admirer. I added that I desired not to be idle 
whilst they were imployed, but would if they pleased, by 
writing down in shorthand what should be delivered, pre- 
serve discourses that I knew would merit to be lasting. 
At first Carneades and his two friends utterly rejected 
this motion; and all that my resoluteness to make use 
of my ears, not tongue, at their debates could do, was 
to make them acquiesce in the proposition of Eleutherius, 



Physiological Considerations 15 

who thinking himself concerned, because he brought me 
thither, to afford me some faint assistance, was content 
that I should register their arguments, that I might be 
the better able after the conclusion of their conference to 
give them my sense upon the subject of it (the number 
of elements or principles), which he promised I should do 
at the end of the present debates, if time would permit, 
or else at our next meeting. And this being by him under- 
taken in my name, though without my consent, the com- 
pany would by no means receive my protestation against 
it, but casting, all at once, their eyes on Carneades, they 
did by that and their unanimous silence, invite him to 
begin ; which (after a short pause, during which he turned 
himself to Eleutherius and me) he did in this manner. 

Notwithstanding the subtile reasonings I have met with 
in the books of the peripatetics, and the prjetty experiments 
that have been shewed me in the laboratories of chymists, 
I am of so diffident or dull a nature, as to think that if 
neither of them can bring more cogent arguments to evince 
the truth of their assertion than are wont to be brought, 
a man may rationally enough retain some doubts concern- 
ing the very number of those material ingredients of 
mixt bodies, which some would have us call elements, 
and others principles. Indeed when I considered that the 
tenets concerning the elements are as considerable 
amongst the doctrines of natural philosophy, as the 
elements themselves are among the bodies of the universe, 
I expected to find those opinions solidly established, upon 
which so many others are supers tructed. But when I 
took the pains impartially to examine the bodies them- 
selves that are said to result from the blended elements, 
and to torture them into a confession of their constituent 
principles, I was quickly induced to think that the number 
of the elements has been contended about by philo- 
sophers with more earnestness than success. This un- 
satisfiedness of mine has been much wondered at by 
these two gentlemen (at which words he pointed at 
Themistius and Philoponus), who though they differ 
almost as much betwixt themselves about the question 
we are to consider, as I do from either of them, yet they 



1 6 The Sceptical Chymist 

both agree very well in this, that there is a determinate 
number of such ingredients as I was just now speaking 
of, and that what that number is I say not, may be (for 
what may not such as they persuade ?), but is wont to be 
clearly enough demonstrated both by reason and experi- 
ence. This has occasioned our present conference. For 
our discourse this afternoon, having fallen from one sub- 
ject to another, and at length settled on this, they proffered 
to demonstrate to me, each of them the truth of his opinion, 
out of both the topics that I have freshly named. But 
on the former (that of reason strictly so taken) we declined 
insisting at the present, lest we should not have time 
enough before supper to go through the reasons and 
experiments too. The latter of which we unanimously 
thought the most requisite to be seriously examined. I 
must desire you then to take notice, gentlemen (continued 
Carneades), that my present business doth not oblige 
me so to declare my own opinion on the subject in question 
as to assert or deny the truth either of the peripatetic or 
the chymical doctrine concerning the number of the 
elements, but only to shew you that neither of these 
doctrines hath been satisfactorily proved by the argu- 
ments commonly alledged on its behalfe. So that if I 
really discern (as perhaps I think I do) that there may be 
a more rational account than ordinary, given of one of 
these opinions, I am left free to declare myself of it, not- 
withstanding my present engagement, it being obvious to 
all your observation, that a solid truth may be generally 
maintained by no other than incompetent arguments. 
And to this declaration I hope it will be needless to add, 
that my task obliges me not to answer the arguments that 
may be drawn either for Themistius's or Philoponus's 
opinion from the topic of reason, as opposed to experi- 
ments; since 'tis these only that I am to examine, and 
not all these neither, but such of them alone as either of 
them shall think fit to insist on, and as have hitherto been 
wont to be brought either to prove that 'tis the four 
peripatetic elements, or that 'tis the three chymical prin- 
ciples that all compounded bodies consist of. These 
things (adds Carneades) I thought myself obliged to 



Physiological Considerations 17 

premise, partly lest you should do these gentlemen (point- 
ing at Themistius and Philoponus, and smiling on them) 
the injury of measuring their parts by the arguments they 
are ready to propose, the lawes of our conference confining 
them to make use of those that the vulgar of philo- 
sophers (for even of them there is a vulgar) has drawn up 
to their hands ; and partly that you should not condemn 
me of presumption for disputing against persons over 
whom I can hope for no advantage, that I must not derive 
from the nature or rules of our controversy, wherein I 
have but a negative to defend, and wherein too I am like 
on several occasions to have the assistance of one of my 
disagreeing adversaries against the other. 

Philoponus and Themistius soon returned this com- 
pliment with civilities of the like nature, in which Eleu- 
therius perceiving them engaged, to prevent the further 
loss of that time of which they were not like to have very 
much to spare, he minded them that their present busi- 
ness was not to exchange compliments, but arguments: 
and then addressing his speech to Carneades, I esteem it 
no small happiness (says he) that I am come here so 
luckily this evening. For I have been long disquieted 
with doubts concerning this very subject which you are 
now ready to debate. And since a question of this im- 
portance is to be now discussed by persons that maintain 
such variety of opinions concerning it, and are both so 
able to enquire after truth, and so ready to embrace 
it by whomsoever and on what occasion soever it is 
presented them; I cannot but promise myself that I 
shall before we part, either lose my doubts or the hopes of 
ever finding them resolved; Eleutherius paused not here; 
but to prevent their answer, added almost in the same 
breath; and I am not a little pleased to find that you are 
resolved on this occasion to insist rather on experiments 
than syllogismes. For I, and no doubt you, have long 
observed, that those dialectical subtleties, that the school- 
men too often employ about physiological mysteries, are 
wont much more to declare the wit of him that uses them, 
than increase the knowledge N oF"femove the doubts of 
sober lovers of truth. And such captious subtleties do 

B 



1 8 The Sceptical Chymist 

indeed often puzzle and sometimes silence men, but rarely 
satisfy them. Being like the tricks of jugglers, whereby 
men doubt not but they are cheated, though oftentimes 
they cannot declare by what flights they are imposed on. 
And therefore I think you have done very wisely to make 
it your business to consider the phenomena relating to the 
present question, which have been afforded by experi- 
ments, especially since it might seem injurious to our 
p senses, by whose mediation we acquire so much of the 
I knowledge we have of things corporal, to have recourse 

/f to far-fetched and abstracted ratiocinations, to know 
what are the sensible ingredients of those sensible things 
that we daily see and handle, and are supposed to have 
the liberty to untwist (if I may so speak) into the primi- 
tive bodies they consist of. He annexed that he wished 
therefore they would no longer delay his expected satis- 
faction, if they had not, as he feared they had, forgotten 
something preparatory to their debate; and that was to 
lay down what should be all along understood by the 
word principle or element. Carneades thanked him for his 
admonition, but told him that they had not been unmind- 
ful of so requisite a thing. But that being gentlemen 
and very far from the litigious humour of loving to 
wrangle about words, or terms, or notions as empty, they 
had before his coming in readily agreed promiscuously 
to use when they pleaded, elements and principles as terms 
equivalent: and to understand both by the one and the 

/ other, those primitive and simple bodies of which the 
mixt ones are said to be composed, and into which they 
are ultimately resolved. And upon the same account 
(he added) we agreed to discourse of the opinions to be 
debated, as we have found them maintained by the 
generality of the assertors of the four elements of the one 
party, and of those that receive the three principles on 
the other, without tying ourselves to enquire scrupulously 
what notion either Aristotle or Paracelsus, or this or that 
interpreter or follower of either of those great persons, 
framed of elements or principles; our design being to 
examine, not what these or those writers thought or 
taught, but what we find to be the obvious and most 



Physiological Considerations 19 

general opinion of those who are willing to be accounted 
favourers of the peripatetic or chymical doctrine con- 
cerning this subject. 

I see not (says Eleutherius) why you might not im- 
mediately begin to argue, if you were but agreed which of 
your two friendly adversaries shall be first heard. And it 
being quickly resolved on that Themistius should first 
propose the proofs for his opinion, because it was the 
antienter, and the more general, he made not the com- 
pany expect long before he thus addressed himself to 
Eleutherius, as to the person least interested in the 
dispute. 

If you have taken sufficient notice of the late confession 
which was made by Carneades, and which (though his 
civility dressed it up in complimental expressions) was 
exacted of him by his justice, I suppose you will be easily 
made sensible, that I engage in this controversie with 
great and peculiar disadvantages, besides those which his 
parts and my personal disabilities would bring to any 
other cause to be maintained by me against him. For 
he justly apprehending the force of truth, though speaking 
by no better a tongue than mine, has made it the chief 
condition of our duel, that I should lay aside the best 
weapons I have, and those I can best handle; whereas if I 
were allowed the freedom, in pleading for the four ele- 
ments, to employ the arguments suggested to me by 
reason to demonstrate them, I should almost as little 
doubt of making you a proselyte to those unsevered 
teachers, Truth and Aristotle, as I do of your candour and 
your judgment. And I hope you will however consider, 
that that great favourite and interpreter of nature, 
Aristotle, who was (as his Organum witnesses) the greatest 
master of logic that ever lived, disclaimed the course 
taken by other petty philosophers (antient and modern), 
who not attending the coherence and consequences of 
their opinions, are more solicitous to make each parti- 
cular opinion plausible independently upon the rest, than 
to frame them all so, as not only to be consistent together, 
but to support each other. For that great man in his 
vast and comprehensive intellect, so framed each of his 



20 The Sceptical Chymist 

notions, that being curiously adapted into one systeme, 
they need not each of them any other defence than that 
which their mutual coherence gives them: as 'tis in an 
arch, where each single stone, which if severed from the 
rest would be perhaps defenceless, is sufficiently secured 
by the solidity and entireness of the whole fabric of which 
it is a part. How justly this may be applied to the present 
case, I could easily shew you, if I were permitted to declare 
to you, how harmonious Aristotle's doctrine of the elements 
is with his other principles of philosophy; and how 
rationally he has deduced their number from that of the 
combinations of the four first qualities from the kinds of 
simple motion belonging to simple bodies, and from I 
know not how many other principles and phaenomena of 
nature, which so conspire with his doctrine of the elements, 
that they mutually strengthen and support each other. 
But since 'tis forbidden me to insist on reflections of 
this kind, I must proceed to tell you, that though the 
assertors of the four elements value reason so highly, 
and are furnished with arguments enough drawn from 
thence, to be satisfied that there must be four elements, 
though no man had ever yet made any sensible trial 
*/" to discover their number, yet they are not destitute of 
experience to satisfie others that are wont to be more 
swayed by their senses than their reason. And I shall 
proceed to consider the testimony of experience, when I 
shall have first advertised you, fchat if men were as per- 
fectly rational as 'tis to be wished they were, this sensible 
way of probation would be as needless as 'tis wont to be 
imperfecO For it is much more high and philosophical 
to discover 1 things a prior e than a posteriore. And there- 
fore the peripatetics have not been very solicitous to 
gather experiments to prove their doctrines, contenting 
themselves with a few only, to satisfy those that are not 
capable of a nobler conviction. And indeed they employ 
experiments rather to illustrate than to demonstrate 
their doctrines, as astronomers use sphseres of pasteboard, 
to descend to the capacities of such as must be taught by 
their senses, for want of being arrived to a clear appre- 
hension of purely mathematical notions and truths. I 



Physiological Considerations 21 

speak thus, Eleutherius (adds Themistius), only to do right 
to reason, and not out of diffidence of the experimental 
proof I am to alledge. For though I shall name but one, 
yet it is such a one as will make all other appear as need- 
less as itself will be found satisfactory. For if you but 
consider a piece of green wood burning in a chimney, you 
will readily discern in the disbanded parts of it the four 
elements, of which we teach it and other mixt bodies to be 
composed. The fire discovers itself in the flame by its own 
light ; the smoake by ascending to the top of the chimney, 
and there readily vanishing into air, like a river losing 
itself in the sea, sufficiently manifests to what element it 
belongs and gladly returnes. The water in its own form 
boiling and hissing at the ends of the burning wood 
betrays itself to more than one of our senses; and the 
ashes by their weight, their firiness, and their dryness, 
put it past doubt that they belong to the element of 
earth. If I spoke (continues Themistius) to less knowing 
persons, I would perhaps make some excuse for building 
upon such an obvious and easie analysis, but 'twould be, I 
fear, injurious, not to think such an apology needless to 
you, who are too judicious either to think it necessary that 
experiments to prove obvious truths should be far-fetched, 
or to wonder that among so many mixt bodies that are 
compounded of the four elements, some of them should 
upon a slight analysis manifestly exhibite the ingredients 
they consist of. Especially since it is very agreeable to the 
goodness of nature to disclose, even in some of the most 
obvious experiments that men make, a truth so im- 
portant and so requisite to be taken notice of by them. 
Besides that our analysis by how much the more obvious 
we make it, by so much the more suitable it will be to the 
nature of that doctrine which 'tis alledged to prove, which 
being as clear and intelligible to the understanding as 
obvious to the sense, 'tis no marvel the learned part of 
mankind should so long and so generally imbrace it. For 
this doctrine is very different from the whimseys of 
chymists and other modern innovators, of whose hypo- 
theses we may observe, as naturalists do of less perfect 
animals, that as they are hastily formed, so they are 



22 The Sceptical Chymist 

commonly short-lived. For so these, as they are often 
framed in one week, are perhaps thought fit to be laughed 
at the next; and being built perchance but upon two or 
three experiments are destroyed by a third or fourth, 
whereas the doctrine of the four elements was framed by 
Aristotle after he had leasurely considered those theories 
of former philosophers which are now with great 
applause revived as discovered by these latter ages; and 
had so judiciously detected and supplied the errors and 
defects of former hypotheses concerning the elements, 
that his doctrine of them has been ever since deservedly 
embraced by the lettered part of mankind : all the philo- 
sophers that preceded him having in their several ages 
contributed to the compleatness of this doctrine, as those 
of succeeding times have acquiesced in it. Nor has an 
hypothesis, so deliberately and maturely established, been 
called in question till in the last century Paracelsus and 
some few other sooty empirics, rather than (as they are 
fain to call themselves) philosophers, having their eyes 
darkened, and their braines troubled with the smoak of 
their own furnaces, began to rail at the peripatetic 
doctrine, which they were too illiterate to understand, 
and to tell the credulous world, that they could see but 
three ingredients in mixt bodies; which to gain them- 
selves the repute of inventors, they endeavoured to dis- 
guise by calling them, instead of earth, and fire, and 
vapour, salt, sulphur, and mercury; to which they gave 
the canting title of hypostatical principles . But when they 
came to describe them, they shewed how little they under- 
stood what they meant by them, by disagreeing as much 
from one another, as from the truth they agreed in oppos- 
ing: for they deliver their hypotheses as darkly as their 
processes ; and 'tis almost as impossible for any sober man 
to find their meaning, as 'tis for them to find their elixir. 
And indeed nothing has spread their philosophy, but their 
great brags and undertakings; notwithstanding all which 
(says Themistius smiling), I scarce know anything they 
have performed worth wondering at, save that they have 
been able to draw Philoponus to their party, and to engage 
him to the defence of an unintelligible hypothesis, who 



Physiological Considerations 23 

knowes so well as he does, that principles ought to be like 
diamonds, as well very clear as perfectly solid. 

Themistius having after these last words declared by 
his silence that he had finished his discourse, Carneades 
addressing himself, as his adversary had done, to Eleu- 
therius, returned this answer to it. I hoped for a demon- 
stration, but I perceive Themistius hopes to put me off 
with an harangue, wherein he cannot have given me a 
greater opinion of his parts, than he has given me distrust 
for his hypothesis, since for it even a man of such learning 
can bring no better arguments. The rhetorical part of his 
discourse, though it make not the least part of it, I shall 
say nothing to, designing to examine only the argumenta- 
tive part, and leaving it to Philoponus to answer those 
passages wherein either Paracelsus or chymists are con- 
cerned: I shall observe to you, that in what he has said 
besides, he makes it his business to do these two things. 
The one to propose and make out an experiment to 
demonstrate the common opinion about the four elements ; 
and the other, to insinuate divers things which he thinks 
may repair the weakness of his argument, from experience, 
and upon other accounts bring some credit to the other- 
wise defenceless doctrine he maintains. 

To begin then with his experiment of the burning wood, 
it seems to me to be obnoxious to not a few considerable 
exceptions. 

And first, if I would now deal rigidly with my adver- 
sary, I might here make a great question of the very way of 
probation which he and others employ, without the least 
scruple, to evince that the bodies commonly called mixt 
are made up of earth, air, water, and fire, which they are 
pleased also to call elements; namely that upon the sup- 
posed analysis made by the fire, of the former sort of 
concretes, there are wont to emerge bodies resembling 
those which they take for the elements. For not to 
anticipate here what I foresee I shall have occasion to 
insist on, when I come to discourse with Philoponus con- 
cerning the right that fire has to pass for the proper and 
universal instrument of analysing mixt bodies, not to 
anticipate that, I say, if I were disposed to wrangle, I 



24 The Sceptical Chymist 

might alledge, that by Themistius his experiment it would 
appear rather that those he calls elements are made of 
those he calls mixt bodies, than mixt bodies of the 
elements. For in Themistius's analysed wood, and in 
other bodies dissipated and altered by the fire, it appears, 
and he confesses, that which he takes for elementary fire 
/ and water are made out of the concrete; but it appears 
not that the concrete was made up of fire and water. 
Nor has either he, or any man, for ought I know, of his 
persuasion, yet proved that nothing can be obtained from 
a body by the fire that was not pre-existent in it. 

At this unexpected objection, not only Themistius, but 
the rest of the company appeared not a little surprised; 
but after a while Philoponus conceiving his opinion, as 
well as that of Aristotle, concerned in that objection, You 
cannot sure (says he to Carneades) propose this difficulty, 
not to call it cavil, otherwise than as an exercise of wit, 
and not as laying any weight upon it. For how can that 
be separated from a thing that was not existent in it? 
When, for instance, a refiner mingles gold and lead, and 
exposing this mixture upon a cuppel to the violence of 
the fire, thereby separates it into pure and refulgent gold 
and lead (which driven off together with the dross of the 
gold is thence called lythargyrium auri), can any man 
doubt that sees these two so differing substances separated 
from the mass, that they were existent in it before it was 
committed to the fire ? 

I should (replies Carneades) allow your argument to 
prove something, if, as men see the refiners commonly take 
beforehand both lead and gold to make the mass you 
speak of, so we did see nature pull down a parcel of the 
element of fire, that is fancied to be placed I know not 
how many thousand leagues off, contiguous to the orb of 
the moon, and to blend it with a quantity of each of the 
three other elements, to compose every mixt body, upon 
whose resolution the fire presents us with fire, and earth, 
and the rest. And let me add, Philoponus, that to make 
your reasoning cogent, it must be first proved, that the 
fire does only take the elementary ingredients asunder, 
without otherwise altering them. For else 'tis obvious, 



Physiological Considerations 25 

that bodies may afford substances which were not pre- 
existent in them ; as flesh too long kept produces maggots, 
and old cheese mites, which I suppose you will not affirm 
to be ingredients of those bodies. Now that fire does not 
alwayes barely separate the elementary parts, but some- 
times at least alter also the ingredients of bodies, if I did 
not expect ere long a better occasion to prove it, I might 
make probable out of your very instance, wherein there 
is nothing elementary separated by the great violence of 
the refiner's fire: the gold and lead which are the two 
ingredients separated upon the analysis being con- 
fessedly yet perfectly mixt bodies, and the litharge 
being lead indeed, but such lead as is differing in consist- 
ence and other qualities from what it was before. To 
which I must add that I have sometimes seen, and so 
questionless have you much oftener, some parcels of 
glasse adhering to the test or cuppel, and this glass, though 
emergent as well as the gold or litharge upon your analysis, 
you will not I hope allow to have been a third ingredient of 
the mass out of which the fire produced it. 

Both Philoponus and Themistius were about to reply, 
when Eleutherius apprehending that the prosecution of 
this dispute would take up time which might be better 
employed, thought fit to prevent them by saying to 
Carneades: You made at least half a promise, when you 
first proposed this objection, that you would not (now at 
least) insist on it, nor indeed does it seem to be of absolute 
necessity to your cause that you should. For though 
you should grant that there are elements, it would not 
follow that there must be precisely four. And therefore 
I hope you will proceed to acquaint us with your other 
and more considerable objections against Themistius's 
opinion, especially since there is so great a disproportion in 
bulke betwixt the earth, water, and air, on the one part, 
and those little parcels of resembling substances that 
the fire separates from concretes on the other part, that I 
can scarce think that you are serious, when to lose no 
advantage against your adversary, you seem to deny it 
to be rational to conclude these great simple bodies to 
be the elements, and not the products of compounded ones. 



26 The Sceptical Chymist 

What you alledge (replies Carneades) of the vastness of 
the earth and water, has long since made me willing to 
allow them to be the greatest and chief masses of matter 
to be met wi;h here below: but I think I could shew 
you, if you v/ould give me leave, that this will prove only 
that the elements, as you call them, are the chief bodies 
that make up the neighbouring part of the world, but not 

V* that they are such ingredients as every mixt body must 
consist of. But since you challenge me of something of a 
promise, though it be not an entire one, yet I shall willingly 
performe it. And indeed I intended not, when I first 
mentioned this objection, to insist on it at present against 
Themistius (as I plainly intimated in my way of propos- 
ing it), being only desirous to let you see, that though I 
discerned my advantages, yet I was willing to forego 
some of them rather than appear a rigid adversary of a 
cause so weak, that it may with safety be favourably 
dealt with. But I must here profess, and desire you to 
take notice of it, that though I pass on to another argu- 
ment, it is not because I think this first invalid. For you 
will find in the progress of our dispute, that I had some 
reason to question the very way of probation imployed 
both by peripatetics and chymists, to evince the being 
and number of the elements. For that there are such, 
and that they are wont to be separated by the analysis 
made by fire, is indeed taken for granted by both parties, 

*' but has not (for ought I know) been so much as plausibly 
attempted to be proved by either. Hoping then that 
when we come to that part of our debate, wherein con- 
siderations relating to this matter are to be treated of, 
you will remember what I have now said, and that I do 
rather for a while suppose than absolutely grant the 
truth of what I have questioned, I will proceed to another 
objection. 

And hereupon Eleutherius having promised him not to 
be unmindful, when time should serve, of what he had 
declared. 

I consider then (says Carneades), in the next place, that 
there are divers bodies out of which Themistius will not 
prove in haste that there can be so many elements as four 



Physiological Considerations 27 

extracted by the fire. And I should perchance trouble 
him if I should ask him what peripatetic can shew us (I 
say not, all the four elements, for that would be too rigid 
a question, but) any one of them extracted out of gold by 
any degree of fire whatsoever. Nor is gold the only 
bodie in nature that would puzzle an Aristotelian, (that is 
no more) to analyse by the fire into elementary bodies, 
since, for ought I have yet observed, both silver and cal- 
cined Venetian talc, and some other concretes, not neces- 
sary here to be named, are so fixed, that to reduce any of 
them into four heterogeneous substances has hitherto 
proved a task much too hard, not only for the disciples 
of Aristotle, but those of Vulcan, at least, whilst the 
latter have employed only fire to make the analysis. 

The next argument (continues Carneades) that I shall 
urge against Themistius's opinion shall be this, That as 
there are divers bodies whose analysis by fire cannot reduce 
them into so many heterogeneous substances or ingredients 
as four, so there are others which may be reduced into 
more, as the blood (and divers other parts) of men and 
other animals, which yield when analysed five distinct sub- 
stances, phlegme, spirit, oile, salt, and earth, as experience 
has shewn us in distilling man's blood, harts-horns, and 
divers other bodies that belonging to the animal-kingdom 
abound with not uneasily sequestrable salt. 



THE SCEPTICAL CHYMIST 



THE FIRST PART 

I AM (says Carneades) so unwilling to deny Eleutherius 
anything, that though before the rest of the company I 
am resolved to make good the part I have undertaken of 
a sceptic, yet I shall readily, since you will have it so, 
lay aside for a while the person of an adversary to the 
peripatetics and chymists; and before I acquaint you 
with my objections against their opinions, acknowledge 
to you what may be (whether truly or not) tolerably 
enough added, in favour of a certain number of principles 
of mixt bodies, to that grand and known argument 
from the analysis of compound bodies, which I may pos- 
sibly hereafter be able to confute. 

And that you may the more easily examine and the 
better judge of what I have to say, I shall cast it into a 
pretty number of distinct propositions, to which I shall 
not premise anything; because I take it for granted, that 
you need not be advertised that much of what I am to 
deliver, whether for or against a determinate number of 
ingredients of mixt bodies, may be indifferently applied 
to the four peripatetic elements, and the three chymical 
principles, though divers of my objections will more 
peculiarly belong to these last named, because the 
chymical hypothesis seeming to be much more coun- 
tenanced by experience than the other, it will be expedient 
to insist chiefly upon the disproving of that; especially 
since most of the arguments that are imployed against it, 
may, by a little variation, be made to conclude, at least 
as strongly, against the less plausible, Aristotelian doctrine. 

29 



30 The Sceptical Chymist 

To proceed then to my propositions I shall begin with 
this, that 

PROPOSITION I. It seems not absurd to conceive that at the 
first production of mixt bodies, the universal matter 

j whereof they among other parts of the universe con- 
sisted, was actually divided into little particles of 
several sizes and shapes variously moved. 

This (says Carneades) I suppose you will easily enough 
allow. For besides that which happens in the generation, 
corruption, nutrition, and wasting of bodies, that which 
we discover partly by our microscopes of the extream 
littleness of even the scarce sensible parts of concretes, 
and partly by the chymical resolutions of mixt bodies, 
and by divers other operations of spagirical fires upon them, 
seems sufficiently to manifest their consisting of parts very 
minute and of differing figures. And that there does also 
intervene a various local motion of such small bodies, will 
scarce be denied; whether we chuse to grant the origine 
or concretions assigned by Epicurus, or that related by 
Moses. (JFor the first, as you well know, supposes not 
6nI}Tall mixt bodies, but all others, to be produced by the 
various and casual occursions of atonies, moving them- 
selves to and fro by an internal principle in the immense 
or rather infinite vacuum. And as for the inspired 
historian, he, informing us that the great and wise Author 
of things did not immediately create plants, beasts, birds, 
etc., but produced them out of those portions of the pre- 
existent, though created, matter, that he calls water and 
earth, allows us to conceive that the constituent particles 
whereof these new concretes were to consist, were variously 
moved in order to their being connected into the bodies 
they were, by their various coalitions and textures, to 
compose.) 

But f continues Carneades) presuming that the first 
proposition needs not be longer insisted on, I will pass 
on to the second, and tell you that 

PROPOSITION II. Neither is it possible that of these minute 
particles divers of the smallest and neighbouring ones 



The Sceptical Chymist 31 

were here and there associated into minute masses or 
clusters, and did by their coalitions constitute great 
store of such little primary concretions or masses as 
were not easily dissipable into such particles as 
composed them. 

To what may be deduced, in favour of this assertion 
from the nature of the thing itself, I will add something 
out of experience, which though I have not known it used 
to such a purpose, seems to me more fairly to make out 
that there may be elementary bodies, than the more 
questionable experiments of peripatetics and chymists 
prove that there are such. I consider then that gold will 
mix and be colliquated not only with silver, copper, tin 
and lead, but with antimony, regulus martis and many 
other minerals, with which it will compose bodies very 
differing both from gold, and the other ingredients of the 
resulting concretes. And the same gold will also by 
common aqua regis, and (I speak it knowingly) by divers 
other menstruums, be reduced into a seeming liquor, in- 
somuch that the corpuscles of gold will, with those of 
the menstruum, pass through cap-paper, and with them 
also coagulate into a crystalline salt. And I have 
further tried, that with a small quantity of a certain saline 
substance I prepared, I can easily enough sublime gold into 
the form of red crystals of a considerable length; and 
many other wayes may gold be disguised, and help to con- 
stitute bodies of very differing natures both from it and 
from one another, and nevertheless be afterward reduced 
to the self-same numerical, yellow, fixt, ponderous, and 
malleable gold it was before its commixture. Nor is it 
only the fixedst of metals, but the most fugitive, that I 
may employ in favour of our proposition: for quicksilver 
will with divers metals compose an amalgam, with divers 
menstruums it seems to be turned into a liquor, with 
aqua fortis it will be brought into either a red or white 
powder or precipitate, with oil of vitriol into a pale 
yellow one, with sulphur it will compose a blood-red and 
volatile cinaber, with some saline bodies it will ascend in 
form of a salt which will be dissoluble in water; with 



32 The Sceptical Chymist 

regulus of antimony and silver I have seen it sublimed into 
a kinde of crystals, with another mixture I reduced it into 
a malleable body, into a hard and brittle substance by 
another: and some there are who affirm, that by proper 
additaments they can reduce quicksilver into oil, nay into 
glass, to mention no more. And yet out of all these 
exotic compounds, we may recover the very same running 
mercury that was the main ingredient of them, and was 
so disguised in them. Now the reason (proceeds Car- 
neades) that I have represented these things concern- 
ing gold and quicksilver, is, that it may not appear 
absurd to conceive, that such little primary masses or 
clusters as our proposition mentions, may remain undis- 
sipated, notwithstanding their entering into the composi- 
tion of various concretions, since the corpuscle of gold and 
mercury, though they be not primary concretions of the 
most minute particles of matter, but confessedly mixt 
bodies, are able to concure plentifully to the composition 
of several very differing bodies, without losing their own 
nature or texture, or having their cohesion violated by 
the divorce of their associated parts or ingredients. 

Give me leave to add (says Eleutherius) on this occasion, 
to what you now observed, that as confidently as some 
chymists, and other modern innovators in philosophy are 
wont to object against the peripatetics, that from the 
mixture of their four elements there could arise but an in- 
considerable variety of compound Bodies; yet if the 
Aristotelians were but half as well versed in the works of 
nature as they are in the writings of their master, the 
proposed objection would not so calmly triumph, as for 
want of experiments they are fain to suffer it to do. For 
if we assigne to the corpuscles, whereof each element con- 
sists, a peculiar size and shape, it may easily enough be 
manifested, that such differingly figured corpuscles may 
be mingled in such various proportions, and may be con- 
nected so many several ways, that an almost incredible 
number of variously qualified concretes may be com- 
posed of them. Especially since the corpuscles of one 
element may barely, by being associated among themselves, 
make up little masses of differing size and figure from their 



The Sceptical Chymist 33 

constituent parts; and since also to the strict union of 
such minute bodies there seems oftentimes nothing 
requisite, besides the bare contact of a great part of their 
surfaces. And how great a variety of phenomena the 
same matter, without the addition of any other, and only 
several ways disposed or contexed, is able to exhibit, may 
partly appear by the multitude of differing engins which 
by the contrivances of skilful mechanilians, and the 
dexterity of expert workmen, may be made of iron alone. 
But in our present case being allowed to deduce compound 
bodies from four very differently qualified sorts of matter, 
he who shall but consider what you freshly took notice of 
concerning the new concretes resulting from the mixture of 
incorporated minerals, will scarce doubt but that the four 
elements managed by nature's skill may afford a multi- 
tude of differing compounds. 

I am thus far of your minde (says Carneades) that the 
Aristotelians might with probability deduce a much 
greater number of compound bodies from the mixture of 
their four elements, than according to their present 
hypothesis they can, if instead of vainly attempting to 
deduce the variety and proprieties of all mixt bodies 
from the combinations and temperaments of the four 
elements, as they are (among them) endowed with the 
four first qualities, they had endeavoured to do it by the 
bulk and figure of the smallest parts of those supposed 
elements. For from these more catholic and fruitful 
accidents of the elementary matter may spring a great 
variety of textures, upon whose account a multitude of 
compound bodies may very much differ from one another. 
And what I now observe touching the four peripatetic 
elements, may be also applied, mutatis mutandis (as 
they speak), to the chymical principles. But (to take notice 
of that by the by) both the one and the other must, I fear, 
call in to their assistance something that is not elementary, 
to excite or regulate the motion of the parts of the matter, 
and dispose them after the manner requisite to the con- 
stitution of particular concretes. For that otherwise 
they are like to give us but a very imperfect account of the 
origine of very many mixt bodies, it would, I think, be no 

c 



34 The Sceptical Chymist 

hard matter to persuade you, if it would not spend time, 
and were no digression, to examine, what they are wont 
to alledge of the origine of the textures and qualities of mixt 
bodies from a certain substantial form, whose origination 
they leave more obscure than what it is assumed to 
explicate. 

But to proceed to a new proposition. 

PROPOSITION III. / shall not peremptorily deny, that from 
most of such mixt bodies as partake either of animal 
or vegetable nature, there may by the help of the fire be 
actually obtained a determinate number (whether three, 
four, or five, or fewer or more} of substances, worthy of 
differing denominations. 

Of the experiments that induce me to make this con- 
cession, I am like to have occasion enough to mention 
several in the prosecution of my discourse. And there- 
fore, that I may not hereafter be obliged to trouble you 
and myself with needless repetitions, I shall now only 
desire you to take notice of such experiments when they 
shall be mentioned, and in your thoughts referre them 
hither. 

To these three concessions I have but this fourth to 
add, that 

PROPOSITION IV. It may likewise be granted, that those 
distinct substances, which concretes generally either 
afford or are made up of, may without very much in- 
convenience be called the elements or principles of them. 

When I said, without very much inconvenience, I had in 
my thoughts that sober admonition of Galen, Cum dere 
constat, de verbis non est litigandum. And therefore also 
I scruple not to say elements or principles, partly because 
the chymists are wont to call the ingredients of mixt 
bodies, principles, as the Aristotelians name them elements ; 
I would here exclude neither. And, partly, because it 
seems doubtful whether the same ingredients may not be 
called principles : as not being compounded of any more 
primary bodies: and elements, in regard that all mixt 



The Sceptical Chymist 35 

bodies are compounded of them. But I thought it 
requisite to limit my concession by premising the words 
very much to the word inconvenience, because that 
though the inconvenience of calling the distinct substances, 
mentioned in the proposition elements or principles, be not 
very great, yet that it is impropriety of speech, and con- 
sequently in a matter of this moment not to be altogether 
overlooked, you will perhaps think, as well as I, by that 
time you shall have heard the following part of my dis- 
course, by which you will best discern what construction 
to put upon the former propositions, and how far they 
may be looked upon as things that I concede as true, etc., 
how far as things I only represent as specious enough to 
be fit to be considered. 

And now, Eleutherius (continues Carneades), I must 
resume the person of a sceptic, and as such, propose some 
part of what may be either disliked, or at least doubted of 
in the common hypothesis of the chymists; which if I 
examine with a little the more freedom, I hope I need not 
desire you (a person to whom I have the happiness of 
being so well known) to look upon it as something more 
suitable to the employment whereto the company has, 
for this meeting, doomed me, than either to my humour 
or my custom. 

Now though I might present you many things against 
the vulgar chymical opinion of the three principles and 
the experiments wont to be alleged as demonstrations of 
it, yet those I shall at present offer you may be con- 
veniently enough comprehended in four capital considera- 
tions; touching all which I shall only premise this in 
general, That since it is not my present task so much to 
assert an hypothesis of my own, as to give an account 
wherefore I suspect the truth of that of the chymists, it 
ought not to be expected that all my objections should be 
of the most cogent sort, since it is reason enough to doubt 
of a proposed opinion, that there appears no cogent 
reason for it. 

To come then to the objections themselves; I consider 
in the first place, that notwithstanding what common 
chymists have proved or taught, it may reasonably enough 



36 The Sceptical Chymist 

be doubted, how far, and in what sense, fire ought to be 
esteemed the genuine and universal instrument of analys- 
ing mixt bodies. 

This doubt, you may remember, was formerly mentioned, 
but so transiently discoursed of, that it will now be fit to 
insist upon it, and manifest that it was not so incon- 
siderately proposed as our adversaries then imagined. 

But, before I enter any further into this disquisition, I 
cannot but here take notice, that it were to be wished our 
chymists had clearly informed us what kind of division of 
bodies by fire must determine the number of the elements : 
For it is nothing near so easy as many seem to think, to 
determine distinctly the effects of heat, as I could easily 
manifest, if I had leasure to shew you how much the opera- 
tions of fire may be diversified by circumstances. But 
not wholly to pass by a matter of this importance, I will 
first take notice to you that guajacum (for instance) 
burnt with an open fire in a chimney, is sequestred into 
ashes and soot, whereas the same wood distilled in a 
retort does yield far other heterogeneities (to use the 
Helmontian expression), and is resolved into oil, spirit, 
vinegar, water and charcoal ; the last of which to be reduced 
into ashes, requires the being farther calcined than it can 
be in a close vessel: besides having kindled amber, and 
held a clean silver spoon, or some other concave and 
smooth vessel, over the smoak of its flame, I observed the 
soot into which that fume condensed to be very differing 
from anything that I had observed to proceed from the 
steam of amber purposely (for that is not usual) distilled 
per se in close vessels. Thus having, for trial's sake, 
kindled camphire and catcht the smoak that copiously 
ascended out of the flame, it condensed into a black 
and unctuous soot, which would not have been guessed 
by the smell or other properties to have proceeded from 
camphire: whereas having (as I shall other, where more 
fully declare) exposed a quantity of that fugitive con- 
crete to a gentle heat in a close glass vessel, it sublimed 
up without seeming to have lost anything of its whiteness, 
or its nature, both which it retained, though afterwards 
I so encreased the fire as to bring it to fusion. And, 



The Sceptical Chymist 37 

besides camphire, there are divers other bodies (that 
I elsewhere name) in which the heat in close vessels is not 
wont to make any separation of heterogeneities, but only 
a comminution of parts,, those that rise first being 
homogeneal with the others, though subdivided into 
smaller particles: whence sublimations have been styled, 
The pestles of the chymists. But not here to mention 
what I elsewhere take notice of, concerning common 
brimstone once or twice sublimed, that exposed to a 
moderate fire in subliming-pots, it rises all into dry, and 
almost tasteless, flowers; whereas being exposed to a 
naked fire it affords store of a saline and fretting liquor: 
not to mention this, I say, I will further observe to you, 
that as it is considerable in the analysis of mixt bodies, 
whether the fire act on them when they are exposed to the 
open air, or shut up in close vessels, so is the degree of fire, 
by which the analysis is attempted, of no small moment. 
For a milde balneum will sever unfermented blood (for 
instance) but into phlegme and caput mortuum, the latter 
whereof (which I have sometimes had), hard, brittle, and of 
divers colours (transparent almost like tortoise-shell), 
pressed by a good fire in a retort yields a spirit, an oil or 
two, and a volatile salt, besides another caput mortuum. It 
may be also pertinent to our present designe, to take notice 
of what happens in the making and distilling of soap ; for by 
one degree of fire the salt, the water, and the oil or grease, 
whereof that factitious concrete is made up, being boiled 
up together are easily brought to mingle and incorporate 
into one mass ; but by another and further degree of heat 
the same mass may be again divided into an oleagenous 
and aqueous, a saline, and an earthy part. And so we 
may observe that impure silver and lead being exposed 
together to a moderate fire will thereby be colliquated into 
one mass, and mingle per minima, as they speak; whereas 
a much vehementer fire will drive or carry off the baser 
metals (I mean the lead, and the copper or other alloy) 
from the silver, though not, for ought appears, separate 
them from one another. Besides, when a vegetable 
abounding in fixt salt is analysed by a naked fire, as one 
degree of heat will reduce it into ashes (as the chymists 



38 The Sceptical Chymist 

themselves teach us), so, by only a further degree of fire, 
those ashes may be vitrified and turned into glass. I will 
not stay to examine how far a mere chymist might on this 
occasion demand, if it be lawful for an Aristotelian to make 
ashes (which he mistakes for mere earth) pass for an 
element, because by one degree of fire it may be produced, 
why a chymist may not upon the like principle argue that 
glass is one of the elements of many bodies, because that 
also may be obtained from them, barely by the fire? I 
will not, I say, lose time to examine this, but observe that 
by a method of applying the fire, such similar bodies may 
be obtained from a concrete, as chymists have not been 
able to separate, either by barely burning it in an open 
fire, or by barely distilling it in close vessels. For to me 
it seems very considerable, and I wonder that men have 
taken so little notice of it, that I have not by any of the 
common wayes of distillation in close vessels seen any 
separation made of such a volatile salt as is afforded us 
by wood, when that is first by an open fire divided into 
ashes and soot, and that soot is afterwards placed in a 
strong retort, and compelled by an urgent fire to part 
with its spirit, oil, and salt; for though I dare not peremp- 
torily deny that in the liquors of guaiacum and other 
woods distilled in retorts after the common manner, there 
may be saline parts, which by reason of the analogy may 
pretend to the name of some kinde of volatile salts,, yet 
questionless there is a great disparity betwixt such salts 
and that which we have sometimes obtained upon the 
first distillation of soot (though for the most part it has 
not been separated from the first or second rectification, 
and sometimes not till the third). For we could never 
yet see separated from woods analysed only the vulgar 
way in close vessels any volatile salt in a dry and saline 
form, as that of soot, which we have often had very 
crystalline and geometrically figured. And then, whereas 
the saline parts of the spirits of guaiacum, etc., appear 
upon distillation sluggish enough, the salt of soot seems 
to be one of the most volatile bodies in all nature; and if 
it be well made will readily ascend with the milde heat of 
a furnace, warmed only by the single wick of a lamp, to 



The Sceptical Chymist 39 

the top of the highest glass vessels that are commonly 
made use of for distillation: and besides all this, the taste 
and smell of the salt of soot are exceedingly differing 
from those of the spirits of guaiacum, etc., and the former 
not only smells and tastes much less like a vegetable salt, 
than like that of harts-horn, and other animal concretes, 
but in divers other properties seems more of kin to the 
family of animals than to that of vegetable salts, as I 
may elsewhere (God permitting) have an occasion more 
particularly to declare. I might likewise by some other 
examples manifest that the chymists, to have dealt 
clearly, ought to have more explicitly and particularly ' 
declared by what degree of fire, and in what manner of 
application of it, they would have us judge a division 
made by the fire to be a true analysis into their principles, 
and the productions of it to deserve the name of elemen- 
tarjr bodies. But it is time that I proceed to mention the 
particular reasons that incline me to doubt whether the 
fire be the true and universal analyser of mixt bodies; 
of which reasons what has been already objected may 
pass for one. 

In the next place I observe, that there are some mixt 
bodies from which it has not been yet made appear that 
any degree of fire can separate either salt or sulphur or 
mercury, much less all the three. The most obvious in- 
stance of this truth is gold, which is a body so fixt, and 
wherein the elementary ingredients (if it have any) are so 
firmly united to each other, that we finde not in the opera- 
tions wherein gold is exposed to the fire, how violent 
soever, that it does discernably so much as lose of its 
fixedness or weight, so far is it from being dissipated into 
those principles, whereof one at least is acknowledged to be 
fugitive enough; and so justly did the spagirical poet 
somewhere exclaim : 

Cuncta adeo miris compagibus hcerent. 

And I must not omit on this occasion to mention to you, 
Eleutherius, the memorable experiment that I remember 
I met with in * Gasto Claveus, who, though a lawyer by 
1 Gasto Claveus Apolog. Argur. and Chryf opera. 



40 The Sceptical Chymist 

profession, seems to have had no small curiosity and 
experience in chymical affairs : he relates then, that having 
put into one small earthen vessel an ounce of the most 
pure gold, and into another the like weight of pure silver, 
he placed them both in that part of a glass-house furnace 
wherein the workmen keep their metal (as our English 
artificers call their liquid glass) continually melted, and 
that having there kept both the gold and the silver in 
constant fusion for two months together, he afterwards 
took them out of the furnace and the vessels, and weighing 
both of them again, found that the silver had not lost 
above a twelfth part of its weight, but the gold had not of 
his lost anything at all. And though our author en- 
deavours to give us of this a scholastic reason, which I 
suppose you would be as little satisfied with, as I was 
when I read it, yet for the matter of fact, which will 
serve our present turne, he assures us, that though it be 
strange, yet experience itself taught it him to be most 
true. 

And though there be not perhaps any other body to 
be found so perfectly fixt as gold, yet there are divers 
others so fixt or composed, at least of so strictly united 
parts, that I have not yet observed the fire to separate 
from them any one of the chymist's principles. I need not 
tell you what complaints the more candid and judicious 
of the chymists themselves are wont to make of those 
boasters that confidently pretend, that they have 
extracted the salt or sulphur of quicksilver, when they 
have disguised it by additaments, wherewith it resembles 
the concretes whose names are given it; whereas by a 
skilful and rigid examen, it may be easily enough stript of 
its disguises, and made to appear again in the pristine 
form - of running mercury. The pretended salts and 
sulphurs being so far from being elementary parts ex- 
tracted out of the bodie of mercurie, that they are rather 
(to borrow a terme of the grammarians) de-compound 
bodies, made up of the whole metal and the menstruum, 
or other additaments imployed to disguise it. And as 
for silver, I never could see any degree of fire make it 
part with any of its three principles. And though the 



The Sceptical Chymist 41 

experiment lately mentioned from Claveus may beget 
a suspition that silver may be dissipated by fire, provided 
it be extreamly violent and very lasting, yet it will not 
necessarily follow, that because the fire was able at length 
to make the silver lose a little of its weight, it was there- 
fore able to dissipate it into its principles. For first I 
might alledge that I have observed little grains of silver to 
lie hid in the small cavities (perhaps glassed over by a 
vitrifying heat) in crucibles, wherein silver has been long 
kept in fusion, whence some goldsmiths of my acquaint- 
ance make a benefit by grinding such crucibles to powder, 
to recover out of them the latent particles of silver. 
And hence I might argue, that perhaps Claveus was mis- 
taken, and imagined that silver to have been driven away 
by the fire, that indeed lay in minute parts hid in his 
crucible, in whose pores so small a quantity as he misst 
of so ponderous a bodie might very well lie concealed. 

But secondly, admitting that some parts of the silver 
were driven away by the violence of the fire, what proof 
is there that it was either the salt, the sulphur, or the 
mercury of the metal, and not rather a part of it homo- 
geneous to what remained? For besides that the silver 
that was left seemed not sensibly altered, which probably 
would have appeared, had so much of any one of its prin- 
ciples been separated from it; we finde in other mineral 
bodies of a less permanent nature than silver, that the 
fire may divide them into such minute parts, as to be able 
to carry them away with itself, without at all destroying 
their nature. Thus we see that in the refining of silver, 
the lead that is mixt with it (to carry away the copper or 
other ignoble mineral that embases the silver) will, if it 
be let alone, in time evaporate away upon the test; but 
if (as is most usual amongst those that refine great quanti- 
ties of metals together) the lead be blown off from the 
silver by bellowes, that which would else have gone away 
in the form of unheeded steams will in great part be 
collected not far from the silver, in the form of a darkish 
powder or calx; which, because it is blown off from silver, 
they call litharge of silver. And thus Agricola in divers 
places informs us, when copper, or the ore of it, is colli- 



42 The Sceptical Chymist 

quated by the violence of the fire with cadmia, the sparks, 
that in great multitudes do fly upwards, do some of them 
stick to the vaulted roofs of the furnaces, in the form of 
little and (for the most part) white bubbles, which there- 
fore the Greeks, and, in imitation of them, our drugsters 
call pompholyx : and others more heavy partly adhere to 
the sides of the furnace, and partly (especially if the 
covers be not kept upon the pots) fall to the ground, and 
by reason of their ashy colour as well as weight were 
called by the same Greeks o-TroSbs, which, I need not tell 
you, in their language signifies ashes. I might add, that 
I have not found that from Venetian talc (I say Venetian 
because I have found other kinds of that mineral more 
open), from the lapis ossifragus (which the shops call 
ostiocolla), from Muscovia glass, from pure and fusible 
sand (to mention now no other concretes), those of my 
acquaintance that have tried, have been able by the fire 
to separate any one of the hypostatical principles ; which 
you will the less scruple to believe, if you consider that 
glass may be made by the bare colliquation of the salt 
and earth remaining in the ashes of a burnt plant, and 
that yet common glass, once made, does so far resist the 
violence of the fire, that most chymists think it a body 
more undestroyable than gold itself. For if the artificer 
can so firmly unite such ccmparative gross particles as 
those of earth and salt that make up common ashes, into 
a body indissoluble by fire, why may not nature associate 
in divers bodies the more minute elementary corpuscles 
she has at hand too firmly to let them be separable by 
the fire ? And on this occasion, Eleutherius, give me leave 
to mention to you two or three slight experiments, which 
will, I hope, be found more pertinent to our present 
discourse, than at first perhaps they will appear. The 
first is, that, having (for trial's sake) put a quantity of that 
fugitive concrete, camphire, into a glass vessel, and 
placed it in a gentle heat, I found it (not leaving behinde, 
according to my estimate, not so much as one grain) to 
sublime to the top of the vessel into flowers; which is 
whiteness, smell, etc., seemed not to differ from the cam- 
phire itself. Another experiment is that of Helmont, who 



The Sceptical Chymist 43 

in several places affirms, that a coal kept in a glass exactly 
closed will never be calcined to ashes, though kept never 
so long in a strong fire : to countenance which I shall tell 
you this trial of my own, that having sometimes distilled 
some woods, as particularly box, whilst our caput mortuum 
remained in the retort, it continued black like charcoal, 
though the retort were earthen, and kept red-hot in a 
vehement fire; but as soon as ever it was brought out 
of the candent vessel into the open air, the burning coals 
did hastily degenerate or fall asunder, without the assist- 
ance of any new calcination, into pure white ashes. And 
to these two I shall add but this obvious and known 
observation, that common sulphur (if it be pure and freed 
from its vinegar) being leasurely sublimed in close vessels, 
rises into dry flowers, which may be presently melted into 
a bodie of the same nature with that which afforded them. 
Though, if brimstone be burnt in the open air, it gives, 
you know, a penetrating fume, which being caught in a 
glass bell condenses into that acid liquor called oil of 
sulphur per campanam. The use I would make of these 
experiments collated with what I lately told you out of 
Agricola is this, that even among the bodies that are not 
fixt, there are divers of such a texture, that it will be 
hard to make it appear how the fire, as chymists are wont 
to imploy it, can resolve them into elementary substances. 
For some bodies being of such a texture that the fire can 
drive them into the cooler and less hot part of the vessels 
wherein they are included, and if need be, remove them 
from place to place to fly the greatest heat, more easily 
than it can divorce their elements (especially without the 
assistance of the air), we see that our chymists cannot 
analyse them in close vessels, and of other compound 
bodies the open fire can as little separate the elements. 
For what can a naked fire do to analyse a mixt bodie, 
if its component principles be so minute, and so strictly 
united, that the corpuscles of it need less heat to carry 
them up than is requisite to divide them into their prin- 
ciples? So that of some bodies the fire cannot in close 
vessels make any analysis at all; and others will in the 
open air fly away in the forms of flowers or liquors, before 



44 The Sceptical Chymist 

the heat can prove able to divide them into their prin- 
ciples. And this may hold, whether the various similar 
parts of a concrete be combined by nature or by art; for 
in factitious sal ammoniac we finde the common and the 
urinous salts so well mingled, that both in the open fire, 
and in subliming vessels they rise together as one salt, 
which seems in such vessels irresoluble by fire alone. 
For I can shew you sal ammoniac which after the ninth 
sublimation does still retain its compounded nature. And 

\S" indeed I scarce know any one mineral, from which by fire 
alone chymists are wont to sever any substance simple 
enough to deserve the name of an element or principle. 
For though out of native cinnaber they distil quicksilver, 
and though from many of those stones that the ancients 
called pyrites they sublime brimstone, yet both that 
quicksilver and this sulphur being very often the same 
with the common minerals that are sold in the shops under 
those names, are themselves too much compounded 
bodies to pass for the elements of such. And thus much, 
Eleutherius, for the second argument that belongs to my 
first consideration; the others I shall the lesse insist on, 
because I have dwelt so long upon this. 

Proceed we then in the next place to consider, that 
there are divers separations to be made by other means, 

v* which either cannot at all, or else cannot so well be made 
by the fire alone. When gold and silver are melted into 
one mass, it would lay a great obligation upon refiners 
and goldsmiths to teach them the art of separating them 
by the fire, without the trouble and charge they are fain 
to be at to sever them. Whereas they may be very easily 
parted by the affusion of spirit of nitre or aqua /or/z's ; 
which the French therefore call eau de depart : so likewise 
the metalline part of vitriol will not be so easily and con- 
veniently separated from the saline part even by a violent 
fire, as by the affusion of certain alkalisate salts in a 
liquid form upon the solution of vitriol made in common 
water. For thereby the acid salt of the vitriol leaving 
the copper it had corroded to join with the added salts, 
the metalline part will be precipitated to the bottom 
almost like mud. And that I may not give instances only 



The Sceptical Chymist 45 

in de-compound bodies, I will add a not useless one of 
another kinde. Not only chymists have not been able 
(for ought is vulgarly known) by fire alone to separate 
true sulphur from antimony, but though you may finde 
in their books many plausible processes of extracting it, 
yet he that shall make as many fruitless trials as I have 
done to obtain it by, most of them will, I suppose, be 
easily persuaded, that the productions of such processes 
are antimonial sulphurs rather in name than nature. 
But though antimony sublimed by itself is reduced but to 
a volatile powder, or antimonial flowers, of a compounded 
nature like the mineral that affords them : yet I remember 
that some years ago I sublimed out of antimony a sulphur, 
and that in greater plenty than ever I saw obtained from 
that mineral, by a method which I shall therefore acquaint 
you with, because chymists seem not to have taken notice 
of what importance such experiments may be in the in- 
dagation of the nature, and especially of the number of the 
elements. Having then purposely for trial's sake digested 
eight ounces of good and well powdered antimony with 
twelve ounces of oil of vitriol in a well stopt glass vessel 
for about six or seven weeks ; and having caused the mass 
(grown hard and brittle) to be distilled in a retort placed 
in sand, with a strong fire ; we found the antimony to be 
so opened, or altered by the menstruum wherewith it had 
been digested, that whereas crude antimony, forced up 
by the fire, arises only in flowers, our antimony thus 
handled afforded us partly in the receiver, and partly in the 
neck and at the top of the retort, about an ounce of 
sulphur, yellow and brittle like common brimstone, and of 
so sulphureous a smell, that upon the unluting the vessels it 
infected the room with a scarce supportable stink. And 
this sulphur, besides the colour and smell, had the perfect 
inflammability of common brimstone, and would imme- 
diately kindle (at the flame of a candle) and burn blue 
like it. And though it seemed that the long digestion 
wherein our antimony and menstruum were detained, 
did conduce to the better unlocking of the mineral, yet if 
you have not the leasure to make so long a digestion you 
may by incorporating with powdered antimony a con- 



46 The Sceptical Chymist 

venient quantity of oil of vitriol, and committing them 
immediately to distillation, obtain a little sulphur like 
unto the common one, and more combustible than perhaps 
you will at first take notice of. For I have observed, that 
though (after its being first kindled) the flame would 
sometimes go out too soon of itself, if the same lump of 
sulphur were held again to the flame of a candle, it would 
be rekindled and burn a pretty while, not only after the 
second, but after the third or fourth accension. You, to 
whom I think I shewed my way of discovering something 
of sulphureous in oil of vitriol, may perchance suspect, 
Eleutherius, either that this substance was some venereal 
sulphur that lay hid in that liquor, and was by this opera- 
tion only reduced into a manifest body; or else that it 
was a compound of the unctuous parts of the antimony, 
and the saline ones of the vitriol, in regard that (as 
Gunther informs us) divers learned men would have 
sulphur to be nothing but a mixture made in the bowels of 
the earth of vitriolate spirits and a certain combustible 
substance. But the quantity of sulphur we obtained by 
digestion was much too great to have been latent in the oil 
of vitriol. And that vitriolate spirits are not necessary to 
the construction of such a sulphur as ours, I could easily 
manifest, if I would acquaint you with the several wayes 
by which I have obtained, though not in such plenty, a 
sulphur of antimony, coloured and combustible like 
common brimstone. And though I am not now minded 
to discover them, yet I shall tell you, that to satisfie some 
ingenious men, that distilled vitriolate spirits are not 
necessary to the obtaining of such a sulphur as we have 
been considering, I did by the bare distillation of only 
spirit of nitre, from its weight of crude antimony separate, 
in a short time, a yellow and very inflammable sulphur, 
which, for ought I know, deserves as much the name of an 
element as anything that chymists are wont to separate 
from any mineral by the fire. I could perhaps tell you 
of other operations upon antimony, whereby that may 
be extracted from it, which cannot be forced out of it by 
the fire ; but I shall reserve them for a fitter opportunity, 
and only annex at present this slight, but not impertinent 



The Sceptical Chymist 47 

experiment. That whereas I lately observed to you, 
that the urinous and common salts whereof sal ammoniac 
consists, remained unsevered by the fire in many succes- 
sive sublimations, they may be easily separated, and 
partly without any fire at all, by pouring upon the 
concrete finely powdered, a solution of salt of tartar, or 
of the salt of wood-ashes; for upon your diligently mixing 
of these you will finde your nose invaded with a very 
strong smell of urine, and perhaps too your eyes forced to 
water, by the same subtle and piercing body that produces 
the stink; both these effects proceeding from hence, that 
by the alkalisate salt, the sea salt that entered the com- 
position of the sal ammoniac is mortified and made more 
fixt, and thereby a divorce is made between it and the 
volatile urinous salt, which being at once set at liberty, 
and put into motion, begins presently to fly away, and 
to offend the nostrils and eyes it meets with by the way. 
And if the operation of these salts be in convenient glasses 
promoted by warmth, though but by that of a bath, the 
ascending steames may easily be caught and reduced into 
a penetrant spirit, abounding with a salt, which I have 
sometimes found to be separable in a crystalline form. 
I might add to these instances, that where as sublimate, 
consisting, as you know, of salts and quicksilver combined 
and carried up together by heat, may be sublimed, I 
know not how often, by a like degree of fire, without 
suffering any divorce of the component bodies, the 
mercury may be easily severed from the adhering salts, if 
the sublimate be distilled from salt of tartar, quicklime, 
or such alkalisate bodies. But I will rather observe to 
you, Eleutherius, what divers ingenious men have thought 
somewhat strange, that by such an additament that seems 
but only to promote the separation, there may be easily 
obtained from a concrete, that by the fire alone is easily 
divisible into all the elements that vegetables are sup- 
posed to consist of, such a similar substance as differs in 
many respects from them all, and consequently has by 
many of the most intelligent chymists been denied to be 
contained in the mixt body. For I know a way, and 
have practised it, whereby common tartar, without the 



48 The Sceptical Chymist 

addition of anything that is not perfectly a mineral, except 
saltpetre, may by one distillation in an earthen retort be 
made to afford good store of real salt, readily dissoluble 
in water, which I found to be neither acid, nor of the 
smell of tartar, and to be almost as volatile as spirit of 
wine itself, and to be indeed of so differing a nature from 
all that is wont to be separated by fire from tartar, and 
divers learned men, with whom I discoursed of it, could 
hardly be brought to believe, that so fugitive a salt could 
be afforded by tartar, till I assured it them upon my own 
knowledge. And if I did not think you apt to suspect 
me to be rather too backward than too forward to credit 
or affirm unlikely things, I could convince you by what 
I have yet lying by me of that anomalous salt. 

The fourth thing that I shall alledge to countenance my 
first consideration is, that the fire even when it divides a 
body into substances of divers consistences, does not 
\/ most commonly analyse it into hypostatical principles, 
but only disposes its parts into new textures, and thereby 
produces concretes of a new indeed, but yet of a com- 
pound nature. This argument it will be requisite for me 
to prosecute so fully hereafter, that I hope you will then 
confess that 'tis not for want of good proofs that I desire 
leave to suspend my proofs till the series of my discourse 
shall make it more proper and seasonable to propose them. 

It may be further alledged on the behalf of my first con- 
sideration, that some such distinct substances may be 
obtained from some concretes without fire, as deserve no 
less the name of elementary than many that chymists 
extort by the violence of the fire. 

We see that the inflammable spirit, or as the chymists 
esteem it, the sulphur of wine, may not only be separated 
from it by the gentle heat of a bath, but may be distilled 
either by the help of the sunbeams, or even of a dunghill, 
being indeed of so fugitive a nature, that it is not easy to 
keep it from flying away, even without the application 
of external heat. I have likewise observed that a vessel 
full of urine being placed in a dunghill, the putrefaction 
is wont after some weeks so to open the body, that the 
parts disbanding the saline spirit, will within no very long 



The Sceptical Chymist 49 

time, if the vessel be not stoppt, fly away of itself; inso- 
much that from such urine I have been able to distil 
little or nothing else than a nauseous phlegme, instead of 
the active and piercing salt and spirit that it would have 
afforded, when first exposed to the fire, if the vessel had 
been carefully stoppt. 

And this leads me to consider, in the fifth place, that 
it will be very hard to prove, that there can no other 
body or way be given which will as well as the fire 
divide concretes into several homogeneous substances, 
which may consequently be called their elements or 
principles, as well as those separated or produced by 
the fire. For since we have lately seen, that nature 
can successfully employ other instruments than the fire 
to separate distinct substances from mixt bodies, how 
know we, but that nature has made, or art may make, 
some such substance as may be a fit instrument to 
analyse mixt bodies, or that some such method may be 
found by human industry or luck, by whose means com- 
pound bodies may be resolved into other substances than 
such as they are wont to be divided into by the fire. And 
why the products of such an analysis may not as justly 
be called the component principles of the bodies that 
afford them, it will not be easy to shew, especially since 
I shall hereafter make it evident, that the substances 
which chymists are wont to call the salts, and sulphurs, 
and mercuries of bodies, are not so pure and elementary 
as they presume, and as their hypothesis requires. And 
this may therefore be the more freely pressed upon the 
chymists, because neither the Paracelsansi, nor the Hel- 
montians can reject it without apparent injury to their 
respective masters. For Helmont does more than once 
inform his readers, that both Paracelsus and himself were 
possessors of the famous liquor, alkahest, which for its 
great power in resolving bodies irresoluble by vulgar fires, 
he somewhere seems to call ignis Gehenna. To this 
liquor he ascribes (and that in great part upon his own 
experience) such wonders, that if we suppose them all 
true, I am so much the more a friend to knowledge than 
to wealth, that I should think the alkahest a nobler and 

D 



50 The Sceptical Chymist 

more desirable secret than the philosopher's stone itself. 
Of this universal dissolvent he relates, that having 
digested with it for a compentet time a piece of oaken 
charcoal, it was thereby reduced into a couple of new and 
distinct liquors, discriminated from each other by their 
colour and situation, and that the whole body of the coal 
was reduced into those liquors, both of them separable 
from his immortal menstruum, which remained as fit for 
such operations as before. And he moreover tells us in 
divers places of his writings, that by his powerful, and un- 
wearied agent, he could dissolve metals, marchasites, 
stones, vegetable and animal bodies of what kinde soever, 
and even glass itself (first reduced to powder), and in a 
word, all kind of mixt bodies in the world, into their 
several similar substances, without any residence or 
caput mortuum. And lastly, we may gather this further 
from his informations, that the homogeneous substances 
obtainable from compound bodies by his piercing liquor, 
were oftentimes different enough, both as to number and as 
to nature, from those into which the same bodies are 
wont to be divided by common fire. Of which I shall 
need in this place to mention no other proof, than what 
whereas we know that in our common analysis of a 
mixt body there remains a terrestrial and very fixt 
substance, oftentimes associated with a salt as fixt; 
our author tells us, that by his way he could distil over 
all concretes without any caput mortuum, and conse- 
quently could make those parts of the concrete volatile, 
which in the vulgar analysis would have been fixt. So 
that if our chymists will not reject the solemn and repeated 
testimony of a person, who cannot but be acknowledged 
for one of the greatest spagyrists that they can boast of, 
they must not deny that there is to be found in nature 
another agent able to analyse compound bodies less 
violently, and both more genuinely and more universally 
than the fire. And for my own part, though I cannot 
but say on this occasion what (you know) our friend 
Mr. Boyle is wont to say, when he is askt his opinion of 
any strange experiment; That he that hath seen it hath 
more reason to believe it, than he that hath not, yet I have 



The Sceptical Chymist 51 

found Helmont so faithful a writer, even in divers of his 
improbable experiments (I alwaies except that extravagant 
treatise De Magnetica Vulnerum Curatione, which some 
of his friends affirm to have been first published by his 
enemies) that I think it somewhat harsh to give him the 
lye, especially to what he delivers upon his own proper 
tryal. And I have heard from very credible eye-witnesses 
some things, and seen some others myself, which argue 
so strongly, that a circulated salt, or a menstruum (such 
as it may be) may by being abstracted from compound 
bodies, whether mineral, animal, or vegetable, leave them 
more unlockt than a wary naturalist would easily believe, 
that I dare not confidently measure the power of nature 
and art by that of the menstruums, and other instruments 
that eminent chymists themselves are as yet wont to 
employ about the analysing of bodies; nor deny that a 
menstruum may at least from this or that particular 
concrete obtain some apparently similar substance, 
differing from any obtainable from the same body by any 
degree or manner of application of the fire. And I am 
the more backward to deny peremptorily, that there may 
be such openers of compound bodies, because among the 
experiments that make me speak thus warily, there wanted 
not some in which it appeared not, that one of the sub- 
stances, not separable by common fires and menstruums, 
could retain anything of the salt by which the separation 
was made. 

And here, Eleutherius (says Carneades) I should con- 
clude as much of my discourse as belongs to the first 
consideration I proposed, but that I foresee, that what 
I have delivered will appear liable to two such specious 
objections, that I cannot safely proceed any further till 
I have examined them. 

And first, one sort of opposers will be forward to tell 
me, that they do not pretend by fire alone to separate out 
of all compound bodies their hypostatical principles; 
it being sufficient that the fire divides them into such, 
though afterwards they employ other bodies to collect 
the similar parts of the compound; as 'tis known, that 
though they make use of water to collect the saline parts 



52 The Sceptical Chymist 

of ashes from the terrestrial wherewith they are blended, 
yet it is the fire only that incinerates bodies, and reduces 
the fixed part of them into the salt and earth, whereof 
ashes are made up. This objection is not, I confess, 
inconsiderable, and I might in great part allow of it, 
without granting it to make against me, if I would content 
myself to answer, that it is not against those that make 
it that I have been disputing, but against those vulgar 
chymists, who themselves believe, and would fain make 
' others do so, that the fire is not only an universal, but 
an adequate and sufficient instrument to analyse mixt 
bodies with. For as to their practice of extracting the 
fixed salt out of ashes by the affusion of water, 'tis obvious 
to alledge, that the water does only assemble together 
the salt, the fire had before divided from the earth: as 
a sieve does not further break the corn, but only bring 
together into two distinct heaps the flower and the bran, 
whose corpuscles before lay promiscuously blended to- 
gether in the meal. This I say I might alledge, and there- 
by exempt myself from the need of taking any farther 
notice of the proposed objection. But not to lose the 
rise it may afford me of illustrating the matter under 
consideration, I am content briefly to consider it, as far 
forth as my present disquisition may be concerned in it. 

Not to repeat then what has been already answered, 
I say further, that though I am so civil an adversary, 
that I will allow the chymists, after the fire has done all 
its work, the use of fair water to make their extractions 
with, in such cases wherein the water does not co-operate 
with the fire to make the analysis ; yet since I grant this 
but upon supposition that the water does only wash off 
the saline particles, which the fire alone has before extri- 
cated in the analysed body, it will not be reasonable, that 
this concession should extend to other liquors that may 
add to what they dissolve, nor so much as to other cases 
than those newly mentioned: which limitation I desire 
you would be pleased to bear in mind till I shall anon 
have occasion to make use of it. And this being thus 
premised, I shall proceed to observe, 

First, that many of the instances I proposed in the 



The Sceptical Chymist 53 

preceding discourse are such, that the objection we are 
considering will not at all reach them. For fire can no 
more with the assistance of water, than without it, 
separate any of the three principles, either from gold, 
silver, mercury, or some others of the concretes named 
above. 

Hence we may inferre, that fire is not an universal 
analyser of all mixt bodies, since of metals and minerals, 
wherein chymists have most exercised themselves, there 
appear scarce any which they are able to analyse by fire, 
nay, from which they can unquestionably separate so 
much as any one of their hypostatical principles; which 
may well appear no small disparagement, as well to their 
hypothesis, as to their pretensions. 

It will also remain true, notwithstanding the objection, 
that there may be other wayes, than the wonted analysis 
by fire, to separate from a compound body substances 
as homogeneous as those that chymists scruple not to 
reckon among their tria prima (as some of them, for 
brevity sake, call their three principles). 

And it appears, that by convenient additaments such 
substances may be separated by the help of the fire, as 
could not be so by the fire alone. Witness the sulphur 
of antimony. 

And lastly, I must represent, that since it appears too 
that the fire is but one of the instruments that must be 
employed in the resolution of bodies, we may reasonably 
challenge the liberty of doing two things. For when- 
ever any menstruum or other additament is employed, 
together with the fire to obtain a sulphur or a salt from 
a body, we may well take the freedom to examine, whether 
or no that menstruum do barely help to separate the 
principle obtained by it, or whether there intervene not 
a coalition of the parts of the body wrought upon with 
those of the menstruum, whereby the produced concrete 
may be judged to result from the union of both. And it 
will be farther allowable for us to consider, how far any 
substance, separated by the help of such additaments, 
ought to pass for one of the tria prima ; since by one way 
of handling the same mixt body, it may, according to the 



54 The Sceptical Chymist 

nature of the additaments, and the method of working 
upon it, be made to afford differing substances from those 
obtainable from it by other additaments, and another 
method, nay and (as may appear by what I formerly told 
you about tartar) differing from any of the substances 
into which a concrete is divisible by the fire without 
additaments, though perhaps those additaments do not, 
as ingredients, enter the composition of the obtained body, 
but only diversify the operation of the fire upon the 
concrete; and though that concrete by the fire alone may 
be divided into a number of differing substances, as great 
as any of the chymists, that I have met with, teach us 
that of the elements to be. And having said thus much 
(saies Carneades) to the objection likely to be proposed 
by some chymists, I am now to examine that which I 
foresee will be confidently pressed by divers peripateticks, 
who, to prove fire to be the true analyser of bodies, will 
plead, that it is the very definition of heat given by 
Aristotle, and generally received, congregare homogenea, 
et heterogenea segregare, to assemble things of a 
resembling, and disjoyn those of a differing nature. To 
this I answer, that this effect is far from being so essential 
to heat, as 'tis generally imagined; for it rather seems, 
that the true and genuine property of heat is, to set a 
moving, and thereby to dissociate the parts of bodies, 
and subdivide them into minute particles, without regard 
to their being homogeneous or heterogeneous, as is 
apparent in the boyling of water, the distillation of quick- 
silver, or the exposing of bodies to the action of the fire, 
whose parts either are not (at least in that degree of heat 
appear not) dissimilar, where, all that the fire can do, is 
to divide the body into very minute parts which are of 
the same nature with one another, and with their totum, 
as their reduction by condensation evinces. And even 
when the fire seems most so congregare homogenea, et 
segregare heterogenea, it produces that effect but by 
accident; for the fire does but dissolve the cement, or 
rather shatter the frame, or structure that kept the 
heterogeneous parts of bodies together, under one common 
form; upon which dissolution the component particles 



The Sceptical Chymist 55 

of the mixt, being freed and set at liberty, do naturally, 
and oftentimes without any operation of the fire, associate 
themselves each with its like, or rather do take those 
places which their several degrees of gravity and levity, 
fixedness or volatility (either natural, or adventitious 
from the impression of the fire) assigne them. Thus in 
the distillation (for instance) of man's blood, the fire does 
first begin to dissolve the nexus or cement of the body; 
and then the water, being the most volatile, and easy to 
be extracted, is either by the igneous atomes, or the 
agitation they are put into by the fife, lirst "carried up, 
till forsaken by what carried it up, its weight sinks it 
down, into the receiver: but all this while the other 
principles of the concrete remain unsevered, and require 
a stronger degree of heat to make a separation of its 
more fixt elements; and therefore the fire must be 
increased which carries over the volatile salt and the 
spirit, they being, though believed to be differing principles, 
and though really of different consistency, yet of an 
almost equal volatility. After them, as less fugitive, 
comes over the oyl, and leaves behinde the earth and the 
alcali, which being of an equal fixednesse, the fire severs 
them not, for all the definition of the schools. And if 
into a red-hot earthen or iron retort you cast the matter 
to be distilled, you may observe, as I have often done, 
that the predominant fire will carry up all the volatile 
elements confusedly in one fume, which will afterwards 
take their places in the receiver, either according to the 
degree of their gravity, or according to the exigency of 
their respective textures; the salt adhering, for the most 
part, to the sides and top, and the phlegme fastening 
itself there too in great drops, the oyle and spirit placing 
themselves under, or above one another, according as 
their ponderousness makes them swim or sink. For 'tis 
observable, that though oyl or liquid sulphur be one of the 
elements separated by this fiery analysis, yet the heat 
which accidentally unites the particles of the other volatile 
principles, has not alwayes the same operation on this, 
there being divers bodies which yield two oyls, whereof the 
one sinks to the bottom of that spirit on which the other 



56 The Sceptical Chymist 

swims; as I can shew you in some oyls of the same deers 
blood, which are yet by me; nay I can shew you two oyls 
carefully made of the same parcel of humane blood, which 
not only differ extreamly in colour, but swim upon one 
another without mixture, and if by agitation confounded 
will of themselves divorce again. 

And that the fire doth oftentimes divide bodies, upon 
the account that some of their parts are more fixt, and 
some more volatile, how far soever either of these two 
may be from a pure elementary nature is obvious enough, 
if men would but heed it in the burning of wood, which 
the fire dissipates into smoake and ashes : for not only the 
latter of these is confessedly made up of two such differing 
bodies as earth and salt; but the former being condensed 
into that soot which adheres to our chimneys, discovers 
itself to contain both salt and oyl, and spirit and earth, 
(and some portion of phlegme too) which being, all almost, 
equally volatile to that degree of fire which forces them 
up, (the more volatile parts helping perhaps, as well as the 
urgency of the fire, to carry up the more fixt ones, as I 
have often tried in dulcified colcothar, sublimed by sal 
amoniack blended with it) are carried up together, but 
may afterwards be separated by other degrees of fire, 
whose orderly gradation allowes the disparity of their 
volatileness to discover itself. Besides, if differing bodies 
/ united into one mass be both sufficiently fixt, the fire 
finding no parts volatile enough to be expelled or carried 
up, makes no separation at all; as may appear by a 
mixture of colliquated silver and gold, whose component 
metals may be easily severed by aqua fortis, or aqua regis 
(according to the predominancy of the silver or the gold) 
but in the fire alone, though vehement, the metals remain 
unsevered, the fire only dividing the body into smaller 
particles (whose littleness may be argued from their 
fluidity) in which either the little nimble atoms of fire, 
or its brisk and numberless strokes upon the vessels, 
hinder rest and continuity, without any sequestration 
of elementary principles. Moreover, the fire sometimes 
does not separate, so much as unite, bodies of a differing 
nature; provided they be of an almost resembling fixed- 



The Sceptical Chymist 57 

ness, and have in the figure of their parts an aptness to 
coalition, as we see in the making of many plaisters, 
oyntments, etc. And in such metalline mixtures as that 
made by melting together two parts of clean brass with 
one of pure copper, of which some ingenious tradesmen 
cast such curious patterns (for gold and silver works) as 
I have sometimes taken great pleasure to look upon. 
Sometimes the bodies mingeld by the fire are differing 
enough as to fixidity and volatility, and yet are so com- 
bined by the first operation of the fire, that itself does 
scarce afterwards separate them, but only pulverise them ; 
whereof an instance is afforded us by the common prepara- 
tion of mercurius dulcis, where the saline particles of the 
vitriol, sea salt, and sometimes nitre, employed to make 
the sublimate, do so unite themselves with the mercurial 
particles made use of, first to make sublimate, and then 
to dulcifie it, that the saline and metalline parts arise 
together in many successive sublimations, as if they all 
made but one body. And sometimes too the fire does 
not only not sever the differing elements of a body, but 
combine them so firmly, that nature herself does very 
seldom, if ever, make unions less dissoluble. For the fire 
meeting with some bodies exceedingly and almost equally 
fixt, instead of making a separation, makes an union so 
strict, that itself, alone, is unable to dissolve it; as we see, 
when an alcalisate salt and the terrestrial residue of the 
ashes are incorporated with pure sand, and by vitrification 
made one permanent body (I mean the course or greenish 
sort of glass) that mocks the greatest violence of the fire, 
which though able to marry the ingredients of it, yet is 
not able to divorce them. I can shew you some pieces 
of glass which I saw flow down from an earthen crucible 
purposely exposed for a good while, with silver in it, to 
a very vehement fire. And some that deal much in the 
fusion of metals informe me, that the melting of a great 
part of a crucible into glass is no great wonder in their 
furnaces. I remember I have observed too in the melting 
of great quantities of iron out of the oar, by the help of 
store of charcoal (for they affirm that sea-coal will not 
yield a flame strong enough) that by the prodigious 



58 The Sceptical Chymist 

vehemence of the fire, excited by vast bellows (made to 
play by great wheels turned about by water) part of the 
materials exposed to it was, instead of being analysed, 
colliquated, and turned into a dark, solid and very 
ponderous glass, and that in such quantity, that in some 
places I have seen the very highwayes, neer such iron- 
works, mended with heaps of such lumps of glasse, instead 
of stones and gravel. And I have also observed, that 
some kind of fire-stone itself, having been employed in 
furnaces wherein it was exposed to very strong and lasting 
fires, has had all its fixt parts so wrought on by the fire. 
as to be perfectly vitrified, which I have tried by forcing 
from it pretty large pieces of perfect and transparent 
glass. And lest you might think, Eleutherius, that the 
questioned definition of heat may be demonstrated, by 
the definition which is wont to be given and acquiesced 
in, of its contrary quality, cold, whose property is taught 
to be tarn honogenea, quam heterogenea congregare, give 
me leave to represent to you, that neither is this definition 
unquestionable; for not to mention the exceptions, which 
a logician, as such, may take at it, I consider that the 
union of heterogeneous bodies which is supposed to be 
the genuine production of cold, is not performed by every 
degree of cold. For we see for instance that in the urine 
of healthy men, when the liquor has been suffered a while 
to stand, the cold makes a separation of the thinner part 
from the grosser, which subsides to the bottom, and 
growes opacous there; whereas if the urinal be warme, 
these parts readily mingle again, and the whole liquor 
becomes transparent as before. And when, by glaciation, 
wood, straw, dust, water, etc. are supposed to be united 
into one lump of ice, the cold does not cause any real 
union or adunation (if I may so speak) of these bodies, 
but only hardening the aqueous parts of the liquor into 
ice, the other bodies being accidentally present in that 
liquor are frozen up in it, but not really united. And 
accordingly if we expose a heap of mony consisting of 
gold, silver and copper coynes, or any other bodies of 
differing natures, which are destitute of aqueous moisture, 
capable of congelation, to never so intense a cold, we find 



The Sceptical Chymist 59 

not that these differing bodies are at all thereby so much 
as compacted, much less united together; and even in 
liquors themselves we find phsenomena which induce us 
to question the definition which we are examining. If 
Paracelsus his authority were to be looked upon as a 
sufficient proof in matters of this nature, I might here 
insist on that process of his, whereby he teaches that the 
essence of wine may be severed from the phlegme and 
ignoble part by the assistance of congelation: and because 
much weight has been laid upon this process, not only by 
Paracelsians, but other writers, some of whom seem not 
to have perused it themselves, I shall give you the entire 
passage in the author's own words, as I lately found them 
in the sixth book of his Archidoxis, an extract whereof 
I have yet about me; and it sounds thus. " De vino 
sciendum est, faecem phlegmaque ejus esse mineram, et 
vini substantiam esse corpus in quo conservatur essentia, 
prout auri in auro latet essentia. Juxta quod practicam 
nobis ad memoriam ponimus, ut non obliviscamur, ad 
hunc modum: recipe vinum vetustissimum et optimum 
quod hahere poteris, calore saporeque ad placitum, hoc 
in vas vitreum infundas ut tertiam ejus partem impleat, 
et sigillo hermetis occlusum in equino ventre mensibus 
quatuor, et in continuato calore teneatur qui non deficiat. 
Quo peracto, hyeme cum frigus et gelu maxime saeviunt, 
his per mensem exponatur ut congeletur. Ad hunc 
modum frigus vini spiritum una cum ejus substantia 
protrudit in vini centrum, ac separat a phlegmate : conge- 
la turn abjice, quod vero congelatum non est, id spiritum 
cum substantia esse judicato. Hunc in pelicanum 
positum in arenas digestione non adeo calida per aliquod 
tempus manere sinito; postmodum eximito vini magis- 
terium, de quo locuti sumus." 

But I dare not Eleu. lay much weight upon this 
process, because I have found that if it were true, it would 
be but seldom practicable in this countrey upon the best 
wine: for though this present winter hath been extra- 
ordinary cold, yet in very keen frosts accompanied with 
lasting snowes, I have not been able in any measure to 
freez a thin vial full of sack; and even with snow and 



60 The Sceptical Chymist 

salt I could freeze little more than the surface of it; and 
I suppose Eleu. that 'tis not every degree of cold 
that is capable of congealing liquors, which is able to 
make such an analysis (if I may so call it) of them by 
separating their aqueous and spirituous parts ; for I have 
sometimes, though not often, frozen severally, red-wine, 
urine and milk, but could not observe the expected 
separation. And the Dutchmen that were forced to 
winter in that icie region neer the artick circle, called 
Nova Zembla, although they relate, as we shall see below, 
that there was a separation of parts made in their frozen 
beer about the middle of November, yet of the freezing 
of their sack in December following they give but this 
account: " Yea and our sack, which is so hot, was frozen 
very hard, so that when we were every man to have his 
part, we were forced to melt it in the fire; which we 
shared every second day, about half a pinte for a man, 
wherewith we were forced to sustain ourselves." In 
which words they imply not, that their sack was divided 
by the frost into differing substances, after such manner 
as their beer had been. All which notwithstanding, 
Eleu. suppose that it may be made to appear, that 
even cold sometimes may congregare homogenea, et 
heteroghnea segregare: and to manifest this I may tell 
you, that I did once, purposely, cause to be decocted in 
fair water a plant abounding with sulphureous and 
spirituous parts, and having exposed the decoction to a 
keen north-wind in a very frosty night, I observed, that the 
more aqueous parts of it were turned by the next morning 
into ice, towards the innermost part of which, the more 
agile and spirituous parts, as I then conjectured, having 
retreated, to shun as much as might be their environing 
enemy, they had there preserved themselves unfrozen in 
the form of a high coloured liquor; the aqueous and 
spirituous parts having been so slightly (blended rather 
than) united in the decoction, that they were easily 
separable by such a degree of cold, as would not have been 
able to have divorced the parts of urine or wine, which 
by fermentation or digestion are wont, as tryal has in- 
formed me, to be more intimately associated each with 



The Sceptical Chymist 61 

other. But I have already intimated, Eleutherius, that 
I shall not insist on this experiment, not only because, 
having made it but once I may possibly have been mis- 
taken in it; but also (and that principally) because of that 
much more full and eminent experiment of the separative 
vertue of extream cold, that was made, against their wills, 
by the forementioned Dutchmen that wintered in Nova 
Zembla; the relation of whose voyage being a very scarce 
book, it will not be amiss to give you that memorable 
part of it which concerns our present theme, as I caused 
the passage to be extracted out of the Englished voyage 
itself. 

" Gerard de Veer, John Cornelyson and others, sent out 
of Amsterdam, anno dom. 1596, being forced by unseason- 
able weather to winter in Nova Zembla, near Ice-Haven; 
on the thirteenth of October, three of us (saies the relation) 
went aboard the ship, and laded a sled with beer; but 
when we had laden it, thinking to go to our house with 
it, suddenly there arose such a winde, and so great a storm 
and cold, that we were forced to go into the ship again, 
because we were not able to stay without; and we could 
not get the beer into the ship again, but were forced to let 
it stand without upon the sled: the fourteenth, as we 
came out of the ship, we found the barrel of beer standing 
upon the sled, but it was fast frozen at the heads; yet by 
reason of the great cold, the beer that purged out, froze 
as hard upon the side of the barrel, as if it had been glued 
thereon: and in that sort we drew it to our house, and set 
the barrel on end, and drank it up; but first we were 
forced to melt the beer, for there was scarce any unfrozen 
beer in the barrel; but in that thick yeast that was 
unfrozen, lay the strength of the beer, so that it was too 
strong to drink alone, and that which was frozen tasted 
like water; and being melted we mixed one with the 
other, and so drank it; but it had neither strength not 
taste." 

And on this occasion I remember, that having the last 
very sharp winter purposely tried to freeze, among other 
liquors, some beer moderately strong, in glass vessels, 
with snow and salt, I observed, that there came out of the 



62 The Sceptical Chymist 

neck a certain thick substance, which, it seems, was much 
better able than the rest of the liquor (that I found turned 
into ice) to resist a frost; and which, by its colour and 
consistence seemed manifestly enough to be yeast, whereat, 
I confess, I somewhat marvelled, because I did not either 
discerne by the taste, or find by enquiry, that the beer 
was at all too new to be very fit to be drank. I might 
confirm the Dutchmen's relation, by what happened 
a while since to a neere friend of mine, who complained to 
me, that having brewed some beer or ale for his own 
drinking in Holland (where he then dwelt) the keenness 
of the late bitter winter froze the drink so as to reduce it 
into ice, and a small proportion of a very strong and 
spirituous liquor. But I must not entertaine you any 
longer concerning cold, not onely because you may think 
I have but lost my way into a theme which does not 
directly belong to my present undertaking; but because 
I have already enlarged myself too much upon the first 
consideration I proposed, though it appears so much 
a paradox, that it seemed to require that I should say 
much to keep it from being thought a meer extravagance; 
yet since I undertook but to make the common assumption 
of our chymists and Aristotelians appear questionable, 
I hope I have so performed that task, that I may now 
proceed to my following considerations, and insist less 
on them than I have done on the first. 



THE SECOND PART 

THE second consideration I desire to have notice taken of, 
is this; That it is not so sure, as both chymists and 
Aristotelians are wont to think it, that every seemingly 
similar or distinct substance that is separated from a body 
by the help of the fire, was pre-existent in it as a principle 
or element of it. 

That I may not make this paradox a greater than 
I needs must, I will first briefly explain what the proposi- 
tion means, before I proceed to argue for it. 

And I suppose you will easily believe that I do not 
mean that anything is separable from a body by fire, 
that was not materially pre-existent in it; for it far 
exceeds the power of meerly naturall agents, and conse- 
quently of the fire, to produce anew, ^5p much as one 
atome of matte?? which they can but modifie and alter, 
not create; which is so obvious a truth, that almost all 
sects of philosophers have denied the power of producing 
matter to second causes; and the Epicureans and some 
others have done the like, in reference to their gods 
themselves. 

Nor does the proposition peremptorily deny, but that 
some things obtained by the fire from a mixt body, may 
have been more than barely materially pre-existent in it, 
since there are concretes, which before they be exposed 
to the fire afford us several documents of their abounding, 
some with salt, and others with sulphur. For it will 
serve the present turn, if it appear that diverse things 
obtained from a mixt body exposed to the fire, were not 
its ingredients before: for if this be made to appear, it 
will be rationall enough to suspect that chymists may 
deceive themselves, and others, in concluding resolutely 
and universally, those substances to be the elementary 
ingredients of bodies barely separated by the fire, of which 
it yet may be doubted, whether there be such or no; at 

63 



64 The Sceptical Chymist 

least till some other argument, than that drawn from the 
analysis, be brought to resolve the doubt, 
i?;!; That then which I mean by the proposition I am 
explaining, is, that it may without absurdity be doubted 
whether or no the differing substances obtainable from 
a concrete dissipated by the fire were so existent in it in 
that forme (at least as to their minute parts) wherein 
we find them when the analysis is over, that the fire did 

s only disjoyne and extricate the corpuscles of one principle 
from those of the other wherewith before they were 
blended. 

Having thus explained my proposition, I shall 
endeavour to do two things, to prove it; the first of which 
is to shew that such substances as chymists call principles 
may be produced de novo (as they speak). And the other 
is to make it probable, that by the fire we may actually 
obtain from some mixt bodies such substances, as were 
not in the newly expounded sence, pre-existent in them. 
To begin then with the first of these, I consider that 
if it be as true, as 'tis probable, that compounded bodies 
differ from one another but in the various textures result- 

' ing from the bigness, shape, motion, and contrivance of 
their small parts, it will not be irrational to conceive that 
one and the same parcel of the universall matter may by 
various alterations and contextures be brought to deserve 
the name, sometimes of a sulphureous, and sometimes 
of a terrene, or aqueous body. And this I could more 
largely explicate, but that our friend Mr. Boyle has 
promised us something about qualities, wherein the theme 
I now willingly resign him, will I question not be 
studiously enquired into. Wherefore what I shall now 
advance in favour of what I have lately delivered shall 
be deduced from experiments made divers years since. 
The first of which would have been much more consider- 
able, but that by some intervening accidents I was neces- 
sitated to lose the best time of the year, for a trial of the 
nature of that I designed; it being about the middle of 
May before I was able to begin an experiment which 
should have then been two moneths old; but such as it 
was, it will not perhaps be impertinent to give you this 



The Sceptical Chymist 65 

narrative of it. At the time newly mentioned, I caused 
my gardiner (being by urgent occasions hindered from 
being present myself) to dig out a convenient quantity 
of good earth, and dry it well in an oven, to weigh it, to 
put it in an earthen pot almost level with the surface of 
the ground, and to set in it a selected seed he had before 
received from me, for that purpose, of squash, which is 
an Indian kind of pompion, that growes apace ; this seed 
I ordered him to water only with rain or spring water. 
I did not (when my occasions permitted me to visit it) 
without delight behold how fast it grew, though unseason- 
ably sown; but the hastning winter hindered it from 
attaining anything neer its due and wonted magnitude; 
(for I found the same autumn, in my garden, some of 
those plants, by measure, as big about as my middle) 
and made me order the having it taken up; which about 
the middle of October was carefully done by the same 
gardiner, who a while after sent me this account of it: 
" I have weighed the pompion with the stalk and leaves, 
all which weighed three pound wanting a quarter; then 
I took the earth, baked it as formerly, and found it just 
as much as I did at first, which made me think I had not 
dried it sufficiently: then I put it into the oven twice 
more, after the bread was drawn, and weighed it the 
second time, but found it shrink little or nothing." 

But to deal candidly with you, Eleutherius, I must not 
conceal from you the event of another experiment of this 
kind made this present summer, wherein the earth seems 
to have been much more wasted; as may appear by the 
following account, lately sent me by the same gardiner, 
in these words. " To give you an account of your 
cucumbers, I have gained two indifferent fair ones, the 
weight of them is ten pound and a halfe, the branches 
with the roots weighed four pounds wanting two ounces; 
and when I had weighed them I took the earth, and baked 
it in several small earthen dishes in an oven; and when I 
had so done, I found the earth wanted a pound and a halfe 
of what it was formerly; yet I was not satisfied, doubting 
the earth was not dry: I put it into an oven the second 
time, (after the bread was drawn) and after I had taken 

E 



66 The Sceptical Chymist 

it out and weighed it, I found it to be the same weight. 
So I suppose there was no moisture left in the earth. 
Neither do I think that the pound and half that was 
wanting was drawn away by the cucumber but a great 
part of it in the ordering was in dust (and the like) wasted : 
(the cucumbers are kept by themselves, lest you should 
send for them "). But yet in this tryal, Eleutherius, it 
appears that though some of the earth, or rather the 
dissoluble salt harboured in it, were wasted, the main 
body of the plant consisted of transmuted water. And 
I might add, that a year after I caused the formerly 
mentioned experiment, touching large pompions, to be 
reiterated, with so good success, that if my memory does 
not much misinform me, it did not only much surpass 
many that I made before, but seemed strangely to con- 
clude what I am pleading for; though (by reason I have 
unhappily lost the particular account my gardiner writ 
me up of the circumstances) I dare not insist upon them. 
The like experiment may be as conveniently tried with the 
seeds of any plant, whose growth is hasty, and its size 
bulky. If tobacco will in these cold climates grow well 
in earth undunged, it would not be amiss to make a tryal 
with it; for 'tis an annual plant, that arises where it 
prospers, sometimes as high as a tall man, and I have had 
leaves of it in my garden neer a foot and a halfe broad. 
But the next time I try this experiment, it shall be with 
several seeds of the same sort, in the same pot of earth, 
that so the event may be the more conspicuous. But 
because everybody has not conveniency of time and 
place for this experiment neither, I made in my chamber, 
some shorter and more expeditious tryals. I took a top 
of spearmint, about an inch long, and put it into a good 
vial full of spring water, so as the upper part of the mint was 
above the neck of the glass, and the lower part immersed 
in the water; within a few dayes this mint began to shoot 
forth roots into the water, and to display its leaves, and 
aspire upwards; and in a short time it had numerous 
roots and leaves, and these very strong and fragrant of 
the odour of the mint, but the heat of my chamber, as I 
suppose, killed the plant when it was grown to have a 



The Sceptical Chymist 67 

pretty thick stalk, which with the various and ramified 
roots, which it shot into the water as if it had been earth, 
presented in its transparent flower-pot a spectacle not 
unpleasant to behold. The like I tried with sweet 
marjoram, and I found the experiment succeed also, 
though somewhat more slowly, with balm and peniroyal, 
to name now no other plants. And one of these vege- 
tables, cherished only by water, having obtained a 
competent growth, I did, for tryals sake, cause to be 
distilled in a small retort, and thereby obtained some 
phlegme, a little empyreumaticall spirit, a small quantity 
of adult oyl, and a caput mortuum; which appearing 
to be a coal, I concluded it to consist of salt and earth: 
but the quantity of it was so small, that I forbore to 
calcine it. The water I used to nourish this plant was 
not shifted nor renewed; and I chose spring- water rather 
than rain-water, because the latter is more discernably 
a kind of Travo-wc/opa, which, though it be granted to be 
freed from grosser mixtures, seems yet to contain in it, 
besides the steams of several bodies wandering in the air, 
which may be supposed to impregnate it, a certain 
spirituous substance, which may be extracted out of it, 
and is by some mistaken for the spirit of the world cor- 
porifyed, upon what grounds, and with what probability, 
I may elsewhere perchance, but must not now, discourse 
to you. 

But perhaps I might have saved a great part of my 
labour. For I finde that Helmont (an author more 
considerable for his experiments than many learned men 
are pleased to think him) having had an opportunity 
to prosecute an experiment much of the same nature 
with those I have been now speaking of, for five years 
together, obtained at the end of that time so notable 
a quantity of transmuted water, that I should scarce 
think it fit to have his experiment and mine mentioned 
together, were it not that the length of time requisite to 
this may deterr the curiosity of some, and exceed the 
leasure of others ; and partly, that so paradoxical a truth 
as that which these experiments seem to hold forth, need 
to be confirmed by more witnesses than one, especially 



68 The Sceptical Chymist 

since the extravagancies and untruths to be met with 
in Helmont's treatise of the Magnetick Cure of Wounds, 
have made his testimonies suspected in his other writings, 
though as to some of the unlikely matters of fact he 
delivers in them, I might safely undertake to be his 
compurgator. But that experiment of his which I was 
mentioning to you, he saies, was this. He took 200 pound 
of earth dried in an oven, and having put it into an 
earthen vessel and moistened it with rain water, he 
planted in it the trunk of a willow tree of five pound 
weight; this he watered, as need required, with rain or 
with distilled water; and to keep the neighbouring earth 
from getting into the vessel, he employed a plate of iron 
tinned over and perforated with many holes. Five years 
being efHuxed, he took out the tree and weighed it, and 
(with computing the leaves that fell during four autumnes) 
he found it to weigh 169 pound, and about three ounces. 
And having again dried the earth it grew in, he found it 
want of its former weight of 200 pound, about a couple 
only of ounces; so that 164 pound of the roots, wood, 
and bark, which constituted the tree, seem to have sprung 
from the water. And though it appears not that Helmont 
had the curiosity to make any analysis of this plant, 
yet what I lately told you I did to one of the vegetables 
I nourished with water only, will I suppose keep you 
from doubting that if he had distilled this tree, it would 
have afforded him the like distinct substances as another 
vegetable of the same kind. I need not subjoyne that 
I had it also in my thoughts to try how experiments to the 
same purpose with those I related to you would succeed 
in other bodies than vegetables, because importunate 
avocations having hitherto hindered me from putting my 
design in practice, I can yet speak but conjecturally of 
the success : but the best is, that the experiments already 
made and mentioned to you need not the assistance of 
new ones, to verifie as much as my present task makes it 
concern me to prove by experiments of this nature. 

One would suspect (saies Eleutherius after his long 
silence) by what you have been discoursing, that you are 
not far from Helmont's opinion about the origination of 



The Sceptical Chymist 69 

compound bodies, and perhaps too dislike not the argu- 
ments which he imploys to prove it. 

What Helmontian opinion, and what arguments do 
you mean (askes Carneades). 

What you have been newly discoursing (replies Eleu- 
therius) tells us, that you cannot but know that this bold 
and acute spagyrist scruples not to assert that all mixt 
bodies spring from one element; and that vegetables, 
animals, marchasites, stones, metalls, etc. are materially 
but simple water disguised into these various formes, by 
the plastick or formative vertue of their seeds. And as 
for his reasons you may find divers of them scattered up 
and down his writings; the considerablest of which seem 
to be these three; The ultimate reduction of mixt bodies 
into insipid water, the vicissitude of the supposed elements, 
and the production of perfectly mixt bodies out of simple 
water. And first he affirmes that the sal circulatus 
Paracelsi, or his liquor alkahest, does adequately resolve 
plants, animals, and mineralls into one liquor or more, 
according to their several internall disparities of parts, 
(without caput mortuum, or the destruction of their 
seminal vertues;) and that the alkahest being abstracted 
from these liquors in the same weight and vertue where- 
with it dissolved them, the liquors may by frequent 
cohobations from chalke or some other idoneous matter, 
be totally deprived of their seminal endowments, and 
return at last to their first matter, insipid water; some 
other wayes he proposes here and there to divest some 
particular bodies of their borrowed shapes, and make 
them remigrate to their first simplicity. The second 
topick whence Helmont drawes his arguments, to prove 
water to be the material cause of mixt bodies, I told you 
was this, that the other supposed elements may be trans- 
muted into one another. But the experiments by him 
here and there produced on this occasion, are so uneasie 
to be made and to be judged of, that I shall not insist on 
them; not to mention, that if they were granted to be 
true, his inference from them is somewhat disputable; 
and therefore I shall pass on to tell you, that as, in his 
first argument, our paradoxical author endeavours to 



70 The Sceptical Chymist 

prove water the sole element of mixt bodies, by their 
ultimate resolution, when by his alkahest, or some other 
conquering agent, the seeds have been destroyed, which 
disguised them; or when by time those seeds are wearied, 
or exantlated, or unable to act their parts upon the stage 
of the universe any longer: so in his third argument he 
endeavours to evince the same conclusion, by the con- 
stitution of bodies which he asserts to be nothing but 
water subdued by seminal vertues. Of this he gives here 
and there in his writings several instances, as to plants 
and animals; but divers of them being difficult either to 
be tried or to be understood, and others of them being 
not altogether unobnoxious to exceptions, I think you 
have singled out the principal and less questionable 
experiment when you lately mentioned, that of the willow 
tree. And having thus, continues Eleutherius, to answer 
your question, given you a summary account of what I 
am confident, you know better than I do, I shall be very 
glad to receive your sence of it, if the giving it me will not 
too much divert you from the prosecution of your 
discourse. 

That if (replies Carneades) was not needlessly annexed : 
for thorowly to examine such an hypothesis and such 
arguments would require so many considerations, and 
consequently so much time, that I should not now have 
the leasure to perfect such a digression, and much less to 
finish my principal discourse. Yet thus much I shall tell 
you at present, that you need not fear my rejecting this 
opinion for its novelty; since, however the Helmontians 
may in complement to their master pretend it to be a new 
discovery, yet though the arguments be for the most part 
his, the opinion itself is very antient: for Diogenes 
Laertius and divers other authors speak of Thales, as the 
first among the Graecians that made disquisitions upon 
nature. And of this Thales, I remember, Tully informs 
us, that he taught all things were at first made of water. 
And it seems by Plutarch and Justin Martyr, that the 
opinion was ancienter than he: for they tell us that he 
used to defend his tenent by the testimony of Homer. 



The Sceptical Chymist 71 

And a Greek author, the (Scholiast of Apollonius) upon 
these words 



The earth of slime was made, 

affirms, (out of Zeno) that the chaos, whereof all things 
were made, was, according to Hesiod, water; which, 
setling first, became slime, and then condensed into solid 
earth. And the same opinion about the generation of 
slime seems to have been entertained by Orpheus, out of 
whom one of the antients cites this testimony, 

'Ex TOV vSariD IXvs AcaresTf. 
Of water slime was made. 

It seems also by what is delivered in Strabo out of another 
author concerning the Indians, that they likewise held 
that all things had differing beginnings, but that of which 
the world was made, was water. And the like opinion 
has been by some of the antients ascribed to the 
Phoenicians, from whom Thales himself is conceived to 
have borrowed it; as probably the Greeks did much of 
theologie, and, as I am apt to think, of their philosophy 
too; since the devising of the atomical hypothesis com- 
monly ascribed to Leucippus and his disciple Democritus, 
is by learned men attributed to one Moschus a Phoenician. 
And possibly the opinion is yet antienter than so; for 
'tis known that the Phoenicians borrowed most of their 
learning from the Hebrews. And among those that ac- 
knowledge the Books of Moses, many have been inclined to 
think water to have been the primitive and universal 
matter, by perusing the beginning of Genesis, where the 
waters seem to be mentioned as the material cause, not 
only of sublunary compound bodies, but of all those that 
make up the universe; whose component parts did 
orderly, as it were, emerge out of that vast abysse, by 
the operation of the Spirit of God, who is said to have 
been moving Himself, as hatching females do (as the 
original, Merahephet, is said to import, and it seems 



72 The Sceptical Chymist 

to signifie in one of the two other places, wherein alone 
I have met with it in the Hebrew Bible) upon the 
face of the waters; which being, as may be supposed, 
divinely impregnated with the seeds of all things, were 
by that productive incubation qualified to produce them. 
But you, I presume, expect that I should discourse of 
this matter like a naturalist, not a philologer. Wherefore 
I shall add, to countenance Helmont's opinion, that 
whereas he gives not, that I remember, any instance of 
{/any mineral body, nor scarce of any animal, generated 
of water, a French chymist, Monsieur de Rochas, has 
presented his readers an experiment, which if it were 
punctually such as he has delivered it, is very notable. 
He then, discoursing of the generation of things according 
to certain chymical and metaphorical notions (which I 
confess are not to me intelligible) sets down, among 
divers speculations not pertinent to our subject, the 
following narrative, which I shall repeat to you the sence 
of in English, with as little variation from the literal sence 
of the French words, as my memory will enable me. 
" Having (saies he) discerned such great wonders by the 
natural operation of water, I would know what may be 
done with it by art imitating nature. Wherefore I took 
water which I well knew not to be compounded, nor to be 
mixed with any other thing than that spirit of life 
(whereof he had spoken before) and with a heat artificial, 
continual and proportionate, I prepared and disposed 
it by the above-mentioned graduations of coagulation, 
congelation, and fixation, untill it was turned into earth, 
which earth produced animals, vegetables and minerals. 
I tell not what animals, vegetables and minerals, for that 
is reserved for another occasion: but the animals did 
move of themselves, eat, etc. and by the true anatomic 
I made of them, I found that they were composed of much 
sulphur, little mercury, and less salt. The minerals 
began to grow and increase by converting into their own 
nature one part of the earth thereunto disposed; they 
were solid and heavy. And by this truly demonstrative 
science, namely chymistry, I found that they were com- 
posed of much salt, little sulphur, and less mercury. 



The Sceptical Chymist 73 

But (sales Carneades) I have some suspitions concerning 
this strange relation, which make me unwilling to declare 
an opinion of it, unless I were satisfied concerning divers 
material circumstances that our author has left un- 
mentioned; though as for the generation of living 
creatures, both vegetable and sensitive, it needs not seem 
incredible, since we find that our common water (which 
indeed is often impregnated with variety of seminal 
principles and rudiments) being long kept in a quiet place 
will putrifie and stink, and then perhaps too produce moss 
and little worms, or other insects, according to the nature 
of the seeds that were lurking in it. I must likewise 
desire you to take notice, that as Helmont gives us no 
instance of the production of minerals out of water, so 
the main argument that he employs to prove that they , 
and other bodies may be resolved into water, is drawn 
from the operations of his alkahest, and consequently 
cannot be satisfactorily examined by you and me. 

Yet certainly (saies Eleutherius) you cannot but have 
somewhat wondered as well as I, to observe how great 
a share of water goes to the making up of divers bodies, 
whose disguises promise nothing neer so much. The 
distillation of eeles, though it yielded me some oyle, and 
spirit, and volatile salt, besides the caput mortuum, yet 
were all these so disproportionate to the phlegm that came 
from them, (and in which at first they boyled as in a pot 
of water) that they seemed to have bin nothing but 
coagulated phlegm, which does likewise strangely abound 
in vipers, though they are esteemed very hot in operation, 
and will in a convenient air survive some dayes the loss 
of their heads and hearts, so vigorous is their vivacity. 
Mans bloud itself as spirituous, and as elaborate a liquor 
as 'tis reputed, does so abound in phlegm, that, the other 
da)', distilling some of it on purpose to try the experiment 
(as I had formerly done in deers bloud) out of about seven 
ounces and a halfe of pure bloud we drew neere six ounces 
of phlegm, before any of the more operative principles 
began to arise and invite us to change the receiver. And 
to satisfie myself that some of these animall phlegms were 
void enough of spirit to deserve that name, I would not 



74 The Sceptical Chymist 

content myself to taste them only, but fruitlessly poured 
on them acid liquors, to try if they contained any volatile 
salt or spirit, which (had there been any there) would 
probably have discovered itself by making an ebullition 
with the affused liquor. And now I mention corrosive 
spirits, I am minded to inform you, that though they 
seem to be nothing else but fluid salts, yet they abound 
in water, as you may observe, if either you entangle, and 
so fix their saline part, by making them corrode some 
idoneous body, or else if you mortifie it with a contrary 
salt; as I have very manifestly observed in the making 
a medicine somewhat like Helmont's balsamus samech, 
with distilled vinegar instead of spirit of wine, wherewith 
he prepares it : for you would scarce believe (what I have 
lately observed) that of that acid spirit, the salt of tartar, 
from which it is distilled, will by mortifying and retaining 
the acid salt turn into worthless phlegm neere twenty 
times its weight; before it be so fully impregnated as to 
rob no more distilled vinegar of its salt. And though 
spirit of wine exquisitely rectified seem of all liquors to be 
the most free from water, it being so igneous that it will 
flame all away without leaving the least drop behinde 
it, yet even this fiery liquor is by Helmont not improbably 
affirmed, in case what he relates be true, to be materially 
water, under a sulphureous disguise: for, according to 
him, in the making that excellent medicine Paracelsus 
his balsamus samech, (which is nothing but sal tartari 
dulcified by distilling from it spirit of wine till the salt 
be sufficiently glutted with its sulphur, and till it suffer 
the liquor to be drawn off, as strong as it was poured on) 
when the salt of tartar from which it is distilled hath 
retained, or deprived it of the sulphureous parts of the 
spirit of wine, the rest, which is incomparably the greater 
part of the liquor, will remigrate into phlegm. I added 
that clause [in case what he relates be true] because I have 
not as yet sufficiently tried it myself. But not only 
something of experiment keeps me from thinking it, as 
many chymists do, absurd, (though I have as well as they, 
in vain tried it with ordinary salt of tartar) but besides 
that Helmont often relates it, and draws consequences 



The Sceptical Chymist 75 

from it; a person noted for his soberness and skill in 
spagyrical preparations, having been askt by me whether 
the experiment might not be made to succeed, if the salt 
and spirit were prepared according to a way suitable to 
my principles, he affirmed to me, that he had that way 
I proposed made Helmont's experiment succeed very 
well, without adding anything to the salt and spirit. 
But our way is neither short nor easie. 

I have indeed (saies Carneades) sometimes wondered 
to see how much phlegme may be obtained from bodies 
by the fire. But concerning that phlegme I may anon 
have occasion to note something, which I therefore shall 
not now anticipate. But to return to the opinion of 
Thales, and of Helmont, I consider, that supposing the 
alkahest could reduce all bodies into water, yet whether 
that water, because insipid, must be elementary, may not 
groundlesly be doubted; for I remember the candid and 
eloquent Petrus Laurembergius, in his notes upon Sala's 
aphorismes, affirmes that he saw an insipid menstruum 
that was a powerfull dissolvent, and (if my memory does 
not much mis-inform me) could dissolve gold. And the 
water which may be drawn from quicksilver without 
addition, though it be almost tasteless, you will I believe 
think of a differing nature from simple water, especially 
if you digest in it appropriated mineralls. To which I 
shall add but this, that this consideration may be further 
extended. For I see no necessity to conceive that the 
water mentioned in the beginning of Genesis, as the 
universal matter, was simple and elementary water; since 
though we should suppose it to have been an agitated 
congeries or heap consisting of a great variety of seminal 
principles and rudiments, and of other corpuscles fit to be 
subdued and fashioned by them, it might yet be a body 
fluid like water, in case the corpuscles it was made up of, 
were by their creator made small enough, and put into- 
such an actuall motion as might make them glide along 
one another. And as we now say, the sea consists of 
water, (notwithstanding the saline, terrestrial, and other 
bodies mingled with it,) such a liquor may well enough 
be called water, because that was the greatest of the 



j6 The Sceptical Chymist 

known bodies whereunto it was like; though, that a body 
may be fluid enough to appear a liquor, and yet contain 
corpuscles of a very differing nature, you will easily 
believe, if you but expose a good qantity of vitriol in 
a strong vessel to a competent fire. For although it 
contains both aqueous, earthy, saline, sulphureous, and 
metalline corpuscles, yet the whole mass will at first be 
fluid like water, and boyle like a seething pot. 

I might easily (continues Carneades) enlarge myself on 
such considerations, if I were now obliged to give you my 
judgment of the Thalesian, and Helmontian hypothesis. 
But whether or no we conclude that all things were at first 
generated of water, I may deduce from what I have tried 
concerning the growth of vegetables, nourished with 
water, all that I now proposed to myself or need at present 
to prove, namely that salt, spirit, earth, and even oyl 
(though that be thought of all bodies the most opposite 
to water) may be produced out of water; and conse- 
quently that a chymical principle as well as a peripatetick 
.,/ element, may (in some cases) be generated anew, or 
obtained from such a parcel of matter as was not endowed 
with the form of such a principle or element before. 

And having thus, Eleutherius, evinced that 'tis possible 
that such substances as those that chymists are wont to 
call their tria prima, may be generated, anew: I must 
next endeavour to make it probable, that the operation 
of the fire does actually (sometimes) not only divide 
s compounded bodies into small parts, but compound those 
parts after a new manner, whence consequently, for ought 
we know, there may emerge as well saline and sulphureous 
substances, as bodies of other textures. And perhaps it 
will assist us in our enquiry after the effects of the opera- 
tions of the fire upon other bodies, to consider a little, 
what it does to those mixtures which being productions 
of the art of man, we best know the composition of. You 
may then be pleased to take notice that though sope is 
made up by the sope-boylers of oyle or grease, and salt, 
and water diligently incorporated together; yet if you 
expose the mass they constitute to a graduall fire in a 
retort, you shall then indeed make a separation, but not 



The Sceptical Chymist 77 

of the same substances that were united into sope, but of 
others of a distant and yet not an elementary nature, and 
especially of an oyle very sharp and foetid, and of a very 
differing quality from that which was employed to make 
the sope: so, if you mingle in a due proportion, sal 
armoniack with quick-lime, and distill them by degrees 
of fire, you shall not divide the sal armoniack from the 
quick-lime, though the one be a volatile, and the other 
a fixed substance, but that which will ascend will be a 
spirit much more fugitive, penetrant, and stinking, than 
sal armoniack; and there will remain with the quick-lime 
all, or very near all the sea salt, that concurred to make 
up the sal armoniack; concerning which sea salt I shall, 
to satisfie you how well it was united to the lime, informe 
you, that I have by making the fire at length very vehe- 
ment, caused both the ingredients to melt in the retort 
itself into one mass, and such masses are apt to relent in 
the moist air. If it be here objected, that these instances 
are taken from factitious concretes which are more 
compounded than those which nature produces; I shall 
reply, that besides that I have mentioned them as much 
to illustrate what I proposed, as to prove it; it will be 
difficult to evince that nature herself does not make 
decompounded bodies, I mean, mingle together such mixt 
bodies, as are already compounded of elementary, or 
rather of more simple ones. For vitriol (for instance) 
though I have sometimes taken it out of minerall earths, 
where nature had without any assistance of art prepared 
it to my hand, is really, though chymists are pleased to 
reckon it among salts, a decompounded body consisting 
(as I shall have occasion to declare anon) of a terrestriall 
substance, of a metal, and also of at least one saline body, 
of a peculiar, and not elementary nature. And we see 
also in animals, that their blood may be composed of 
divers very differing mixt bodies, since we find it observed 
that divers sea-fowle taste rank of the fish on which they 
ordinarily feed; and Hippocrates himself observes, that 
a child may be purged by the milke of the nurse, if she 
have taken elaterium; which argues that the purging 
corpuscles of the medicament concurr to make up the 



78 The Sceptical Chymist 

milk of the nurse; and that white liquor is generally by 
physitians supposed to be but blanched and altered 
blood. And I remember I have observed, not fair from 
the Alps, that at a certain time of the yeare the butter of 
that country was very offensive to strangers, by reason 
of the rank taste of a certain herb, whereon the cows were 
then wont plentifully to feed. But (proceeds Carneades) 
to give you instances of another kind, to shew that things 
^ may be obtained by the fire from a mixt body that were 
not pre-existent in it, let me remind you, that from many 
vegetables there may without any addition be obtained 
glass, a body, which I presume you will not say was pre- 
existent in it, but produced by the fire. To which I shall 
add but this one example more, namely that by a certain 
artificial way of handling quicksilver, you may without 
addition separate from it at least a 5th or 4th part of clear 
liquor, which with an ordinary peripatetick would pass 
for water, and which a vulgar chymist would not scruple 
to call phlegme, and which, for ought I have yet seen or 
heard, is not reducible into mercury again, and conse- 
quently is more than a disguise of it. Now besides that 
divers chymists will not allow mercury to have any, or at 
least any considerable quantity of either of the ignoble 
ingredients, earth and water; besides this, I say, the great 
ponderousness of quicksilver makes it very unlikely that 
it can have so much water in it as may be thus obtained 
from it, since mercury weighs 12 or 14 times as much as 
water of the same bulk. Nay for a further confirmation 
of this argument, I will add this strange relation, that 
two friends of mine, the one a physitian, and the other 
a mathematician, and both of them persons of unsuspected 
credit, have solemnly assured me, that after many tryals 
they made, to reduce mercury into water, in order to 
a philosophicall work, upon gold (which yet, by the way, 
I know proved unsuccessful!) they did once by divers 
cohobations reduce a pound of quicksilver into almost 
a pound of water, and this without the addition of any 
other substance, but only by pressing the mercury by 
a skilfully managed fire in purposely contrived vessels. 
But of these experiments our friend (saies Carneades, 



The Sceptical Chymist 79 

pointing at the register of this dialogue) will perhaps give 
you a more particular account than it is necessary for 
me to do: since what I have now said may sufficiently 
evince, that the fire may sometimes as well alter bodies 
as divide them,, and by it we may obtain from a mixt body 
what was not pre-existent in it. And how are we sure, 
that in no other body what we call phlegme is barely 
separated, not produced by the action of the fire: since 
so many other mixt bodies are of a much less constant, 
and more alterable nature, than mercury (by many tricks 
it is wont to put upon chymists, and by the experiments 
I told you of, about an hour since) appears to be. But 
because I shall ere long have occasion to resume into 
consideration the power of the fire to produce new con- 
cretes, I shall no longer insist on this argument at present; 
only I must mind you, that if you will not disbelieve 
Helmont's relations, you must confess that the tria prima 
are neither ingenerable nor incorruptible substances; since 
by his alkahest some of them may be produced of bodies 
that were before of another denomination; and by the 
same powerfull menstruum all of them may be reduced 
into insipid water. 

Here Carneades was about to pass on to his third con- 
sideration, when Eleutherius being desirous to hear what 
he could say to clear his second general consideration 
from being repugnant to what he seemed to think the 
true theory of mistion, prevented him by telling him, 
I somewhat wonder, Carneades, that you, who are in so 
many points unsatisfied with the peripatetick opinion 
touching the elements and mixt bodies, should also seem 
averse to that notion touching the manner of mistion, 
wherein the chymists (though perhaps without knowing 
that they do so) agree with most of the antient philoso- 
phers that preceded Aristotle, and that for reasons 
so considerable, that divers modern naturalists and 
physitians, in other things unfavourable enough to the 
spagyrists, do in this case side with them against the 
common opinion of the schools. If you should ask me 
(continues Eleutherius) what reasons I mean? I should 
partly by the writings of Sennertus and other learned men, 



8o The Sceptical Chymist 

and partly by my own thoughts, be supplied with more, 
than 'twere at present proper for me to insist largely on. 
And therefore I shall mention only, and that briefly, three 
or four. Of these, I shall take the first from the state of 
the controversie itself, and the genuine notion of mistion, 
which though much intricated by the schoolmen, I take 
in short to be this. Aristotle, at least as many of his 
interpreters expound him, and as indeed he teaches in 
some places, where he professedly dissents from the 
antients, declares mistion to be such a mutual penetration, 
and perfect union of the mingled elements, that there is 
no portion of the mixt body, how minute soever, which 
does not contain all, and every of the four elements, or 
in which, if you please, all the elements are not. And I 
remember, that he reprehends the mistion taught by the 
ancients, as too slight or gross, for this reason, that bodies 
mixt according to their hypothesis, though they appear 
to humane eyes, would not appear such to the acute eyes 
of a lynx, whose perfecter sight would discerne the 
elements, if they were no otherwise mingled, than as his 
predecessors would have it, to be but blended, not united ; 
whereas the antients, though they did not all agree about 
what kind of bodies were mixt, yet they did almost 
unanimously hold, that in a compounded bodie, though 
the miscibiUa, whether elements, principles, or whatever 
they pleased to call them, were associated in such small 
parts, and with so much exactness, that there was no 
sensible part of the mass but seemed to be of the same 
nature with the rest, and with the whole; yet as to the 
atomes, or other insensible parcels of matter, whereof 
each of the miscibilia consisted, they retained each of 
them its own nature, being but by apposition or juxta- 
position united with the rest into one bodie. So that 
although by vertue of this composition the mixt body 
did perhaps obtain divers new qualities, yet still the 
ingredients that compounded it, retaining their own 
nature, were by the destruction of the compositum 
separable from each other, the minute parts disingaged 
from those of a differing nature, and associated with 
those of their own sort returning to be again, fire, earth, 



The Sceptical Chymist 8 1 

or water, as they were before they chanced to be in- 
gredients of that compositum. This may be explained 
(continues Eleutherius) by a piece of cloath made of white 
and black threds interwoven, wherein though the whole 
piece appear neither white nor black, but of a resulting 
colour, that is gray, yet each of the white and black threds 
that compose it, remains what it was before, as would 
appear if the threds were pulled asunder, and sorted each 
colour by itself. This (pursues Eleutherius) being, as I 
understand it, the state of the controversie, and the 
Aristotelians after their master commonly defining, that 
mistion is miscibilium alteratorum unto, that seems to 
comport much better with the opinion of the chymists, 
than with that of their adversaries, since according to 
that as the newly mentioned example declares, there is 
but a juxta-position of separable corpuscles, retaining 
each its own nature, whereas according to the Aristotelians, 
when what they are pleased to call a mixt body results 
from the concourse of the elements, the miscibilia cannot 
so properly be said to be altered, as destroyed, since there 
is no part in the mixt body, how small soever, that can 
be called either fire, or air, or water, or earth. 

Nor indeed can I well understand, how bodies can be 
mingled other waies than as I have declared, or at least 
how they can be mingled, as our peripateticks would 
have it. For whereas Aristotle tells us, that if a drop of 
wine be put into ten thousand measures of water, the wine 
being overpowered by so vast a quantity of water will 
be turned into it, he speaks to my apprehension, very 
improbably. For though one should add to that quantity 
of water as many drops of wine as would a thousand times 
exceed it all, yet by his rule the whole liquor should not 
be a crama, a mixture of wine and water, wherein the 
wine would be predominant, but water only; since the 
wine being added but by a drop at a time, would still fall 
into nothing but water, and consequently would be turned 
into it. And if this would hold in metals too, 'twere a 
rare secret for goldsmiths, and refiners; for by melting 
a mass of gold, or silver, and by but casting into it lead 
or antimony, grain after grain, they might at pleasure, 



82 The Sceptical Chymist 

within a reasonable compass of time, turn what quantity 
they desire, of the ignoble into the noble metalls. And 
indeed since a pint of wine, and a pint of water, amount 
to about a quart of liquor, it seems manifest to sense, that 
these bodies doe not totally penetrate one another, as one 
would have it; but that each retains its own dimensions; 
and consequently, that they are by being mingled only 
divided into minute bodies, that do but touch one another 
with their surfaces, as do the grains of wheat, rye, barley, 
etc. in a heap of severall sorts of corn : and unless we say, 
that as when one measure of wheat, for instance, is 
blended with a hundred measures of barely, there happens 
only a juxta-position and superficial contact betwixt the 
grains of wheat, and as many or thereabouts of the grains 
of barley; so when a drop of wine is mingled with a great 
deal of water, there is but an apposition of so many 
vinous corpuscles to a correspondent number of aqueous 
ones ; unless I say this be said, I see not how that absur- 
dity will be avoyded, whereunto the Stoical notion of 
mistion (namely by o-uy^vo-ts, or confusion) was liable, 
according to which the least body may be co-extended 
with the greatest: since in a mixt body wherein before 
the elements were mingled there was, for instance, but 
one pound of water to ten thousand of earth, yet according 
to them there must not be the least part of that compound, 
that consisted not as well of earth, as water. But I 
insist, perhaps, too long (saies Eleutherius) upon the 
proofs afforded me by the nature of mistion: wherefore 
I will but name two or three other arguments; whereof 
the first shall be, that according to Aristotle himself, the 
motion of a mixt body followes the nature of the pre- 
dominant element, as those wherein the earth prevails, 
tend towards the centre of heavy bodies. And since 
many things make it evident, that in divers mixt bodies 
the elementary qualities are as well active, though not 
altogether so much so as in the elements themselves, it 
seems not reasonable to deny the actual existence of the 
elements in those bodies wherein they operate. 

To which I shall add this convincing argument, that 
experience manifests, and Aristotle confesses it, that the 



The Sceptical Chymist 83 

miscibilia may be again separated from a mixt body, as is 
obvious in the chymical resolutions of plants and animalls, 
which could not be unless they did actually retain their 
formes in it: for since, according to Aristotle, and I think 
according to truth, there is but one common mass of all 
things, which he has been pleased to call 



and since 'tis not therefore the matter but the forme that 
constitutes and discriminates things, to say that the 
elements remain not in a mixt body, according to their 
formes, but according to their matter, is not to say that 
they remain there at all; since although those portions 
of matter were earth and water, etc. before they con- 
curred; yet the resulting body being once constituted, 
may as well be said to be simple as any of the elements; 
the matter being confessedly of the same nature in all 
bodies, and the elementary formes being according to this 
hypothesis perished and abolished. 

And lastly, and if we will consult chymical experiments, 
we shall find the advantages of the chymical doctrine 
above the peripatetick title little less than palpable. For 
in that operation that refiners call quartation, which they 
employ to purifie gold, although three parts of silver be 
so exquisitely mingled by fusion with a fourth part of 
gold (whence the operation is denominated) that the 
resulting mass acquires several new qualities, by vertue 
of the composition, and that there is scarce any sensible 
part of it that is not composed of both the metalls; yet 
if you cast this mixture into aquafortis, the silver will be 
dissolved in the menstruum, and the gold like a dark or 
black powder will fall to the bottom of it, and either body 
may be again reduced into such a metal as it was before; 
which shews, that it retained its nature, notwithstanding 
its being mixt per minima with the other: we likewise 
see, that though one part of pure silver be mingled with 
eight or ten parts, or more, of lead; yet the fire will upon 
the cuppel easily and perfectly separate them again. 
And that which I would have you peculiarly consider on 
this occasion is, that not only in chymicall anatomies 
there is a separation made of the elementary ingredients, 
but that some mixt bodies afford a very much greater 



84 The Sceptical Chymist 

quantity of this or that element or principle, than of 
another; as we see, that turpentine and amber yeeld 
much more oyl and sulphur than they do water; whereas 
wine, which is confessed to be a perfectly mixt bodie, 
yeelds but a little inflamable spirit, or sulphur, and not 
much more earth; but affords a vast proportion of phlegm 
or water: which could not be, if, as the peripateticks 
suppose, every, even of the minutest particles, were of the 
same nature with the whole, and consequently did contain 
both earth and water, and aire, and fire; wherefore as to 
what Aristotle principally, and almost only objects, that 
unless his opinion be admitted, there would be no true 
and perfect mistion, but onely aggregates or heaps of 
contiguous corpuscles, which, though the eye of man 
cannot discerne, yet the eye of a lynx might perceive not 
to be of the same nature with one another and with their 
totuniy as the nature of mistion requires, if he do not beg 
the question, and make mistion to consist in what other 
naturalists deny to be requisite to it, yet he at least 
objects that as a great inconvenience which I cannot take 
for such, till he have brought as considerable arguments 
as I have proposed to prove the contrary, to evince that 
nature makes other mistions than such as I have allowed, 
wherein the miscibilia are reduced into minute parts, and 
united as far as sense can discerne : which if you will not 
grant to be sufficient for a true mistion, he must have the 
same quarrel with nature herself, as with his adversaries. 

Wherefore (continues Eleutherius) I cannot but some- 
what marvail that Carneades should oppose the doctrine 
of the chymists in a particular, wherein they do as well 
agree with his old mistress, nature, as dissent from his old 
adversary, Aristotle. 

I must not (replies Carneades) engage myself at present 
to examine throughly the controversies concerning 
mistion : and if there were no third thing, but that I were 
reduced to embrace absolutely and unreservedly either 
the opinion of Aristotle, or that of the philosophers that 
went before him, I should look upon the latter, which 
the chymists have adopted, as the more defensible opinion: 
but because differing in the opinions about the elements 



The Sceptical Chymist 85 

from both parties, I think I can take a middle course, and 
discourse to you of mistion after a way that does neither 
perfectly agree, nor perfectly disagree with either, as 
I will not peremtorily define, whether there be not cases 
wherein some phenomena of mistion seem to favour the 
opinion that the chymists patrons borrowed of the 
antients, I shall only endeavour to shew you that there 
are some cases which may keep the doubt, which makes 
up my second general consideration from being un- 
reasonable. 

I shall then freely acknowledge to you (saies Carneades) 
that I am not over-well satisfied with the doctrine that 
is ascribed to Aristotle, concerning mistion, especially 
since it teaches that the four elements may again be 
separated from the mixt body; whereas if they continued 
not in it, it would not be so much a separation as a pro- 
duction. And I think the ancient philosophers that 
preceded Aristotle, and chymists who have since received 
the same opinion, do speak of this matter more intelligibly, 
if not more probably, than the peripateticks : but though 
they speak congruously enough, to their believing, that 
there are a certain number of primogeneal bodies, by 
whose concourse all those we call mixt are generated, 
and which in the destruction of mixt bodies do barely 
part company, and reduce from one another, just such 
as they were when they came together; yet I, who meet~ /x 
with very few opinions that I can entirely acquiesce in, 
must confess to you that I am inclined to differ not only 
from the Aristotelians, but from the old philosophers and 
the chymists, about the nature of mistion: and if you 
will give me leave, I shall briefly propose to you my 
present notion of it, provided you will look upon it, not 
so much as an assertion as an hypothesis; in talking of 
which I do not now pretend to propose and debate the 
whole doctrine of mistion, but to shew that 'tis not 
improbable, that sometimes mingled substances may be 
so strictly united, that it doth not by the usuall operations 
of the fire, by which chymists are wont to suppose them- 
selves to have made the analysis of mixt bodies, sufficiently 
appear, that in such bodies the wzsMz0, that concurred 



86 The Sceptical Chymist 

to make them up, do each of them retain its own peculiar 
nature; and by the spagyrists fires may be more easily 
extricated and recovered, than altered, either by a change 
of texture in the parts of the same ingredient, or by an 
association with some parts of another ingredient more 
strict than was that of the parts of this or that miscibile 
among themselves. At these words Eleu. having 
pressed him to do what he proposed, and promised to do 
what he desired; 

I consider then (resumes Carneades) that, not to mention 
those improper kinds of mistion, wherein homogeneous 
bodies are joyned, as when water is mingled with water, 
or two vessels full of the same kind of wine with one 
another, the mistion I am now to discourse of seems, 
generally speaking, to be but an union per minima of any 
two or more bodies of differing denominations ; as when 
ashes and sand are colliquated into glass; or antimony 
and iron into regulus martis ; or wine and water are 
mingled, and sugar is dissolved in the mixture. Now 
in this general notion of mistion it does not appear clearly 
comprehended, that the miscibilia or ingredients do in 
their small parts so retain their nature and remain distinct 

* f in the compound, that they may thence by the fire be 
again taken asunder: for though I deny not that in some 
mistions of certain permanent bodies this recovery of the 
same ingredients may be made; yet I am not convinced 
that it will hold in all or even in most, or that it is neces- 
sarily deducible from chymicall experiments, and the true 
notion of mistion. To explain this a little, I assume, 
that bodies may be mingled, and that very durably, that 
are not elementary, nor have been resolved into elements 
or principles, that they may be mingled; as is evident 
in the regulus of colliquated antimony, and iron newly 
mentioned; and in gold coyne, which lasts so many ages; 
wherein generally the gold is alloyed by the mixture of a 
quantity, greater or lesser, (in our mints they use about 
a i2th part) of either silver, or copper, or both. Next, 
I consider, that there being but one universal matter of 

S things, as 'tis known that the Aristotelians themselves 
acknowledge, who call it materia prima (about which 



The Sceptical Chymist 87 

nevertheless I like not all their opinions) the portions of 
this matter seem to differ from one another, but in certain 
qualities or accidents, fewer or more; upon whose account 
the corporeal substance they belong to receives its denomi- 
nation, and is referred to this or that particular sort of 
bodies; so that if it come to lose, or be deprived of those 
qualities, though it ceases not to be a body, yet it ceases 
from being that kind of body as a plant, or animal, or 
red, green, sweet, sowre, or the like. I consider that it 
very often happens that the small parts of bodies cohere 
together but by immediate contact and rest, and that 
however, there are few bodies whose minute parts stick 
so close together, to what cause soever their combination 
be ascribed, but that it is possible to meet with some other 
body, whose small parts may get between them, and so 
disjoyn them; or may be fitted to cohere more strongly 
with some of them, than those some do with the rest; or 
at least may be combined so closely with them, as that 
neither the fire, nor the other usual instruments of 
chymical anatomies will separate them. These things 
being premised, I will not peremptorily deny, but that 
there may be some clusters of particles, wherein the 
particles are so minute, and the coherence so strict, or 
both, that when bodies of differing denominations, and 
consisting of such durable clusters, happen to be mingled, 
though the compound body made up of them may be very 
differing from either of the ingredients, yet each of the 
little masses or clusters may so retain its own nature, as 
to be again separable, such as it was before. As when 
gold and silver being melted together in a due proportion 
(for in every proportion, the refiners will tell you that the 
experiment will not succeed) aquafortis will dissolve the 
silver, and leave the gold untoucht; by which means, as 
you lately noted, both the metalls may be recovered from 
the mixed mass. But (continues Carneades) there are other 
clusters wherein the particles stick not so close together, but 
that they may meet with corpuscles of another denomina- 
tion, which are disposed to be more closely united with some 
of them, than they were among themselves. And in such 
case, two thus combining corpuscles losing that shape, or 



88 The Sceptical Chymist 

size, or motion, or other accident, upon whose account 
they were endowed with such a determinate quality or 
nature, each of them really ceases to be a corpuscle of the 
same denomination it was before; and from the coalition 
of these there may emerge a new body, as really one, as 
either of the corpuscles was before they were mingled, or, 
if you please, confounded: since this concretion is really 
endowed with its own distinct qualities, and can no more 
by the fire, or any other known way of analysis, be 
divided again into the corpuscles that at first concurred 
to make it, than either of them could by the same means 
be subdivided into other particles. But (saies Eleutherius) 
to make this more intelligible by particular examples; 
If you dissolve copper in aquafortis, or spirit of nitre, (for 
I remember not which I used, nor do I think it much 
material) you may by chrystalising the solution obtain 
a goodly vitriol; which though by vertue of the com- 
position it have manifestly diverse qualities, not to be 
met with in either of the ingredients, yet it seems that 
the nitrous spirits, or at least many of them, may in this 
compounded mass retain their former nature; for having 
for tryal sake distilled this vitriol spirit, there came over 
store of red fumes, which by that colour, by their peculiar 
stinke, and by their sowrness, manifested themselves to 
be, nitrous spirits; and that the remaining calx continued 
copper, I suppose you'll easily believe. But if you 
dissolve minium, which is but lead powdered by the fire, 
in good spirit of vinegar, and chrystalise the solution, 
you shall not only have a saccharine salt exceedingly 
differing from both its ingredients; but the union of some 
parts of the menstruum with some of those of the metal 
is so strict, that the spirit of vinegar seems to be, as such, 
destroyed; since the saline corpuscles have quite lost 
that acidity, upon whose account the liquor was called 
spirit of vinegar; nor can any such acid parts as were 
put to the minium be separated by any known way from 
the saccharum saturni resulting from them both; for not 
only there is no sowrness at all, but an admirable sweetness 
to be tasted in the concretion; and not only I found not 
that spirit of wine, which otherwise will immediately hiss 



The Sceptical Chymist 89 

when mingled with strong spirit of vinegar, would hiss 
being poured upon saccharum saturni, wherein yet the 
acid salt of vinegar, did it survive, may seem to be con- 
centrated; but upon the distillation of saccharum saturni 
by itself I found indeed a liquor very penetrant, but not 
at all acid, and differing as well in smell and other qualities, 
as in taste, from the spirit of vinegar; which likewise 
seemed to have left some of its parts very firmly united 
to the caput mortuum, which though of a leaden nature was 
in smell, colour, etc. differing from minium; which brings 
into my mind, that though two powders, the one blew, 
and the other yellow, may appear a green mixture, with- 
out either of them losing its own colour, as a good micro- 
scope has sometimes informed me; yet having mingled 
minium and sal armoniack in a requisite proportion, and 
exposed them in a glass vessel to the fire, the whole mass 
became white, and the red corpuscles were destroyed; 
for though the calcined lead was separable from the salt, 
yet you'll easily believe it did not part from it in the forme 
of a red powder, such as was the minium, when it was put 
to the sal armoniack. I leave it also to be considered, 
whether in blood, and divers other bodies, it be probable, 
that each of the corpuscles that concur to make a com- 
pound body doth, though some of them in some cases may, 
retain its own nature in it, so that chymists may extricate 
each sort of them from all the others, wherewith it con- 
curred to make a body of one denomination. 

I know there may be a distinction betwixt matter 
immanent, when the material parts remain and retain 
their own nature in the things materiated, as some of the 
schoolmen speak (in which sence wood, stones and lime 
are the matter of a house) and transient, which in the 
materiated thing is so altered, as to receive a new forme, 
without being capable of re-admitting again the old. 
In which sence the friends of this distinction say, that 
chyle is the matter of blood, and blood that of a humane 
body, of all whose parts 'tis presumed to be the aliment. 
I know also that it may be said, that of material principles, 
some are common to all mixt bodies, as Aristotle's four 
elements, or the chymists tria prima ; others peculiar, 



go The Sceptical Chymist 

which belong to this or that sort of bodies ; as butter and 
a kind of whey may be said to be the proper principles 
of cream : and I deny not, but that these distinctions may 
in some cases be of use; but partly by what I have said 
already, and partly by what I am to say, you may easily 
enough guess in what sence I admit them, and discerne 
that in such a sence they will either illustrate some of my 
opinions, or at least will not overthrow any of them. 

To prosecute then what I was saying before, I will add 
to this purpose, that since the major part of chymists 
credit, what those they call philosophers affirme of their 
stone, I may represent to them, that though when common 
gold and lead are mingled together, the lead may be 
severed almost unaltered from the gold; yet if instead 
of gold a tantillum of the red elixir be mingled with the 
saturn, their union will be so indissoluble in the perfect 
gold that will be produced by it, that there is no known, 
nor perhaps no possible way of separating the diffused 
elixir from the fixed lead, but they both constitute a most 
permanent body, wherein the saturn seems to have quite 
lost its properties that made it be called lead, and to have 
been rather transmuted by the elixir, than barely associ- 
ated to it. So that it seems not alwaies necessary, that 
the bodies that are put together per minima should each 
retain its own nature; so as when the mass itself is 
dissipated by the fire, to be more disposed to re-appear 
in its pristine forme, than in any new one, which by a 
stricter association of its parts with those of some of the 
other ingredients of the compositum, than with one 
another, it may have acquired. 

And if it be objected, that unless the hypothesis I 
oppose be admitted, in such cases as I have proposed, 
there would not be an union, but a destruction of mingled 
bodies, which seems all one as to say, that of such bodies 
there is no mistion at all; I answer, that though the 
substances that are mingled remain, only their accidents 
are destroyed, and though we may with tolerable con- 
gruity call them miscibilia, because they are distinct 
bodies before they are put together, however afterwards 
they are so confounded that I should rather call them 



The Sceptical Chymist 91 

concretions, or resulting bodies, than mixt ones; and 
though perhaps some other and better account may be 
proposed, upon which the name of mistion may remain; 
yet if what I have said be thought reason, I shall not 
wrangle about words, though I think it fitter to alter a 
terme of art, than reject a new truth, because it suits not 
with it. If it be also objected that this notion of mine, 
concerning mistion, though it may be allowed, when 
bodies already compounded are put to be mingled, yet 
it is not applicable to those mistions that are immediately 
made of the elements, or principles themselves; I answer 
in the first place, that I here consider the nature of mistion 
somewhat more generally, than the chymists; who yet 
cannot deny that there are oftentimes mixtures, and those 
very durable ones, made of bodies that are not elementary. 
And in the next place, that though it may be probably 
pretended that in those mixtures that are made immedi- 
ately of the bodies, that are called principles or elements, 
the mingled ingredients may better retain their own 
nature in the compounded mass, and be more easily 
separatetKfrom thence; yet, besides that it may be 
doubted, whether^ there be any such primary bodies, I 
see not why the reason I alledged, of the destructibility 
of the ingredients of bodies in general, may not sometimes 
be applicable to salt, sulphur, or mercury; 'till it be 
shewn upon what account we are to believe them privi- 
ledged. And however, (if you please but to recall to mind, 
to what purpose I told you at first, I meant to speak of 
mistion at this time) you will perhaps allow, that what 
I have hitherto discoursed about it, may not only give 
some light to the nature of it in general (especially when 
I shall have an opportunity to declare to you my thoughts 
on that subject more fully) but may on some occasions 
also be serviceable to me in the insuing part of this 
discourse. 

But to look back now to that part of our discourse, 
whence this excursion concerning mistion has so long 
diverted us, though we there deduced from the differing 
substances obtained from a plant nourished only with 
water, and from some other things, that it was not 



92 The Sceptical Chymist 

necessary that nature should alwaies compound a body 
at first of all such differing bodies as the fire could after- 
wards make it afford; yet this is not all that may be 
collected from those experiments. For from them there 
seems also deducible something that subverts another 
foundation of the chymical doctrine. For since that (as 
we have seen) out of fair water alone, not only spirit, but 
oyle, and salt, and earth may be produced; it will follow 
that salt and sulphur are not primogeneal bodies, and 
principles, since they are every day made out of plain 
water by the texture which the seed or seminal principle 
of plants put it into. And this would not perhaps seem 
so strange, if through pride or negligence, we were not 
/ wont to overlook the obvious and familiar workings of 
nature; for if we consider what slight qualities they are 
that serve to denominate one of the Iria prima, we shall 
find that nature does frequently enough work as great 
alterations in divers parcells of matter: for to be readily 
dissoluble in water, is enough to make the body that is so, 
pass for a salt. And yet I see not why from a new shufling 
and disposition of the component particles of a body, it 
should be much harder for nature to compose a body 
dissoluble in water of a portion of water that was not so 
before, than of the liquid substance of an egg, which will 
easily mix with water, to produce by the bare warmth of 
a hatching hen, membrans, feathers, tendons, and other 
parts, that are not dissoluble in water as that liquid 
substance was: nor is the hardness and brittleness of 
salt more difficult for nature to introduce into such a 
yielding body as water, than it is for her to make the 
bones of a chick out of the tender substance of the liquors 
of an egg. But instead of prosecuting this consideration, 
as I easily might, I will proceed, as soon as I have taken 
notice of an objection that lies in my way. For I easily 
foresee it will be alledged, that the above mentioned 
examples are all taken from plants, and animals, in whom 
the matter is fashioned by the plastick power of the seed, 
or something analogous thereunto. Whereas the fire 
does not act like any of the seminal principles, but de- 
stroyes them all when they come within its reach. But to 



The Sceptical Chymist 93 

this I shall need at present to make but this easy answer, 
that whether it be a seminal principle, or any other which 
fashions that matter after those various manners I have 
mentioned to you, yet 'tis evident, that either by the 
plastick principle alone, or that and heat together, or by 
some other cause capable to contex the matter, it is yet 
possible that the matter may be anew contrived into such 
bodies. And 'tis only for the possibility of this that I am 
now contending. 



THE THIRD PART 

WHAT I have hitherto discoursed, Eleutherius (saies his 
friend to him) has, I presume, shewn you, that a consider- 
ing man may very well question the truth of those very 
suppositions which chymists as well as peripateticks, 
without proving, take for granted; and upon which 
depends the validity of the inferences they draw from 
their experiments. Wherefore having dispatched that, 
which though a chymist perhaps will not, yet I do, look 
upon as the most important, as well as difficult, part of my 
task, it will now be seasonable for me to proceed to the 
consideration of the experiments themselves, wherein 
they are wont so much to triumph and glory. And these 
will the rather deserve a serious examination, because 
those that alledge them are wont to do it with so much 
confidence and ostentation, that they have hitherto 
imposed upon almost all persons, without excepting 
philosophers and physitians themselves, who have read 
their books, or heard them talk. For some learned men 
have been content rather to believe what they so boldly 
affirme, than be at the trouble and charge, to try whether 
or no it be true. Others again, who have curiosity enough 
to examine the truth of what is averred, want skill and 
opportunity to do what they desire. And the generality 
even of learned men, seeing the chymists (not contenting 
themselves with the schools to amuse the world with empty 
words) actually perform divers strange things, and, 
among those resolve compound bodies into several sub- 
stances not known by former philosophers to be contained 
in them: men I say, seeing these things, and hearing 
with what confidence chymists averr the substances 
obtained from compound bodies by the fire to be the true 
elements, or (as they speak) hypostatical principles of 
them, are forward to think it but just as well as modest, 
that according to the logicians rule, the skilfull artists 
94 



The Sceptical Chymist 95 

should be credited in their own art; especially when those 
things whose nature they so confidently take upon them 
to teach others, are not only productions of their own 
skill, but such as others know not else what to make of. 

But though (continues Carneades) the chymists have 
been able upon some or other of the mentioned accounts, 
not only to delight but amaze, and almost to bewitch 
even learned men; yet such as you and I, who are not 
unpractised in the trade, must not suffer ourselves to be 
imposed upon by hard names, or bold assertions; nor to 
be dazled by that light which should but assist us to 
discern things the more clearly. It is one thing to be able 
to help nature to produce things, and another thing to 
understand well the nature of the things produced. As 
we see, that many persons that can beget children, are 
for all that as ignorant of the number and nature of the 
parts, especially the internal ones, that constitute a child's 
body, as they that never were parents. Nor do I doubt, 
but you'll excuse me, if as I thank the chymists for the 
things their analysis shews me, so I take the liberty to 
consider how many, and what they are, without being 
astonisht at them; as if, whosoever hath skill enough to 
shew men some new thing of his own making, had the 
right to make them believe whatsoever he pleases to tell 
them concerning it. 

Wherefore I will now proceed to my third general con- 
sideration, which is, that it does not appear, that three 
is precisely and universally the number of the distinct 
substances or elements, whereinto mixt bodies are resoluble 
by the fire, I mean that 'tis not proved by chymists, that 
all the compound bodies, which are granted to be perfectly 
rnixt, are upon their chymical analysis divisible each of 
them into just three distinct substances, neither more 
nor less, which are wont to be lookt upon as elementary, 
or may as well be reputed so as those that are so reputed. 
Which last clause I subjoyne, to prevent your objecting 
that some of the substances I may have occasion to 
mention by and by, are not perfectly homogeneous, nor 
consequently worthy of the name of principles. For that 
which I am now to consider, is, into how many differing 



96 The Sceptical Chymist 

substances, that may plausibly pass for the elementary 
ingredients of a mixed body, it may be analysed by the 
fire; but whether each of these be uncompounded, I 
reserve to examine, when I shall come to the next general 
consideration ; where I hope to evince, that the substances 
which the chymists not only allow, but assert to be the 
component principles of the body resolved into them, are 
not wont to be uncompounded. 

Now there are two kinds of arguments (pursues 
Carneades) which may be brought to make my third 
proposition seem probable; one sort of them being of 
a more speculative nature, and the other drawn from 
experience. To begin then with the first of these. 

But as Carneades was going to do as he had said, 
Eleutherius interrupted him, by saying with a somewhat 
smiling countenance; 

If you have no mind I should think, that the proverb, 
" That good wits have bad memories," is rational and 
applicable to you, you must not forget now you are upon 
the speculative considerations, that may relate to the 
number of the elements; that yourself did not long since 
deliver and concede some propositions in favour of the 
chymical doctrine, which I may without disparagement 
to you think it uneasie, even for Carneades to answer. 

I have not, replies he, forgot the concessions you mean; 
but I hope too, that you have not forgot neither with 
what cautions they were made, when I had not yet 
assumed the person I am now sustaining. But however, 
I shall to content you, so discourse of my third general 
consideration, as to let you see, that I am not unmindful 
of the things you would have me remember. 

To talk then again according to such principles as I 
then made use of, I shall represent, that if it be granted 
rational to suppose, as I then did, that the elements 
Consisted at first of certain small and primary coalitions 
of the minute particles of matter into corpuscles very 
numerous, and very like each other, it will not be absurd 
to conceive, that such primary clusters may be of far 
more sorts than three or five; and consequently, that 
we need not suppose, that in each of the compound bodies 



The Sceptical Chymist 97 

we are treating of, there should be found just three sorts 
of such primitive coalitions, as we are speaking of. 

And if according to this notion we allow a considerable 
number of differing elements, I may add, that it seems 
very possible, that to the constitution of one sort of mixt 
bodies two kinds of elementary ones may suffice (as I lately 
exemplified to you, in that most durable concrete, glass), 
another sort of mixts may be composed of three elements, 
another of four, another of five, and another perhaps of 
many more. So that according to this notion, there can 
be no determinate number assigned, as that of the elements, 
of all sorts of compound bodies whatsoever, it being very 
probable that some concretes consist of fewer, some of 
more elements. Nay, it does not seem impossible, accord- 
ing to these principles, but that there may be two sorts 
of mixts, whereof the one may not have any of all the same 
elements as the other consists of; as we oftentimes see 
two words, whereof the one has not any one of the letters 
to be met with in the other; or as we often meet with 
diverse electuaries, in which no ingredient (except sugar) 
is common to any two of them. I will not here debate 
whether there may not be a multitude of these corpuscles, 
which by reason of their being primary and simple, might 
be called elementary, if several sorts of them should con- 
vene to compose any body, which are as yet free, and 
neither as yet contexed and entangled with primary 
corpuscles of other kinds, but remains liable to be subdued 
and fashioned by seminal principles, or the like powerful 
and transmuting agent, by whom they may be so con- 
nected among themselves, or with the parts of one of the 
bodies, as to make the compound bodies, whose ingredients 
they are, resoluble into more, or other elements than those 
that chymists have hitherto taken notice of. 

To all which I may add, that since it appears, by what 
I observed to you of the permanency of gold and silver, 
that even corpuscles that are not of an elementary but 
compounded nature, may be of so durable a texture, as to 
remain indissoluble in the ordinary analysis that chymists 
make of bodies by the fire; 'tis not impossible but that, 
though there were but three elements, yet there may be 

G 



98 The Sceptical Chymist 

a greater number of bodies, which the wonted waies of 
anatomy will not discover to be no elementary bodies. 

But, (saies Carneades) having thus far, in compliance 
to you, talket conjecturally of the number of the elements, 
'tis now time to consider, not of how many elements it is 
possible that nature may compound mixed bodies, but 
(at least as far as the ordinary experiments of chymists 
will informe us) of how many she doth make them up. 

I say then, that it does not by these sufficiently appear 
to me, that there is any one determinate number of 
elements to be uniformly met with in all the several sorts 
of bodies allowed to be perfectly mixt. 

And for the more distinct proof of this proposition, 
I shall in the first place represent, that there are divers 
bodies, which I could never see by fire divided into so 
many as three elementary substances. I would fain (as 
I said lately to Philoponus) see that fixt and noble metal 
we call gold separated into salt, sulphur and mercury: and 
if any man will submit to a competent forfeiture in case 
of failing, I shall willingly in case of prosperous success 
pay for both the materials and the charges of such an 
experiment. 'Tis not, that after what I have tried my- 
self I dare peremptorily deny, that there may out of gold 
be extracted a certain substance, which I cannot hinder 
chymists from calling its tincture or sulphur; and which 
leaves the remaining body deprived of its wonted colour. 
Nor am I sure, that there cannot be drawn out of the same 
metal a real quick and running mercury. But for the 
salt of gold, I never could either see it, or be satisfied that 
there was ever such a thing separated, in rerum natura, 
by the relation of any credible eye witness. And for the 
several processes that promise that effect, the materials 
that must be wrought upon are somewhat too precious 
and costly to be wasted upon so groundless adventures, 
of which not only the success is doubtful, but the very 
possibility is not yet demonstrated. Yet that which 
most deterrs me from such tryalls, is not their chargeable- 
ness, but their unsatisfactorinesse, though they should 
succeed. For the extraction of this golden salt being in 
chymists processes prescribed to be effected by corrosive 



The Sceptical Chymist 99 

menstruums, or the intervention of other saline bodies, 
it will remain doubtfull to a wary person, whether the 
emergent salt be that of the gold itself; or of the saline 
bodies or spirits employed to prepare it; for that such 
disguises of metals do often impose upon artists, I am sure 
Eleutherius is not so much a stranger to chymistry as to 
ignore. I would likewise willingly see the three principles 
separated from the pure sort of virgin-sand, from osteo- 
calla, from refined silver, from quicksilver, freed from its 
adventitious sulphur, from Venetian talck, which by long 
detention in an extreme reverberium, I could but divide 
into smaller particles, not the constituent principles; 
nay, which, when I caused it to be kept, I know not how 
long, in a glass-house fire, came out in the figure it's lumps 
had when put in, though altered to an almost amethys- 
tine colour; and from divers other bodies, which it were 
now unnecessary to enumerate. For though I dare not 
absolutely affirme it to be impossible to analyze these . 
bodies into their tria prima-, yet because neither my own * 
experiments, nor any competent testimony hath hitherto 
either taught me how such an analysis may be made, or 
satisfied me, that it hath been so, I must take the liberty 
to refrain from believing it, till the chymists prove it, or 
give us intelligible an/d practicable processes to perform 
what they pretend. / For whilst they affect that asnig- 
matical obscurity with which they are wont to puzzle 
the readers of their divulged processes concerning the 
analytical preparation of gold or mercury, they leave wary 
persons much unsatisfied whether or no the differing 
substances, they promise to produce, be truly the hypo- 
statical principles, or only some intermixtures of the 
divided bodies with those employed to work upon them, 
as is evident in the seeming chrystalls of silver, and those 
of mercury; which though by some inconsiderately, 
supposed to be the salts of those metalls, are plainly but 
mixtures of the metalline bodies, with the saline parts 
of aquafortis or other corrosive liquors; as is evident by 
their being reducible into silver or quicksilver, as they 
were before. I 

I cannot but confess (saith Eleutherius) that though 



TOO The Sceptical Chymist 

chymists may upon probable grounds affirme themselves 
able to obtain their tria prima, from animals and vege- 
tables, yet I have often wondred that they should so 
confidently pretend also to resolve all metalline and 
other mineral bodies into salt, sulphur, and mercury. 
For 'tis a saying almost proverbial, among those chymists 
themselves that are accounted philosophers; and our 
famous countryman Roger Bacon has particularly adopted 
it; that, facilius est aurum facere, quam destruere. And 
I fear, with you, that gold is not the only mineral from 
which chymists are wont fruitlessly to attempt the 
separating of their three principles. I know indeed 
{continues Eleutherius) that the learned Sennertus, even 
in that book where he takes not upon him to play the 
advocate for the chymists, but the umpier betwixt them 
and the peripateticks, expresses himself roundly, thus; 
" Salem omnibus inesse (mixtis scilicet) et ex iis fieri 
posse omnibus in resolutionibus chymicis versatis notis- 
simum est." And in the next page, " Quod de sale dixi," 
saies he, " idem de sulphure dici potest: " but by his favour 
I must see very good proofs, before I believe such general 
assertions, how boldly soever made; and he that would 
convince me of their truth, must first teach me some true 
and practicable way of separating salt and sulphur from 
gold, silver, and those many different sorts of stones, that 
a violent fire does not bring to lime, but to fusion; and 
not only I, for my own part, never saw any of those newly 
named bodies so resolved; but Helmont, who was much 
better versed in the chymical anatomizing of bodies than 
either Sennertus or I, has somewhere this resolute passage ; 
" Scio (saies he) ex arena, silicibus et saxis, non calcariis, 
numquam sulphur aut mercurium trahi posse; ' nay 
Quercetanus himself, though the grand stickler for the 
tria prima, has this confession of the irresolubleness of 
diamonds; " Adamas (saith he) omnium factus lapidum 
solidissimus ac durissimus ex arctissima videlicet trium 
principiorum unione ac cohserentia, quae nulla arte separa- 
tionis in solutionem principiorum suorum spiritualium 
disjungi potest." And indeed, pursues Eleutherius, I 
was not only glad but somewhat surprized to find you 



The Sceptical Chymist 101 

inclined to admit that there may be a sulphur and a 
running mercury drawn from gold; for unless you do 
(as your expression seemed to intimate) take the word 
sulphur in a very loose sence, I must doubt whether our 
chymists can separate a sulphur from gold: for when I 
saw you make the experiment that I suppose invited you 
to speak as you did, I did not judge the golden tincture 
to be the true principle of sulphur extracted from the 
body, but an aggregate of some such highly coloured 
parts of the gold, as a chymist would have called a sulphur 
incombustible, which in plain English seems to be little 
better than to call it a sulphur and no sulphur. And as 
for metalline mercuries, I had not wondred at it, though 
you had expressed much more severity in speaking of 
them : for I remember that having once met an old and 
famous artist, who had long been (and still is) chymist 
to a great monarch, the repute he had of a very honest 
man invited me to desire him to tell me ingenuously 
whether or no among his many labours, he had ever really 
extracted a true and running mercury out of metalls; to 
which question he freely replyed, that he had never 
separated a true mercury from any metal; nor had ever 
seen it really done by any man else. And though gold 
is, of all metalls, that, whose mercury chymists have most 
endeavoured to extract, and which they do the most brag 
they have extracted; yet the experienced Angelus Sala, 
in his spagyrical account of the seven terrestrial planets 
(that is the seven metalls) affords us this memorable 
testimony, to our present purpose; " Quanquam (saies he) 
etc. experientia tamen (quam stultorum magistram 
vocamus) certe comprobavit, mercurium auri adeo fixum, 
maturum, et arete cum reliquis ejusdem corporis 
substantiis conjungi, ut nullo modo retrogredi possit." 
To which he sub-joynes that he himself had seen much 
labour spent upon that design, but could never see any 
such mercury produced thereby. And I easily believe 
what he annexes; " that he had often seen detected many 
tricks and impostures of cheating alchymists. For, the 
most part of those that are fond of such charlatans, being 
unskilful or credulous, or both, 'tis very easie for such as 



102 The Sceptical Chymist 

have some skill, much craft, more boldness, and no 
conscience, to impose upon them; and therefore, though 
many professed alchymists, and divers persons of quality 
have told me that they have made or seen the mercury of 
gold, or of this or that other metal; yet I have been still 
apt to fear that either these persons have had a design 
to deceive others; or have had not skill and circumspec- 
tion enough to keep themselves from being deceived. 

You recall to my mind (saies Carneades) a certain 
experiment I once devised, innocently to deceive some 
persons and let them and others see how little is to be built 
upon the affirmation of those that are either unskilfull or 
unwary, when they tell us they have seen alchymists make 
the mercury of this or that metal; and to make this the 
more evident, I made my experiment much more slight, 
short and simple, than the chymists usuall processes to 
extract metalline mercuries; which operations being 
commonly more elaborate and intricate, and requiring 
a much more longer time, give the alchymists a greater 
opportunity to cozen, and consequently are more ob- 
noxious to the spectators suspition. And that wherein 
I endeavoured to make my experiment look the more like 
a true analysis, was, that I not only pretended as well as 
others to extract a mercury from the metal I wrought 
upon, but likewise to separate a large proportion of 
manifest and inflamable sulphur. I take then, of the 
filings of copper, about a drachme or two; of common 
sublimate, powdered, the like weight; and sal armoniack 
near about as much as of sublimate ; these three being well 
mingled together I put into a small vial with a long neck, 
or, which I find better, into a glass urinall, which (having 
first stopped it with cotton) to avoid the noxious fumes, 
I approach by degrees to a competent fire of well kindled 
coals, or (which looks better, but more endangers the 
glass) to the flame of a candle; and after a while the 
bottom of the glass being held just upon the kindled coals, 
or in the flame, you may in about a quarter of an hour, 
or perchance in halfe that time, perceive in the bottom 
of the glass some running mercury; and if then you take 
away the glass and break it, you shall find a parcel of 



The Sceptical Chymist 103 

quicksilver, perhaps altogether, and perhaps part of it 
in the pores of the solid mass; you shall find too, that 
the remaining lump being held to the flame of the candle 
will readily burn with a greenish flame, and after a little 
while (perchance presently) will in the air acquire a 
greenish blew, which being the colour that is ascribed 
to copper, when its body is unlocked, 'tis easie to perswade 
men that this is the true sulphur of Venus, especially 
since not only the salts may be supposed partly to be flown 
away, and partly to be sublimed to the upper part of the 
glass, whose inside (will commonly appear whitened by 
them) but the metal seems to be quite destroyed, the 
copper no longer appearing in a metalline forme, but 
almost in that of a resinous lump; whereas indeed the 
case is only this, that the saline parts of the sublimate 
together with the sal armoniack, being excited and 
actuated by the vehement heat, fall upon the copper, 
(which is a metal they can more easily corrode, than 
silver) whereby the small parts of the mercury being freed 
from the salts that kept them asunder, and being by the 
heat tumbled up and down after many occursions, they 
convene into a conspicuous mass of liquor; and as for the 
salts, some of the more volatile of them subliming to the 
upper part of the glass, the others corrode the copper, 
and uniting themselves with it do strangely alter and 
disguise its metallick form, and compose with it a new 
kind of concrete inflamable like sulphur; concerning 
which I shall not now say anything, since I can referr you 
to the diligent observations which I remember Mr. Boyle 
has made concerning this odde kind of verdigrease. But 
continues Carneades smiling, you know I was not cut 
out for a mountebank, and therefore I will hasten to 
resume the person of a sceptick, and take up my discourse 
where you diverted me from prosecuting it. 

In the next place, then, I consider, that, as there are 
some bodies which yield not so many as the three prin- 
ciples; so there are many others, that in their resolution 
exhibite more principles than three; and that therefore 
the ternary number is not that of the universal and 
adequate principles of bodies. If you allow of the dis- 



104 The Sceptical Chymist 

course I lately made you, touching the primary associa- 
tions of the small particles of matter, you will scarce 

'/think it improbable, that of such elementary corpuscles 
there may be more sorts than either three, or four, or five. 
And if you will grant, what will scarce be denyed, that 
corpuscles of a compounded nature may in all the wonted 
examples of chymists pass for elementary, I see not why 
you should think it impossible, that as aqua fortis, or 
aqua regis will make a separation of colliquated silver and 
gold, though the fire cannot; so there may be some agent 
found out so subtile and so powerfull, at least in respect 
of those particular compounded corpuscles, as to be able 
to resolve them into those more simple ones, whereof they 
consist, and consequently encrease the number of the 
distinct substances, whereinto the mixt body has been 
hitherto thought resoluble. And if that be true, which 
I recited to you a while ago out of Helmont concerning 
the operations of the alkahest, which divides bodies into 
other distinct substances, both as to number and nature, 
than the fire does; it will not a little countenance my 
conjecture. But confining ourselves to such waies of 
analyzing mixed bodies, as are already not unknown to 
chymists, it may without absurdity be questioned, 

X whether besides those grosser elements of bodies, which 
they call salt sulphur and mercury, there may not be 
ingredients of a more subtile nature, which being extreamly 
little, and not being in themselves visible, may escape 
unheeded at the junctures of the destillatory vessels, 
though never so carefully luted. For let me observe to 
you one thing, which though not taken notice of by 
chymists, may be a notion of good use in divers cases to 
a naturalist, that we may well suspect, that there may be 
severall sorts of bodies, which are not immediate objects 
of any one of our senses; since we see, that not only those 
little corpuscles that issue out of the loadstone, and per- 
form the wonders for which it is justly admired; but the 
effluviums of amber, jet, and other electricall concretes, 
though by their effects upon the particular bodies disposed 
to receive their action, they seem to fall under the cog- 
nizance of our sight, yet do they not as electrical immedi- 



The Sceptical Chymist 105 

ately affect any of our senses, as do the bodies, whether 
minute or greater, that we see, feel, taste, etc. But, 
(continues Carneades) because you may expect I should, 
as the chymists do, consider only the sensible ingredients 
of mixt bodies, let us now see, what experience will, even 
as to these, suggest to us. 

It seems then questionable enough, whether from 
grapes variously ordered there may not be drawn more 
distinct substances by the help of the fire, than from most 
other mixt bodies. For the grapes themselves being 
dryed into raisins and distilled, will (besides alcali, phlegm, 
and earth) yeeld a considerable quantity of an empy- 
reumatical oyle, and a spirit of a very different nature 
from that of wine. Also the unfermented juice of grapes 
affords other distilled liquors than wine doth. The juice 
of grapes after fermentation will yeeld a spiritus ardens ; 
which if competently rectifyed will all burn away without 
leaving anything remaining. The same fermented juice 
degenerating into vinegar, yeelds an acid and corroding 
spirit. The same juice tunned up, armes itself with 
tartar; out of which may be separated, as out of other 
bodies, phlegme, spirit, oyle, salt and earth: not to 
mention what substances may be drawn from the vine 
itselfe, probably differing from those which are separated 
from tartar, which is a body by itself, that has few resem- 
blers in the world. And I will further consider that what 
force soever you will allow this instance, to evince that 
there are some bodies that yeeld more elements than 
others, it can scarce be denyed but that the major part 
of bodies that are divisible into elements yeeld more than 
three. For, besides those which the chymists are pleased 
to name hypostatical, most bodies contain two others, 
phlegme and earth, which concurring as well as the rest 
to the constitution of mixts, and being as generally, if not 
more, found in their analysis, I see no sufficient cause why 
they should be excluded from the number of elements. 
Nor will it suffice to object, as the Paracelsians are wont 
to do, that the tria -prima are the most useful elements, 
and the earth and water but worthless and unactive; for 
elements being called so in relation to the constituting 



io6 The Sceptical Chymist 

of mixt bodies, it should be upon the account of its ingre- 
f diency, not of its use, that anything should be affirmed 
or denyed to be an element: and as for the pretended 
uselessness of earth and water, it would be considered 
that usefulness, or the want of it, denotes only a respect 
or relation to us; and therefore the presence, or absence 
of it, alters not the intrinsick nature of the thing. The 
hurtful teeth of vipers are for ought I know useless to us, 
and yet are not to be denyed to be parts of their bodies; 
and it were hard to shew of what greater use to us, than 
phlegme and earth, are those undiscerned stars, which 
our new telescopes discover to us, in many blanched 
places of the sky; and yet we cannot but acknowledge 
them constituent and considerably great parts of the 
universe. Besides that whether or no the phlegm and 
-earth be immediately useful, but necessary to constitute 
the body whence they are separated; and consequently, 
if the mixt body be not useless to us, those constituent 
parts, without which it could not have been that mixt 
body, may be said not to be unuseful to us: and though 
the earth and water be not so conspicuously operative 
(after separation) as the other three more active principles, 
yet in this case it will not be amiss to remember the lucky 
fable of Menenius Agrippa, of the dangerous sedition of 
the hands and legs, and other more busie parts of the body, 
against the seemingly unactive stomack. And to this 
case also we may not unfitly apply that reasoning of an 
apostle, to another purpose; " If the ear shall say, because 
I am not the eye, I am not of the body; is it therefore 
not of the body? If the whole body were eye, where were 
the hearing? If the whole were for hearing, where the 
smelling? In a word, since earth and water appear, as 
clearly and as generally as the other principles upon the 
resolution of bodies, to be the ingredients whereof they 
/ are made up; and since they are useful (if not immedi- 
ately to us, or rather to physitians) to the bodies they 
constitute, and so though in somewhat a remoter way, 
are serviceable to us; to exclude them out of the number 
of elements, is not to imitate nature. 

And on this occasion I cannot but take notice, that 



The Sceptical Chymist 107 

whereas the great argument which the chymists are wont 
to employ to vilify earth and water, and make them be 
looked upon as useless and unworthy to be reckoned 
among the principles of mixt bodies, is, that they are not 
endowed with specifick properties, but only with elemen- 
tary qualities ; of which they use to speak very slightingly, 
as of qualities contemptible and unactive: I see no 
sufficient reason for this practice of the chymists: for 
'tis confessed that heat is an elementary quality, and yet 
that an almost innumerable company of considerable 
things are performed by heat, is manifest to them that 
duly consider the various phenomena wherein it inter- 
venes as a principall actor; and none ought less to ignore 
or distrust this truth than a chymist. Since almost all 
the operations and productions of his art are performed 
chiefly by the means of heat. And as for cold itself, upon 
whose account they so despise the earth and water, if 
they please to read in the voyages of our English and 
Dutch navigators in Nova Zembla and other northern 
regions what stupendous things may be effected by cold, 
they would not perhaps think it so despicable. And not 
to repeat what I lately recited to you out of Paracelsus 
himself, who by the help of an intense cold teaches to 
separate the quintessence of wine; I will only now 
observe to you, that the conservation of the texture ,of 
many bodies both animate and inanimate, does so much 
depend upon the convenient motion both of their own 
fluid and looser parts, and of the ambient bodies, whether 
air, water, etc. that not only in humane bodies we see 
that the immoderate or unseasonable coldness of the air 
(especially when it finds such bodies overheated) does 
very frequently discompose the oeconomie of them, and 
occasion variety of diseases ; but in the solid and durable 
body of iron itself, in which one would not expect that 
suddain cold should produce any notable change, it may 
have so great an operation, that if you take a wire, or 
other slender piece of steel, and having brought it in the 
fire to a white heat, you suffer it afterwards to cool 
leasurely in the air, it will when it is cold be much of the 
same hardness it was of before. Whereas if as soon as 



1 08 The Sceptical Chymist 

you remove it from the fire, you plunge it into cold water, 
it will upon the suddain refrigeration acquire a very much 
greater hardness than it had before; nay, and will become 
manifestly brittle. And that you may not impute this 
to any peculiar quality in the water, or other liquor, or 
unctuous matter, wherein such heated steel is wont to be 
quenched that it may be tempered; I know a very skilful 
tradesman, that divers times hardens steel by suddenly 
cooling it in a body that is neither a liquor, nor so much 
as moist. A tryal of that nature I remember I have seen 
made. And however by the operation that water has 
upon steel quenched in it, whether upon the account of 
its coldness and moisture, or upon that of any other of 
its qualities, it appears, that water is not alwaies so 
inefficacious and contemptible a body, as our chymists 
would have it pass for. And what I have said of the 
efficacy of cold and heat, might perhaps be easily enough 
carried further by other considerations and experiments; 
were it not that having been mentioned only upon the by, 
I must not insist on it, but proceed to another subject. 

But, (pursues Carneades) though I think it evident, 
that earth and phlegme are to be reckoned among the 
elements of most animal and vegetable bodies, yet 'tis 
not upon that account alone, that I think divers bodies 
resoluble into more substances than three. For there 
are two experiments, that I have sometimes made to 
shew, that at least some mixts are divisible into more 
distinct substances than five. The one of these experi- 
ments, though 'twill be more seasonable for me to mention 
it fully anon, yet in the meantime, I shall tell you thus 
much of it, that out of two distilled liquors which pass 
for elements of the bodies whence they are drawn, I can 
without addition make a true yellow and inflamable 
sulphur, notwithstanding that the two liquors remain 
afterwards distinct. Of the other experiment, which 
perhaps will not be altogether unworthy your notice, I 
must now give you this particular account. I had long 
observed, that by the destination of divers woods, both 
in ordinary, and some unusuall sorts of vessels, the 
copious spirit that came over, had besides a strong taste, 



The Sceptical Chymist 109 

to be met with in the empyreumatical spirits of many 
other bodies, an acidity almost like that of vinegar: 
wherefore I suspected, that though the sowrish liquor 
distilled, for instance, from box-wood, be lookt upon by 
chymists as barely the spirit of it, and therefore as one 
single element or principle; yet it does really consist of 
two differing substances, and may be divisible into them ; 
and consequently, that such woods and other mixts as 
abound with such a vinegar, may be said to consist of one 
element or principle, more than the chymists as yet are 
aware of, wherefore bethinking myself, how the separation 
of these two spirits might be made, I quickly found, that 
there were several waies of compassing it. But that of 
them which I shall at present mention was this, Having 
destilled a quantity of box-wood per se, and slowly 
rectifyed the sowrish spirit, the better to free it both from 
oyle and phlegme, I cast into this rectifyed liquor a con- 
venient quantity of powdered coral, expecting that the 
acid part of the liquor, would corrode the coral, and being 
associated with it would be so retained by it, that the 
other part of the liquor, which was not of an acid nature, 
nor fit to fasten upon the corals, would be permitted to 
ascend alone. Nor was I deceived in my expectation; 
for having gently abstracted the liquor from the corals, 
there came over a spirit of a strong smell, and of a taste 
very piercing but without any sowrness; and which was 
in diverse qualities manifestly different, not only from 
a spirit of vinegar, but from some spirit of the same wood, 
that I purposely kept by me without depriving it of its 
acid ingredient. And to satisfy you, that these two 
substances were of a very differing nature, I might 
informe you of several tryals that I made, but must not 
name some of them, because I cannot do so without 
making some unseasonable discoveries. Yet this I shall 
tell you at present that the sowre spirit of box, not only 
would, as I just now related, dissolve corals, which the 
other would not fasten on, but being poured upon salt of 
tartar would immediately boyle and hiss, whereas the 
other would lye quietly upon it. The acid spirit poured 
upon minium made a sugar of lead, which I did not find 



1 1 o The Sceptical Chymist 

the other to do ; some drops of this penetrant spirit being 
mingled with some drops of the blew syrup of violets 
seemed rather to dilute than otherwise alter the colour; 
whereas the acid spirit turned the syrup of a reddish 
colour, and would probably have made it of as pure a red, 
as acid salts are wont to do, had not its operation been 
hindered by the mixture of the other spirit. A few drops 
of the compound spirit being shaken into a pretty quantity 
of the infusion of lignum nephriticum, presently destroyed 
all the blewish colour, whereas the other spirit would not 
take it away. To all which it might be added, that 
having for tryals sake poured fair water upon the corals 
that remained in the bottom of the glass wherein I had 
rectifyed the double spirit (if I may so call it) that was 
first drawn from the box, I found according to my expec- 
tation that the acid spirit had really dissolved the corals 
and had coagulated with them. For by the affusion of 
fair water, I obtained a solution, which (to note that 
singularity upon the by) was red, whence the water being 
evaporated, there remained a soluble substance much like 
the ordinary salt of coral, as chymists are pleased to call 
that magistery of corals, which they make by dissolving 
them in common spirit of vinegar, and abstracting the 
menstruum ad siccitatem. I know not whether I should 
subjoyne, on this occasion, that the simple spirit of box, 
if chymists will have it therefore saline because it has a 
strong taste, will furnish us with a new kind of saline 
bodies, differing from those hitherto taken notice of. 
For whereas of the three chief sorts of salts, the acid, the 
alcalizate, and the sulphureous, there is none that seems 
to be friends with both the other two, as I may, ere it be 
long, have occasion to shew; I did not find but that the 
simple spirit of box did agree very well (at least as farr 
as I had occasion to try it) both with the acid and the other 
salts. For though it would lye very quiet with salt of 
tartar, spirit of urine, or other bodies, whose salts were 
either of an alcalizate or fugitive nature; yet did not the 
mingling of oyle of vitriol itself produce any hissing or 
effervescence, which you know is wont to ensue upon the 
affusion of that highly acid liquor upon either of the 
bodies newly mentioned. 



The Sceptical Chymist 1 1 1 

I think myself, (saies Eleu therms) beholden to you, for 
this experiment; not only because I foresee you will 
make it helpful to you in the enquiry you are now upon, 
but because it teaches us a method, whereby we may 
prepare a numerous sort of new spirits, which though 
more simple than any that are thought elementary, are 
manifestly endowed with peculiar and powerful qualities, 
some of which may probably be of considerable use in 
physick, as well alone as associated with other things; </ 
as one may hopefully guess by the redness of that solution 
your sowre spirit made of corals, and by some other circum- 
stances of your narrative. And suppose (pursues Eleu- 
therius) that you are not so confined, for the separation 
of the acid parts of these compound spirits from the other, 
to employ corals; but that you may as well make use of 
any alcalizate salt, or of pearls, or crabs eyes, or any other 
body, upon which common spirit of vinegar will easily 
work, and, to speak in an Helmontian phrase, exantlate 
itself. 

I have not yet tryed, (saies Carneades) of what use the 
mentioned liquors may be in physick, either as medicines 
or as menstruums: but I could mention now (and may 
another time) divers of the tryals that I made to satisfy 
myself of the difference of these two liquors. But that, 
as I allow your thinking what you newly told me about 
corals, I presume you will allow me, from what I have 
said already, to deduce this corollary; that there are 
divers compound bodies, which may be resolved into 
four such differing substances, as may as well merit the 
name of principles, as those to which the chymists freely 
give it. For since they scruple not to reckon that which 
I call the compound spirit of box, for the spirit, or as 
others would have it, the mercury of that wood, I see not, 
why the acid liquor, and the other, should not each of 
them, especially that last named, be lookt upon as more 
worthy to be called an elementary principle; since it must 
needs be of a more simple nature than the liquor, which 
was found to be divisible into that, and the acid spirit. 
And this further use (continues Carneades) may be made 
of our experiment to my present purpose, that it may give 



1 1 2 The Sceptical Chymist 

us a rise to suspect, that since a liquor reputed by the 
chymists to be, without dispute, homogeneous, is by so 
slight a way divisible into two distinct and more simple 
ingredients, some more skilful or happier experimenter 
than I may find a way either further to divide one of these 
spirits, or to resolve some or other, if not all, of those 
other ingredients of mixt bodies, that have hitherto passed 
among chymists for their elements or principles. 



THE FOURTH PART 

AND thus much (saies Carneades) may suffice to be said 
of the number of the distinct substances separable from 
mixt bodies by the fire: wherefore I now proceed to 
consider the nature of them, and shew you, that though 
they seem homogeneous bodies, yet have they not the 
purity and simplicity that is requisite to elements. And 
I should immediately proceed to the proof of my assertion, 
but that the confidence wherewith chymists are wont to call 
each of the substances we speak of by the name of sulphur 
or mercury, or the other of the hypostatical principles, and 
te intolerable ambiguity they allow themselves in their 
writings and expressions^ makes it necessary for me in 
order to the keeping you either from mistaking me, or 
thinking I mistake the controversie, to take notice to you 
and complain of the unreasonable liberty they give them- 
selves of playing with names at pleasure. And indeed 
if I were obliged in this dispute, to have such regard to the 
phraseology of each particular chymist, as not to write 
anything which this or that author may not pretend, 
not to contradict this or that sence, which he may give us 
as occasion serves to his ambiguous expressions, I should 
scarce know how to dispute, nor which way to turn myself. 
For I find that even eminent writers (such as Raymund 
Lully, Paracelsus and others) do so abuse the termes they 
employ, that as they will now and then give divers things, 
one name; so they will oftentimes give one thing, many 
names; and some of them (perhaps) such, as do much 
more properly signifie some distinct body of another kind; 
nay even in technical words or termes of art, they refrain 
not from this confounding liberty; but will, as I have 
observed, call the same substance, sometimes the sulphur, 
and sometimes the mercury of a body. And now I speak 
of mercury, I cannot but take notice, that the descriptions 
they give us of that principle or ingredient of mixt bodies, 
113 H 



1 14 The Sceptical Chymist 

J are so intricate, that even those that have endeavoured 
to polish and illustrate the notions of the chymists, are 
fain to confess that they know not what to make of it 
either by ingenuous acknowledgments, or descriptions 
that are not intelligible. 

I must confess (saies Eleutherius) I have, in the reading 
of Paracelsus and other chymical authors, been troubled 
to find, that such hard words and equivocal expressions, 

/ as you justly complain of, do even when they treat of 
principles, seem to be studiously affected by those writers; 
whether to make themselves to be admired by their 
readers, and their art appear more venerable and 
mysterious, or (as they would have us think) to conceal 
from them a knowledge themselves judge inestimable. 

But whatever (saies Carneades) these men may promise 
themselves from a canting way of delivering the principles 

. of nature, they will find the major part of knowing men 
so vain, as when they understand not what they read, to 
conclude, that it is rather the writers fault than their own. 
And those that are so ambitious to be admired by the 
vulgar, that rather than go without the admiration of 
the ignorant they will expose themselves to the contempt 
of the learned, those shall, by my consent, freely enjoy 
their option. As for the mystical writers scrupling to 
communicate tneir knowledge, they might less to their 
own disparagement, and to the trouble of their readers, 
have concealed it by writing no books, than by writing 
bad ones.XIf Themistius were here, he would not stick 
to say, that chymists write thus darkly, not because they 
think their notions too precious to be explained, but 

v/ because they fear that if they were explained, men would 
discern, that they are fair from being precious. And 
indeed, I fear that the chief reason why chymists have 
written so obscurely of their three principles, may be, 
that not having clear and distinct notions of them them- 
selves, they cannot write otherwise than confusedly of 
what they but confusedly apprehend: not to say that 
divers of them, being conscious to the invalidity of their 
doctrine, might well enough discerne that they could 
scarce keep themselves from being confuted, but by 



The Sceptical Chymist 115 

keeping themselves from being clearly understood. But 
though much may be said to excuse the chymists when 
they write darkly, and ^enigmatically, about the prepara- 
tion of their elixir, and some few other grand arcana, 
the divulging of which they may upon grounds plausible 
enough esteem unfit; yet when they pretend to teach 
the general principles of natural philosophers, this 
equivocal way of writing is not to be endured. For in 
such speculative enquiries, where the naked knowledge 
of the truth is the thing principally aimed at, what does 
he teach me worth thanks that does not, if he can, make 
his notion intelligible to me, but by mystical termes, and 
ambiguous phrases darkens what he should clear up; 
and makes me add the trouble of guessing at the sence 
of what he equivocally expresses, to that of examining 
the truth of what he seems to deliver. And if the matter 
of the philosophers stone, and the manner of preparing it, 
be such mysteries as they would have the world believe 
them, they may write intelligibly and clearly of the 
principles of mixt bodies in general, without discovering 
what they call the great work. But for my part (continues 
Carneades) what my indignation at this unphilosophical 
way of teaching principles has now extorted from me, is 
meant chiefly to excuse myself, if I shall hereafter oppose 
any particular opinion or assertion, that some follower 
of Paracelsus or any eminent artist may pretend not to be 
his masters. For, as I told you long since, I am not 
obliged to examine private men's writings, (which were 
a labour as endless as unprofitable) being only engaged 
to examine those opinions about the tria prima, which I 
find those chymists I have met with to agree in most: 
and I doubt not but my arguments against their doctrine 
will be in great part easily enough applicable even to 
those private opinions, which they do not so directly and 
expressly oppose. And indeed, that which I am now 
entering upon being the consideration of the things them- 
selves whereinto spagyrists resolve mixt bodies by the 
fire, if I can shew that these are not of an elementary 
nature, it will be no great matter what names these or 
those chymists have been pleased to give them. And I 



1 1 6 The Sceptical Chymist 

question not that to a wise man, and consequently to 
Eleutherius, it will be lesse considerable to know, what 
men have thought of things, than what they should have 
thought. 

In the fourth and last place, then, I consider, that as 
generally as chymists are wont to appeal to experience, 
and as confidently as they use to instance the several 
substances separated by the fire from a mixt body, as a 
/sufficient proof of their being its component elements: 
yet those differing substances are many of them farr 
enough from elementary simplicity, and may be yet 
looked upon as mixt bodies, most of them also retaining, 
somewhat at least, if not very much, of the nature of those 
concretes whence they were forced. 

I am glad (saies Eleutherius) to see the vanity or envy of 
the canting chymists thus discovered and chastised; and I 
could wish, that learned men would conspire together to 
make these deluding writers sensible, that they must no 
longer hope with impunity to abuse the world. For whilst 
such men are quietly permitted to publish books with 
promising titles, and therein to assert what they please, 
and contradict others, and even themselves as they please, 
with as little danger of being confuted as of being under- 
stood, they are encouraged to get themselves a name, 
at the cost of the readers, by finding that intelligent men 
are wont for the reason newly mentioned, to let their 
books and them alone: and the ignorant and credulous 
(of which the number is still much greater than that of 

* the other) are forward to admire most what they least 
understand. But if judicious men skilled in chymical 
affaires shall once agree to write clearly and plainly of 
them, and thereby keep men from being stunned, as it 

*/were, or imposed upon by dark or empty words; 'tis to be 
hoped that these men finding that they can no longer 
write impertinently and absurdly, without being laughed 
at for doing so, will be reduced either to write nothing, 
or books that may teach us something, and not rob 
men, as formerly, of invaluable time; and so ceasing to 
trouble the world with riddles or impertinencies, we shall 



The Sceptical Chymist 117 

either by their books receive an advantage, or by their 
silence escape an inconvenience. 

But after all this is said (continues Eleutherius) it may 
be represented in favour of the chymists, that, in one 
regard the liberty they take in using names, if it be 
excusable at any time, may be more so when they speak 
of the substances whereinto their analysis resolves mixt 
bodies : since as parents have the right to name their own 
children, it has ever been allowed to the authors of new 
inventions, to impose names upon them. And therefore 
the subjects we speak of being so the productions of the 
chymists art, as not to be otherwise, but by it, obtainable; 
it seems but equitable to give the artists leave to name 
them as they please: considering also that none are so 
fit and likely to teach us what those bodies are, as they 
to whom we owed them. 

I told you already (saies Carneades) that there is great 
difference betwixt the being able to make experiments, 
and the being able to give a philosophical account of them. 
And I. will not now add, that many a mine-digger may 
meet, whilst he follows his work, with a gemm or a mineral 
which he knowes not what to make of, till he shewes it 
a jeweller or a mineralist to be informed what it is. But 
that which I would rather have here observed is, that 
the chymists I am now in debate with have given up the 
liberty you challenged for them, of using names at pleasure, 
and confined themselves by their descriptions, though 
but such as they are, of their principles; so that although 
they might freely have called anything their analysis 
presents them with, either sulphur, or mercury, or gas, 
or bias, or what they pleased; yet when they have told 
me that sulphur (for instance) is a primogeneal and simple 
body, inflamable, odorous, etc. they must give me leave 
to disbelieve them, if they tell me that a body that is 
either compounded or uninflamable is such a sulphur; 
and to think they play with words, when they teach that 
gold and some other minerals abound with an incom- 
bustible sulphur, which is as proper an expression, as a 
sun-shine night, or fluid ice. 

But before I descend to the mention of particulars 



1 1 8 The Sceptical Chymist 

belonging to my fourth consideration, I think it convenient 
to premise a few generals; some of which I shall the less 
need to insist on at present, because I have touched on 
them already. 

And first I must invite you to take notice, of a certain 
passage in Helmont; 1 which though I have not found 
much heeded by his readers, he himself mentions as a 
notable thing, and I take to be a very considerable one ; for 
whereas the distilled oyle of oyle-olive, though drawn per se 
is (as I have tryed) of a very sharp and fretting quality, 
and of an odious taste, he tells us that simple oyle being 
only digested with Paracelsus's sal circulatum, is reduced 
into dissimilar parts, and yeelds a sweet oyle, very differing 
from the oyle distilled, from sallet oyle; as also that by 
the same way there may be separated from wine a very 
sweet and gentle spirit, partaking of a far other and 
nobler quality than that which is immediately drawn by 
distillation and called dephlegmed aqua vitce, from whose 
acrimony this other spirit is exceedingly remote, although 
the sal circulatum that makes these anatomies be separated 
from the analyzed bodies, in the same weight and with 
the same qualities it had before; which affirmation of 
Helmont if we admit to be true, we must acknowledge 
that there may be a very great disparity betwixt bodies 
of the same denomination (as several oyles, or several 
spirits) separable from compound bodies: for, besides the 
differences I shall anon take notice of, betwixt those 
distilled oyles that are commonly known to chymists, it 
appears by this, that by means of the sal circulatum, there 
may be quite another sort of oyles obtained from the same 
body; and who knowes but that there may be yet other 
agents found in nature, by whose help there may, whether 
by transmutation or otherwise, be obtained from the 
bodies vulgarly called mixt, oyles or other substances, 
differing from those of the same denomination, known 
either to vulgar chymists, or even to Helmont himself: 
but for fear you should tell me, that this is but a con- 
jecture grounded upon another man's relation, whose 
truth we have not the means to experiment, I will not 
1 Helmont, Aura vitalis, p. 725. 



The Sceptical Chymist 1 1 9 

insist upon it; but leaving you to consider of it at leasure, 
I shall proceed to what is next. 

Secondly, then, if that be true which was the opinion 
of Leucippus, Democritus, and other prime anatomists 
of old, and is in our dayes revived by no mean philosophers ; 
namely, that our culinary fire, such as chymists use, 
consists of swarmes of little bodies swiftly moving, which 
by their smallness and motion are able to permeate the 
sollidest and compactest bodies, and even glass itself; 
if this (I say) be true, since we see that in flints and other 
concretes, the fiery part is incorporated with the grosser, 
it will not be irrational to conjecture, that multitudes 
of these fiery corpuscles, getting in at the pores of the 
glass, may associate themselves with the parts of the mixt 
body whereon they work, and with them constitute new 
kinds of compound bodies, according as the shape, size, 
and other affections of the parts of the dissipated body 
happen to dispose them, in reference to such combina- 
tions; of which also there may be the greater number; 
if it be likewise granted that the corpuscles of the fire, 
though all exceeding minute, and very swiftly moved, 
are not all of the same bigness, nor figure: and if I had not 
weightier considerations to discourse to you of, I could 
name to you, to countenance what I have newly said, some 
particular experiments by which I have been deduced 
to think, that the particles of an open fire working upon 
some bodies may really associate themselves therewith, 
and add to the quantity. But because I am not sure, 
that when the fire works upon bodies included in glasses, 
it does it by a reall trajection of the fiery corpuscles them- 
selves, through the substance of the glass, I will proceed 
to what is next to be mentioned. 

I could (saies Eleutherius) help you to some proofs, 
whereby I think it may be made very probable, that when 
the fire acts immediately upon a body, some of its cor- 
puscles may stick to those of the burnt body, as they seem 
to do in quicklime, but in greater numbers and more 
permanently. But for fear of retarding your progress, 
I shall desire you to deferr this enquiry till another time, 
and proceed as you intended. 



1 20 The Sceptical Chymist 

You may then in the next place (sales Carneades) 
observe with me, that not only there are some bodies, as 
gold, and silver, which do not by the usual examens, 
made by fire, discover themselves to be mixt; but if 
(as you may remember I formerly told you) it be a decom- 
pound body that is dissipable into several substances, 
by being exposed to the fire it may be resolved into such 
as are neither elementary, nor such as it was upon its last 
mixture compounded of; but into new kinds of mixts. 
Of this I have already given you some examples in sope, 
sugar of lead, and vitriol. Now if we shall consider that 
there are some bodies, as well natural, (as that I last named) 
as factitious, manifestly decompounded; that in the 
bowells of the earth nature may, as we see she sometimes 
does, make strange mixtures; that animals are nourished 
with other animals and plants; and, that these themselves 
have almost all of them their nutriment and growth, either 
from a certain nitrous juice harboured in the pores of the 
earth, or from the excrements of animalls, or from the 
putrifyed bodies, either of living creatures or vegetables, 
or from other substances of a compounded nature; if, I 
say, we consider this, it may seem probable, that there 
may be among the works of nature (not to mention those 
of art) a greater number of decompound bodies, than men 
take notice of; and indeed, as I have formerly also 
observed, it does not at all appear, that all mixtures must 
be of elementary bodies; but it seems farr more probable, 
that there are divers sorts of compound bodies, even in 
regard of all or some of their ingredients, considered 
antecedently to their mixture. For though some seem to 
be made up by the immediate coalitions of the elements, 
or principles themselves, and therefore may be called 
prima mista, or mista primaria ; yet it seems that many 
other bodies are mingled (if I may so speak) at the second 
hand, their immediate ingredients being not elementary, 
but these primary mixt newly spoken of; and from divers 
of those secondary sorts of mixts may result, by a further 
composition, a third sort, and so onwards. Nor is it 
improbable, that some bodies are made up of mixt bodies, 
not all of the same order, but of several; as (for instance) 



The Sceptical Chymist 1 2 1 

a concrete may consist of ingredients, whereof the one 
may have been a primary, the other a secondary mixt 
body; (as I have in native cinnaber, by my way of 
resolving it, found both that courser part that seems 
more properly to be oar, and a combustible sulphur, and 
a running mercury): or perhaps without any ingredient 
of this latter sort, it may be composed of mixt bodies, 
some of them of the first, and some of the third kind; and 
this may perhaps be somewhat illustrated by reflecting 
upon what happens in some chymical preparations of 
those medicines which they call their Bezoardicurri's. 
For first, they take antimony and iron, which may be 
looked upon as prima mista ; of these they compound 
a starry regulus, and to this they add according to their 
intention, either gold, or silver, which makes with it a 
new and further composition. To this they add sub- 
limate, which is itself a decompound body, (consisting 
of common quicksilver, and divers salts united by sub- 
limation into a chrystalline substance) and from this 
sublimate, and the other metalline mixtures, they draw 
a liquor, which may be allowed to be of a yet more 
compounded nature. If it be true, as chymists affirm 
it, that by this art some of the gold or silver mingled with 
the regulus may be carryed over the helme with it by the 
sublimate; as indeed a skilfull and candid person com- 
plained to me a while since, that an experienced friend 
of his and mine, having by such a way brought over a 
great deal of gold, in hope to do something further with it, 
which might be gainful to him, has not only missed of his 
aim, but is unable to recover his volatilized gold out of 
the antimonial butter, wherewith it is strictly united. 

Now (continues Carneades) if a compound body consist 
of ingredients that are not merely elementary; it is not 
hard to conceive, that the substances into which the fire 
dissolves it, though seemingly homogeneous enough, may 
be of a compounded nature, those parts of each body that 
are most of kin associating themselves into a compound 
of a new kind. As when (for example sake) I have caused 
vitriol and sal armoniack, and salt petre to be mingled 
and distilled together, the liquor that came over mani- 



122 The Sceptical Chymist 

fested itself not to be either spirit of nitre, or of sal 
armoniack, or of vitrioll. For none of these would dissolve 
crude gold, which yet my liquor was able readily to do; 
and thereby manifested itself to be a new compound, 
consisting at least of spirit of nitre, and sal armoniack, 
(for the latter dissolved in the former, will work on gold) 
which nevertheless are not by any known way separable, 
and consequently would not pass for a mixt body, if we 
ourselves did not, to obtain it, put and distill together 
divers concretes, whose distinct operations were known 
beforehand. And, to add on this occasion the experiment 
I lately promised you, because it is applicable to our 
present purpose, I shall acquaint you, that suspecting 
the common oyle of vitrioll not to be altogether such a 
simple liquor as chymists presume it, I mingled it with 
an equal or a double quantity (for I tryed the experiment 
more than once) of common oyle of turpentine, such as 
together with the other liquor I bought at the dragsters. 
And having carefully (for the experiment is nice, and 
somewhat dangerous) distilled the mixture in a small 
glass retort, I obtained according to my desire (besides, 
the two liquors I had put in) a pretty quantity of a certaine 
substance, which sticking all about the neck of the retort 
discovered itself to be sulphur, not only by a very strong 
sulphureous smell, and by the colour of brimstone; but 
also by this, that being put upon a coal, it was immediately 
kindled, and burned like common sulphur. And of this 
substance I have yet by me some little parcells, which 
you may command and examine when you please. So 
that from this experiment I may deduce either one, or 
both of these propositions, that a real sulphur may be 
made by the conjunction of two such substances as 
chymists take for elementary, and which did not either 
of them apart appear to have any such body in it; or 
that oyle of vitrioll though a distilled liquor, and taken for 
part of the saline principle of the concrete that yeelds 
it, may yet be so compounded a body as to contain, besides 
its saline part, a sulphur like common brimstone, which 
would hardly be itself a simple or uncompounded body. 
I might (pursues Carneades) remind you, that I formerly 



The Sceptical Chymist 123 

represented it, as possible, that as there may be more 
elements than five, or six; so the elements of one body 
may be different from those of another; whence it would 
follow, that from the resolution of decompound bodies, 
there may result mixts of an altogether new kind, by the 
coalition of elements that never perhaps convened before. 
I might, I say, mind you of this, and add divers things 
to this second consideration; but for fear of wanting time 
I willingly pretermit them to pass on to the third, which 
is this, that the fire does not alwaies barely resolve or 
take asunder, but may also after a new manner mingle 
and compound together the parts (whether elementary 
or not) of the body dissipated by it. 

This is so evident, (saies Carneades) in some obvious 
examples, that I cannot but wonder at their supineness 
that have not taken notice of it. For when wood being 
burnt in a chimney is dissipated by the fire into smoake 
and ashes, that smoake composes soot, which is so far 
from being any one of the principles of the wood, that 
(as I noted above) you may by a further analysis separate 
five or six distinct substances from it. And as for the 
remaining ashes, the chymists themselves teach us, that 
by a further degree of fire they may be indissolubly united 
into glass. Tis true, that the analysis which the chymists 
principally build upon is made, not in the open air, but 
in close vessels; but however, the examples lately pro- 
duced may invite you shrewdly to suspect, that heat may 
as well compound as dissipate the parts of mixt bodies: 
and not to tell you, that I have known a vitrification made 
even in close vessels, I must remind you that the flowers 
of antimony, and those of sulphur, are very mixed bodies, 
though they ascend in close vessels: and that 'twas in 
stopt glasses that I brought up the whole body of camphire. 
And whereas it may be objected that all these examples 
are of bodies forced up in a dry, not a fluid forme, as are 
the liquors wont to be obtained by distillation ; I answer, 
that besides 'tis possible, that a body may be changed 
from consistent to fluid, or from fluid to consistent, with- 
out being otherwise much altered, as may appear by the 
easiness wherewith in winter, without any addition or 



i 24 The Sceptical Chymist 

separation of visible ingredients, the same substance may 
be quickly hardened into brittle ice, and thawed again 
into fluid water; besides this, I say it would be considered, 
that common quicksilver itself, which the eminentest 
chymists confess to be a mixt body, may be driven over 
the helme in its pristine forme of quicksilver, and conse- 
quently, in that of a liquor. And certainly 'tis possible 
that very compounded bodies may concurr to constitute 
liquors; since, not to mention that I have found it possible, 
by the help of a certain menstruum, to distill gold itself 
through a retort, even with a moderate fire: let us but 
consider what happens in butter of antimony. For if 
that be carefully rectifyed, it may be reduced into a very 
clear liquor; and yet if you cast a quantity of fair water 
upon it, there will quickly precipitate a ponderous and 
vomitive calx, which made before a considerable part 
of the liquor, and yet is indeed (though some eminent 
chymists would have it mercurial) an antimonial body 
carryed over and kept dissolved by the salts of the sub- 
limate, and consequently a compounded one ; as you may 
find, if you will have the curiosity to examine this white 
powder by a skilful reduction. And that you may not 
think that bodies as compounded, as flowers of brimstone, 
cannot be brought to concurr to constitute distilled 
liquors; and also that you may not imagine with divers 
learned men that pretend no small skill in chymistry, 
that at least no mixt body can be brought over the helme, 
but by corrosive salts, I am ready to shew you, when you 
please, among other waies of bringing over flowers of 
brimstone (perhaps I might add even mineral sulphurs) 
some, wherein I employ none but oleaginous bodies to 
make volatile liquors, in which not only the colour, but 
(which is a much surer mark) the smell and some opera- 
tions manifest that there is brought over a sulphur that 
makes part of the liquor. 

One thing more there is Eleutherius, (saies Carneades) 
which is so pertinent to my present purpose, that though 
I have touched upon it before, I cannot but on this 
occasion take notice of it. And it is this, that the qualities 
or accidents, upon whose account chymists are wont to 



The Sceptical Chymist 125 

call a portion of matter by the name of mercury or some 
other of their principles, are not such but that 'tis possible 
as great (and therefore why not the like) may be produced 
by such changes of texture, and other alterations, as the 
fire may make in the small parts of a body. I have 
already proved, when I discoursed of the second general 
consideration, by what happens to plants nourished only 
with fair water, and eggs hatched into chickens, that by 
changing the disposition of the component parts of a body, 
nature is able to effect as great changes in a parcell of 
matter reputed similar, as those requisite to denominate 
one of the tria prima. And though Helmont do some- 
where wittily call the fire the destructor and the artificial 
death of things; and although another eminent chymist 
and physitian be pleased to build upon this, that fire 
can never generate anything but fire; yet you will, I 
doubt not, be of another mind, if you consider how many 
new sorts of mixt bodies chymists themselves have pro- 
duced by means of the fire: and particularly, if you 
consider how that noble and permanent body, glass, is 
not only manifestly produced by the violent action of the 
fire, but has never, for ought we know, been produced any 
other way. And indeed it seems but an inconsiderate 
assertion of some Helmontians, that every sort of body 
of a peculiar denomination must be produced by some 
seminal power; as I think I could evince, if I thought it 
so necessary, as it is for me to hasten to what I have 
further to discourse. Nor need it much move us, that 
there are some who look upon whatsoever the fire is 
employed to produce, not as upon natural but artificial 
bodies. For there is not alwaies such a difference as 
many imagine betwixt the one and the other: nor is it 
so easy as they think, clearly to assigne that which 
properly, constantly, and sufficiently, discriminates them. 
But not to engage myself in so nice a disquisition, it may 
now suffice to observe, that a thing is commonly termed 
artificial, when a parcel of matter is by the artificers hand, 
or tools, or both, brought to such a shape or form, as he 
designed beforehand in his mind: whereas in many of 
the chymical productions the effect would be produced 



ia6 The Sceptical Chymist 

whether the artificer intended it or no ; and is oftentimes 
very much other than he intended or looket for; and the 
instruments employed, are not tools artificially fashioned 
and shaped, like those of tradesmen, for this or that 
particular work; but, for the most part, agents of nature's 
own providing, and whose chief powers of operation they 
receive from their own nature or texture, not the artificer. 
And indeed, the fire is as well a natural agent as seed: 
and the chymist that imployes it, does but apply natural 
agents and patients, who being thus brought together, 
and acting according to their respective natures, performe 
the work themselves; as apples, plums, or other fruit, 
are natural productions, though the garden bring and 
fasten together the sciens and the stock, and both water, 
and do perhaps divers other waies contribute to its bearing 
fruit. But, to proceed to what I was going to say; you 
may observe with me, Eleutherius, that, as I told you 
once before, qualities sleight enough may serve to denomi- 
nate a chymical principle. For, when they anatomize 
a compound body by the fire, if they get a substance 
inflamable, and that will not mingle with water, that they 
presently call sulphur; what is sapid and dissoluble in 
water, that must passe for salt; whatsoever is fixed and 
indissoluble in water, that they name .earth. And I was 
going to add, that whatsoever volatile substance they 
know not what to make of, not to say, whatsoever they 
please, that they call mercury. But that these qualities 
may either be produced, otherwise than by such as they 
call seminal agents, or may belong to bodies of a com- 
pounded nature, may be shewn, among other instances, 
in glass made of ashes, where the exceeding strong-tasted 
alcalizate salt joyning with the earth becomes insipid, 
and with it constitutes a body; which though also dry, 
fixt and indissoluble in water, is yet manifestly a mixt 
body; and made so by the fire itself. 

And I remember to our present purpose, that Helmont, 
amongst other medicines that he commends, has a short 
process, wherein, though the directions for practice are 
but obscurely intimated; yet I have some reason not to 
disbelieve the process, without affirming or denying any- 



The Sceptical Chymist 127 

thing about the vertues of the remedy to be made by it. 
" Quando (saies he) oleum cinnamomi etc. suo sali alcali 
miscetur absque omni aqua, trium mensium artificiosa 
occultaque circulatione, totum in salem volatilem com- 
mutatum est, vere essentiam sui simplicis in nobis expri- 
mit et usque in prima nostri constitutiva sese ingerit." 
A not unlike process he delivers in another place; from 
whence, if we suppose him to say true, I may argue, 
that since by the fire there may be produced a substance 
that is as well saline and volatile as the salt of hartshorn, 
blood, etc. which pass for elementary; and since that this 
volatile salt is really compounded of a chymical oyle and 
a fixt salt, the one made volatile by the other, and both 
associated by the fire, it may well be suspected that other 
substances, emerging upon the dissipation of bodies by the 
fire, may be new sorts of mixts, and consist of substances 
of differing natures; and particularly, I have sometimes 
suspected, that since the volatile salts of blood, hartshorn, 
etc. are fugitive and endowed with an exceeding strong 
smell, either that chymists do erroneously ascribe all 
odours to sulphurs, or that such salts consist of some 
oyly parts well incorporated with the saline ones. And 
the like conjecture I have also made concerning spirit of 
vinegar, which, though the chymists think one of the 
principles of that body, and though being an acid spirit 
it seems to be much less of kin than volatile salts to 
sulphurs; yet, not to mention its piercing smell; which 
I know not with what congruity the chymist will deduce 
from salt, I wonder they have not taken notice of what 
their own Tyrocinium Chymicum teach us concerning the 
distillation of saccharum saturni ; out of which Beguinus 
assures us, that he distilled, besides a very fine spirit, no 
less than two oyles, the one blood-red and ponderous, but 
the other swimming upon the top of the spirit, and of a 
yellow colour; of which he saies that he kept then some 
by him, to verify what he delivers. And though I 
remember not that I have had two distinct oyles from 
sugar of lead, yet that it will though distilled without 
addition yeeld some oyle, disagrees not with my experi- 
ence. I know the chymists will be apt to pretend, that 



128 The Sceptical Chymist 

these oyles are but the volatilized sulphur of lead; and 
will perhaps argue it from what Beguinus relates, that 
when the distillation is ended, you'l find a caput mortuum 
extreamly black, and (as he speaks) nullius momenti, as 
if the body, or at least the chief part of the metal itself 
were by the distillation carried over the helme. But 
since you know as well as I that saccharum saturni is a 
kind of magistery, made only by calcining of lead per se, 
dissolving it in distilled vinegar, and chrystalyzing the 
solution; if I had leasure to tell you how differing a thing 
I did upon examination find the caput mortuum, so slighted 
by Beguinus, to be from what he represents it, I believe 
you would think the conjecture proposed less probable 
than one or other of these three; either that this oyle did 
formerly concurr to constitute the spirit of vinegar, and 
so that what passes for a chymical principle may yet be 
further resoluble into distinct substances; or that some' 
parts of the spirit together with some parts of the lead 
may constitute a chymical oyle, which therefore though 
it pass for homogeneous, may be a very compounded 
body: or at least that by the action of the distilled vinegar 
and the saturnine calx one upon another, part of the 
liquor may be so altered as to be transmuted from an 
acid spirit into an oyle. And though the truth of either 
of the two former conjectures would make the example 
I have reflected on more pertinent to my present argu- 
ment; yet you'l easily discern, the third and last con- 
jecture cannot be unserviceable to confirm some other 
passages of my discourse. 

To return then to what I was saying just before 
I mentioned Helmont's experiment, I shall subjoyne, 
that chymists must confess also that in the perfectly 
dephlegmed spirit of wine, or other fermented liquors, 
that which they call the sulphur of the concrete loses, by 
the fermentation, the property of oyle, (which the chymists 
likewise take to be the true sulphur of the mixt) of being 
unminglable with the water. And if you will credit 
Helmont, a pound of the purest spirit of wine may barely 
by the help of pure salt of tartar (which is but the fixed 
salt of wine) be resolved or transmuted into scarce half 



The Sceptical Chymist 129 

an ounce of salt, and as much elementary water as amounts 
to the remaining part of the mentioned weight. And it 
may (as I think I formerly also noted) be doubted 
whether that fixt and alcalizate salt, which is so unani- 
mously agreed on to be the saline principle of incinerated 
bodies, be not, as 'tis alcalizate, a production of the fire? 
For though the taste of tartar, for example, seem to 
argue that it contains a salt before it be burned, yet that 
salt being very acid is of a quite differing taste from the 
lixiviate salt of calcined tartar. And though it be not 
truly objected against the chymists, that they obtain all 
salts they make, by reducing the body they work on into 
ashes with violent fires, (since hartshorn, amber, blood, 
and divers other mixts yeeld a copious salt before they 
be burned to ashes) yet this volatile salt differs much, 
as we shall see anon, from the fixt alcalizate salt I speak 
of; which for ought I remember is not producible by any 
known way, without incineration. 'Tis not unknown to 
chymists, that quicksilver may be precipitated, without 
addition, into a dry powder, that remains so in water. 
And some eminent spagyrists, and even Raimund Lully 
himself, teach, that merely by the fire quicksilver may 
in convenient vessels be reduced (at least in great part) 
into a thin liquor like water, and minglable with it. So 
that by the bare action of the fire, 'tis possible, that the 
parts of a mixt body should be so disposed after new 
and differing manners, that it may be sometimes of one 
consistence, sometimes of another; and may in one state 
be disposed to be mingled with water, and in another not. 
I could also shew you, that bodies from which apart 
chymists cannot obtain anything that is combustible, 
may by being associated together, and by the help of the 
fire, afford an inflamable substance. And that on the 
other side, 'tis possible for a body to be inflamable, from 
which it would very much puzzle any ordinary chymist, 
and perhaps any other, to separate an inflamable principle 
or ingredient. Wherefore, since the principles of chymists 
may receive their denominations from qualities, which 
it often exceeds not the power of art, nor alwaies that of 
the fire to produce; and since such qualities may be 

i 



130 The Sceptical Chymist 

found in bodies that differ so much in other qualities from 
one another, that they need not be allowed to agree in 
that pure and simple nature, which principles, to be so 
indeed, must have; it may justly be suspected, that many 
productions of the fire that are shewed us by chymists, as 
the principles of the concrete that afforded them, may 
be but a new kind of mixts. And to annex, on this occa- 
sion, to these arguments taken from the nature of the 
thing, one of those which logicians call ad hominem, 
I shall desire you to take notice, that though Paracelsus 
himself, and some that are so mistaken as to think he 
could not be so, have ventured to teach, that not only the 
bodies here below, but the elements themselves, and all 
the other parts of the universe, are composed of salt, 
sulphur and mercury; yet the learned Sennertus, and all 
the more wary chymists, have rejected that conceit, and 
do many of them confess, that the tria prima are each of 
them made up of the four elements; and others of them 
make earth and water concurr with salt, sulphur and 
mercury, to the constitution of mixt bodies. So that one 
sort of these spagyrists, notwithstanding the specious 
titles they give to the productions of the fire, do in effect 
grant what I contend for. And, of the other sort I may 
well demand, to what kind of bodies the phlegm and dead 
earth, to be met with in chymical resolutions, are to be 
referred? For either they must say, with Paracelsus, 
but against their own concessions, as well as against 
experience, that these are also composed of the tria prima, 
whereof they cannot separate any one from either of them ; 
or else they must confess that two of the vastest bodies 
here below, earth and water, are neither of them com- 
posed of the tria prima; and that consequently those 
three are not the universal and adequate ingredients, 
neither of all sublunary bodies, nor even of all mixt 
bodies. 

I know that the chief of these chymists represent, that 
though the distinct substances into which they divide 
mixt bodies by the fire, are not pure and homogeneous; 
yet since the four elements into which the Aristotelians 
pretend to resolve the like bodies by the same agent, are 



The Sceptical Chymist 1 3 1 

not simple neither, as themselves acknowledge, 'tis as 
allowable for the chymists to call the one principles, as 
for the peripateticks to call the other elements, since in 
both cases the imposition of the name is grounded only 
upon the predominancy of that element whose name is 
ascribed to it. Nor shall I deny, that this argument of 
the chymists is no ill one against the Aristotelians. But 
what answer can it prove to me, who you know am dis- 
puting as well against the Aristotelian elements, as the 
chymical principles, and must not look upon any body 
as a true principle or element, but as yet compounded, 
which is not perfectly homogeneous, but is further 
resoluble into any number of distinct substances how 
small soever. And as for the chymists calling a body 
salt, or sulphur, or mercury, upon pretence that the 
principle of the same name is predominant in it, that 
itself is an acknowledgment of what I contend for; namely 
that these productions of the fire are yet compounded 
bodies. And yet whilst this is granted, it is affirmed, but 
not proved, that the reputed salt, or sulphur, or mercury, 
consists mainly of one body that deserves the name of a 
principle of the same denomination. For how do chymists 
make it appear that there are any such primitive and 
simple bodies in those we are speaking of; since 'tis upon 
the matter confessed by the answer lately made, that 
these are not such? And if they pretend by reason to 
evince what they affirm, what becomes of their confident 
boasts, that the chymist (whom they therefore, after 
Beguinus, call a philosophus or opifex sensatus) can con- 
vince our eyes, by manifestly shewing in any mixt body 
those simple substances he teaches them to be composed 
of? And indeed, for the chymists to have recourse in 
this case to other proofs than experiments, as it is to 
wave the grand argument that has all this while been given 
out for a demonstrative one; so it releases me from the 
obligation to prosecute a dispute wherein I am not engaged 
to examine any but experimental proofs. I know it may 
plausibly enough be represented, in favour of the chymists, 
that it being evident that much the greater part of any- 
thing they call salt, or sulphur, or mercury, is really such; 



132 The Sceptical Chymist 

it would be very rigid to deny those substances the names 
ascribed them, only because of some slight mixture of 
another body; since not only the peripateticks call 
particular parcels of matter elementary, though they 
acknowledge that elements are not to be anywhere found 
pure, at least here below; and since especially there is a 
manifest analogic and resemblance betwixt the bodies 
obtainable by chymical anatomies and the principles 
whose names are given them; I have, I say, considered 
that these things may be represented; but as for what is 
drawn from the custome of the peripateticks, I have 
already told you, that though it may be employed against 
them, yet it is not available against me, who allow nothing 

*S to be an element that is not perfectly homogeneous. And 
whereas it is alledged, that the predominant principle 
ought to give a name to the substance wherein it abounds ; 
I answer, that that might much more reasonably be said, 
if either we or the chymists had seen nature take pure salt, 
pure sulphur, and pure mercury, and compound of them 
every sort of mixt bodies. But, since 'tis to experience 

s that they appeal, we must not take it for granted, that the 
distilled oyle (for instance) of a plant is mainly composed 
of the pure principle called sulphur, till they have given 
us an ocular proof, that there is in that sort of plants 
such an homogeneous sulphur. For as for the specious 
argument, which is drawn from the resemblance betwixt 
the productions of the fire, and the respective, either 
Aristotelian elements, or chymical principles, by whose 
names they are called; it will appear more plausible than 
cogent, if you will but recall to mind the state of the con- 
troversie; which is not, whether or no there be obtained 
from mixt bodies certain substances that agree in outward 
appearance, or in some qualities with quicksilver or 
brimstone, or some such obvious or copious body; but 
whether or no all bodies confessed to be perfectly mixt 
were composed of, and are resoluble into a determinate 
number of primary unmixt bodies. For, if you keep 
the state of the question in your eye, you'l easily discerne 
that there is much of what should be demonstrated, left 
unproved by those chymical experiments we are examin- 



The Sceptical Chymist 133 

ing. But (not to repeat what I have already discovered 
more at large) I shall now take notice, that it will not 
presently follow, that because a production of the fire has 
some affinity with some of the greater masses of matter 
here below, that therefore they are both of the same nature, 
and deserve the same name; for the chymists are not 
content, that flame should be lookt upon as a parcel of the 
element of fire, though it be hot, dry, and active, because 
it wants some other qualities belonging to the nature of 
elementary fire. Nor will they let the peripateticks call 
ashes, or quicklime, earth, notwithstanding the many 
likenesses between them ; because they are not tasteless, as 
elementary earth ought to be : but if you should ask me, 
what then it is, that all the chymical anatomies of bodies 
do prove, if they prove not that they consist of the three 
principles into which the fire resolves them? I answer 
that their dissections may be granted to prove, that some 
mixt bodies (for in many it will not hold) are by the fire, 
when they are included in close vessels, (for that condition 
also is often requisite) dissoluble into several substances 
differing in some qualities, but principally in consistence. 
So that out of most of them may be obtained a fixt 
substance partly saline, and partly insipid, an unctuous 
liquor, and another liquor or more that without being 
unctuous have a manifest taste. Now if chymists will 
agree to call the dry and sapid substance salt, the unctuous 
liquor sulphur, and the other mercury, I shall not much 
quarrel with them for so doing: but if they will tell me 
that salt, sulphur, and mercury, are simple and primary 
bodies whereof each mixt body was actually compounded, 
and which was really in it antecedently to the operation 
of the fire, they must give me leave to doubt whether 
(whatever their other arguments may do) their experi- 
ments prove all this. And if they will also tell me that 
the substances their anatomies are wont to afford them, 
are pure and similar, as principles ought to be, they must 
give me leave to believe my own senses; and their own 
confessions, before their bare assertions. And that you 
may not (Eleutherius) think I deal so rigidly with them, 
because I scruple to take these productions of the fire for 



134 The Sceptical Chymist 

such as the chymists would have them pass for, upon the 
account of their having some affinity with them ; consider 
a little with me, that in regard an element or principle 
ought to be perfectly similar and homogeneous, there is 
no just cause why I should rather give the body proposed 
the name of this or that element or principle, because it 
has a resemblance to it in some obvious quality, rather 
than deny it that name upon the account of divers other 
qualities, wherein the proposed bodies are unlike; and if 
you do but consider what slight and easily producible 
qualities they are that suffice, as I have already more than 
once observed, to denominate a chymical principle or 
an element, you'l not, I hope, think my wariness to be 
destitute either of example, or else of reason. For we 
see that the chymists will not allow the Aristotelians that 
the salt in ashes ought to be called earth, though the saline 
and terrestrial part symbolize in weight, in dryness, in 
fixness and fusibility, only because the one is sapid and 
dissoluble in water, and the other not: besides, we see 
that sapidness and volatility are wont to denominate the 
chymists mercury or spirit; and yet how many bodies, 
think you, may agree in those qualities which may yet be 
of very differing natures, and disagree in qualities either 
more numerous, or more considerable, or both. For not 
only spirit of nitre, aqua fortis, spirit of salt, spirit of oyle 
of vitriol, spirit of allume, spirit of vinegar, and all saline 
liquors distilled from animal bodies, but all the acetous 
spirits of woods freed from their vinegar; all these, I 
say, and many others must belong to the chymists 
mercury, though it appear not why some of them should 
more be comprehended under one denomination than the 
chymists sulphur, or oyle should likewise be; for their 
distilled oyles are also fluid, volatile, and tastable, as well 
as their mercury; nor is it necessary, that their sulphur 
should be unctuous or dissoluble in water, since they 
generally referr spirit of wine to sulphurs, although that 
spirit be not unctuous, and will freely mingle with water. 
So that bare inflamability must constitute the essence 
of the chymists sulphur; as uninflamableness joyned 
with any taste is enough to intitle a distilled liquor to be 



The Sceptical Chymist 135 

their mercury. Now since I can further observe to you, 
that spirit of nitre and spirit of hartshorne being poured 
together will boyle and hisse and tosse up one another 
into the air, which the chymists make signes of great 
antipathy in the natures of bodies, (as indeed these spirits 
differ much both in taste, smell, and operations) since I 
elsewhere tell you of my having made two sorts of oyle 
out of the same man's blood, that would not mingle with 
one another; and since I might tell you divers examples 
I have met with, of the contrariety of bodies which 
according to the chymists must be huddled up together 
under one denomination; I leave you to judge whether 
such a multitude of substances as may agree in these 
slight qualities, and yet disagree in others more consider- 
able, are more worthy to be called by the name of a 
principle (which ought to be pure and homogeneous) 
than to have appellations given them that may make 
them differ, in name too, from the bodies from which 
they so wildly differ in nature. And hence also, by the 
by, you may perceive that 'tis not unreasonable to dis- 
trust the chymists way of argumentation, when being 
unable to shew us that such a liquor is (for example) 
purely saline, they prove, that at least salt is much the 
predominant principle, because that the proposed sub- 
stance is strongly tasted, and all taste proceeds from salt; 
whereas those spirits, such as spirit of tartar, spirit of 
hartshorn, and the like, which are reckoned to be the 
mercuries of the bodies that afford them, have manifestly 
a strong and piercing taste, and so has (according to what 
(I formerly noted the spirit of box, etc. even after the acid 
liquor that concurred to compose it has been separated 
from it. And indeed, if sapidness belong not to the spirit 
or mercurial principle of vegetables and animals: I 
scarce know how it will be discriminated from their 
phlegm, since by the absence of inflamability it must be 
distinguished from their sulphur which affords me another 
example, to prove how unacurate the chymical doctrine 
is in our present case; since not only the spirits of vege- 
tables and animals, but their oyles are very strongly 
tasted, as he that shall but wet his tongue with chymical 



136 The Sceptical Chymist 

oyle of cinnamon or of cloves, or even of turpentine, may 
quickly find, to his smart. And not only I never tryed 
any chymical oyles whose taste was not very manifest and 
strong; but a skilful and inquisitive person who made 
it his business by elaborate operations to depurate 
chymical oyles, and reduce them to an elementary 
simplicity, informes us, that he never was able to make 
them at all tasteless; whence I might inferr, that the 
proof chymists confidently give us of a bodies being 
saline, is so far from demonstrating the predominancy, 
that it does not clearly evince so much as the presence 
of the saline principle in it. But I will not (pursues 
Carneades) remind you, that the volatile salt of hartshorn, 
amber, blood, etc. are exceeding strongly scented, not- 
withstanding that most chymists deduce odours from 
sulphur, and from them argue the predominancy of that 
principle in the odorous body, because I must not so 
much as add any new examples of the incompetency of 
this sort of chymical arguments; since having already 
detained you but too long in those generals that appertain 
to my fourth consideration 'tis time that I proceed to the 
particulars themselves, to which I thought fit they should 
be previous. 

These generals (continues Carneades) being thus pre- 
mised, we might the better survey the unlikeness that an 
/ attentive and unprepossessed observer may take notice of 
in each sort of bodies which the chymists are wont to call 
the salts or sulphurs or mercuries of the concretes that 
yeeld them, as if they had all a simplicity, and identity 
of nature: whereas salts if they were all elementary 
would as little differ as do the drops of pure and simple 
water. 'Tis known that both chymists and physitians 
ascribe to the fixt salts of calcined bodies the vertues of 
their concretes; and consequently very differing opera- 
tions. So we find the alcali of wormwood much com- 
mended in distempers of the stomach; that of eyebright 
for those that have a weak sight; and that of guajacum 
(of which a great quantity yeelds but a very little salt) 
is not only much commended in venereal diseases, but is 
believed to have a peculiar purgative vertue, which yet 



The Sceptical Chymist 1 37 

I have not had occasion to try. And though, I confess, 
I have long thought, that these alcalizate salts are, for 
the most part, very near of kin, and retain very little 
of the properties of the concretes whence they were 
separated; yet being minded to observe watchfully 
whether I could meet with any exceptions to this general 
observation, I observed at the glass-house, that some- 
times the metal (as the workmen call it) or mass of colli- 
quated ingredients, which by blowing they fashion into 
vessels of divers shapes, did sometimes prove of a very 
differing colour, and a somewhat differing texture, from 
what was usual. And having enquired whether the 
cause of such accidents might not be derived from the 
peculiar nature of the fixt salt employed to bring the sand 
to fusion, I found that the knowingst workmen imputed 
these misadventures to the ashes, of some certain kind 
of wood, as having observed the ignobler kind of glass 
I lately mentioned to be frequently produced, when they 
had employed such sorts of ashes, which therefore they 
scruple to make use of, if they took notice of them before- 
hand. I remember also, that an industrious man of my 
acquaintance having bought a vast quantity of tobacco 
stalks to make a fixt salt with, I had the curiosity to 
go see whether that exotick plant, which so much 
abounds in volatile salt, would afford a peculiar kind of 
alcali; and I was pleased to find that in the lixivium of 
it, it was not necessary, as is usual, to evaporate all the 
liquor, that there might be obtained a saline calx, consist- 
ing like lime quenched in the air of a heap of little cor- 
puscles of unregarded shapes : but the fixt salt shot into 
figured chrystal, almost as nitre or sal armoniack and 
other uncalcined salts are wont to do; and I further 
remember that I have observed that in the fixt salt of 
urine, brought by depuration to be very white, a taste not 
so unlike to that of common salt, and very differing from 
the wonted caustick lixiviate taste of other salts made by 
incineration. But because the instances I have alledged 
of the difference of alcalizate salt are but few, and there- 
fore I am still inclined to think, that most chymists and 
many physitians do, inconsiderately enough and without 



138 The Sceptical Chymist 

warrant from experience, ascribe the vertues of the 
concretes exposed to calcination, to the salts obtained 
by it; I shall rather to shew the disparity of salts mention 
in the first place the apparent difference betwixt the 
vegetable fixt salts and the animal volatile ones: as (for 
example) betwixt salt of tartar, and salt of hartshorn; 
whereof the former is so fixt that 'twill indure the brunt 
of a violent fire, and stand in fusion like a metal; whereas 
the other (besides that it has a differing taste and a very 
differing smell) is so far from being fixt, that it will fly 
away in a gentle heat as easily as spirit of wine itself. And 
to this I shall add, in the next place, that even among the 
volatile salts themselves, there is a considerable difference, 
as appears by the distinct properties of (for instance) 
salt of amber, salt of urine, salt of man's skull, (so much 
extolled against the falling sickness) and divers others 
which cannot escape an ordinary observer. And this 
diversity of volatile salts I have observed to be sometimes 
discernable even to the eye, in their figures. For the salt 
of hartshorn I have observed to adhere to the receiver 
in the forme almost of a parallelipipedon ; and of the 
volatile salt of humane blood (long digested before dis- 
tillation, with spirit of wine) I can shew you store of 
grains of that figure which geometricians call a rhombus; 
though I dare not undertake that the figures of these or 
other saline chrystals (if I may so call them) will be 
alwaies the same, whatever degree of fire have been 
employed to force them up, or how hastily soever they 
have been made to convene in the spirits or liquors, in the 
lower part of which I have usually observed them after 
a while to shoot. And although, as I lately told you, I 
seldom found any difference, as to medical vertues, in 
the fixt salts of divers vegetables; and accordingly I have 
suspected that most of these volatile salts, having so great 
a resemblance in smell, in taste, and fugitiveness, differ 
but little, if at all, in their medicinal properties : as indeed 
I have found them generally to agree in divers of them 
(as in their being somewhat diaphoretick and very deopila- 
tive) yet I remember Helmont somewhere informs us, 
that there is this difference betwixt the saline spirit of 



The Sceptical Chymist 139 

urine and that of man's blood, that the former will not 
cure the epilepsy, but the latter will. Of the efficacy 
also of the salt of common amber against the same disease 
in children, (for in grown persons it is not a specifick) I may 
elsewhere have an occasion to entertain you. And when 
I consider that to the obtaining of these volatile salts 
(especially that of urine) there is not requisite such a 
destructive violence of the fire, as there is to get those 
salts that must be made by incineration, I am the more 
invited to conclude, that they may differ from one another 
and consequently recede from an elementary simplicity. 
And, if I could here shew you what Mr. Boyle has observed, 
touching the various chymical distinctions of salts; you 
would quickly discern, not only that chymists do give 
themselves a strange liberty to call concretes salts, that 
are according to their own rules to be looked upon as 
very compounded bodies; but that among those very 
salts that seem elementary, because produced upon the 
anatomy of the bodies that yeeld them, there is not only 
a visible disparity, but, to speak in the common language, 
a manifest antipathy or contrariety: as is evident in the 
ebullition and hissing that is wont to ensue, when the acid 
spirit of vitriol, for instance, is poured upon hot ashes, or 
salt of tartar. And I shall beg leave of this gentleman, 
(saies Carneades) casting his eyes on me, to let me observe 
to you out of some of his papers, particularly those wherein 
he treats of some preparations of urine, that not only one 
and the same body may have two salts of a contrary 
nature, as he exemplifies in the spirit and alkali of nitre; 
but that from the same body there may without addition 
be obtained three differing and visible salts. For he 
relates, that he observed in urine, not only a volatile and 
chrystalline salt, and a fixt salt, but likewise a kind of 
sal armoniack, or such a salt as would sublime in the form 
of a salt, and therefore was not fixt, and yet was far from 
being so fugitive as the volatile salt; from which it seemed 
also otherwise to differ. I have indeed suspected that 
this may be a sal armoniack properly enough so called, as 
compounded of the volatile salt of urine, and the fixt 
of the same liquor, which, as I noted, is not unlike sea- 



140 The Sceptical Chymist 

salt; but that itself argues a manifest difference betwixt 
the salts, since such a volatile salt is not wont to unite 
thus with an ordinary alcali, but to fly away from it in 
the heat. And on this occasion I remember, that to give 
some of my friends an ocular proof of the difference 
betwixt the fixt and volatile salt of (the same concrete) 
wood, I devised the following experiment. I took 
common Venetian sublimate, and dissolved as much of it 
as I well could in fair water : then I took wood ashes, and 
pouring on them warme water, dissolved their salt; and 
filtrating the water, as soon as I found the lixivium suffi- 
ciently sharp upon the tongue, I reserved it for use: 
then one part of the former solution of sublimate dropping 
a little of this dissolved fixt salt of wood, the liquors 
presently turned of an orange colour; but upon the other 
part of the clear solution of sublimate putting some of the 
volatile salt of wood (which abounds in the spirit of soot) 
the liquor immediately turned white, almost like milke, 
and after a while let fall a white sediment, as the other 
liquor did a yellow one. To all this that I have said 
concerning the difference of salts, I might add what I 
formerly told you, concerning the simple spirit of box, 
and such like woods, which differ much from the other 
salts hitherto mentioned, and yet would belong to the 
saline principle, if chymists did truly teach that all tastes 
proceed from it. And I might also annex, what I noted 
to you out of Helmont concerning bodies, which, though 
they consist in great part of chymical oyles, do yet appear 
but volatile salts; but to insist on these things, were to 
repeat; and therefore I shall proceed. 

This disparity is also highly eminent in the separated 
sulphurs or chymical oyles of things. For they contain 
so much of the scent, and taste, and vertues, of the bodies 
whence they were drawn, that they seem to be but the 
material crasis (if I may so speak) of their concretes. 
Thus the oyles of cinnamon, cloves, nutmegs and other 
spices, seem to be but the united aromatick parts that did 
ennoble those bodies. And 'tis a known thing, that oyl 
of cinnamon, and oyle of cloves, (which I have likewise 
observed in the oyles of several woods) will sink to the 



The Sceptical Chymist 141 

bottom of water: whereas those of nutmegs and divers 
other vegetables will swim upon it. The oyle (abusively 
called spirit) of roses swims at the top of the water in the 
forme of a white butter, which I remember not to have 
observed in any other oyle drawn in any limbeck; yet 
there is a way (not here to be declared) by which I have 
seen it come over in the forme of other aromatick oyles, 
to the delight and wonder of those that beheld it. In 
oyle of aniseseeds, which I drew both with, and without 
fermentation, I observed the whole body of the oyle in 
a cool place to thicken into the consistence and appearance 
of white butter, which with the least heat resumed its 
former liquidness. In the oyle of olive drawn over in a 
retort, I have likewise more than once seen a spontaneous 
coagulation in the receiver: and I have of it by me thus 
congealed; which is of such a strangely penetrating scent, 
as if 'twould perforate the noses that approach it. The 
like pungent odour I also observed in the distilled liquor 
of common sope, which forced over from minium, lately 
afforded an oyle of a most admirable penetrancy; and he 
must be a great stranger, both to the writings and prepara- 
tions of chymists, that sees not in the oyles they distill 
from vegetables and animals, a considerable and obvious 
difference. Nay I shall venture to add, Eleutherius (what 
perhaps you will think of kin to a paradox) that divers 
times out of the same animal or vegetable, there may be 
extracted oyles of natures obviously differing. To which 
purpose I shall not insist on the swimming and sinking 
oyles, which I have sometimes observed to float on, and 
subside under the spirit of guajacum, and that of divers 
other vegetables distilled with a strong and lasting fire; 
nor shall I insist on the observation elsewhere mentioned, 
of the divers and unmingleable oyles afforded us by 
humane blood long fermented and digested with spirit of 
wine, because these kind of oyles may seem chiefly to 
differ in consistence and weight, being all of them high 
coloured and adust. But the experiment, which I devised 
to make out this difference of the oyles of the same 
vegetable, ad oculum, (as they speak) was this that f ollowes. 
I took a pound of aniseseeds, and having grosly beaten 



142 The Sceptical Chymist 

them, caused them to be put into a very large glass retort 
almost filled with fair water; and placing this retort in 
a sand furnace, I caused a very gentle heat to be adminis- 
tred during the first day, and a great part of the second, 
till the water was for the most part drawn off, and had 
brought over with it at least most of the volatile and 
aromatick oyle of the seeds. And then encreasing the 
fire, and changing the receiver, I obtained besides an 
empyreumatical spirit, a quantity of adust oyle; whereof 
a little floated upon the spirit, and the rest was more 
heavy, and not easily separable from it. And whereas 
these oyles were very dark, and smelled (as chymists 
speak) so strongly of the fire, that their odour did not 
betray from what vegetables they had been forced; the 
other aromatick oyle was enriched with the genuine smell 
and taste of the concrete ; and spontaneously coagulating 
itself into white butter did manifest itself to be the true 
oyle of aniseseeds; which concrete I therefore chose to 
employ about this experiment, that the difference of these 
oyles might be more conspicuous than it would have been, 
had I instead of it destilled another vegetable. 

I had almost forgot to take notice, that there is another 
sort of bodies, which though not obtained from concretes 
by distillation, many chymists are wont to call their 
sulphur; not only because such substances are, for the 
most part, high coloured, (whence they are also, and that 
more properly, called tinctures) as dissolved sulphurs are 
wont to be; but especially because they are, for the most 
part, abstracted and separated from the rest of the mass 
by spirit of wine : which liquor those men supposing to be 
sulphureous, they conclude, that what it works upon, and 
abstracts, must be a sulphur also. And upon this account 
they presume, that they can sequester the sulphur even 
of minerals and metalls; from which 'tis known that they 
cannot by fire alone separate it. To all this I shall answer; 
That if these sequestred substances were indeed the 
sulphurs of the bodies whence they are drawn, there 
would as well be a great disparity betwixt chymical 
sulphurs obtained by spirit of wine, as I have already 
shewn there is betwixt those obtained by distillation in 



The Sceptical Chymist 143 

the forme of oyles: which will be evident from hence, 
that not to urge that themselves ascribe distinct vertues 
to mineral tincture, extolling the tincture of gold against 
such and such diseases; the tincture of antimony, or of 
its glass, against others; and the tincture of emerald 
against others; 'tis plain, that in tinctures drawn from 
vegetables, if the superfluous spirit of wine be distilled 
off, it leaves at the bottom that thicker substance which 
chymists use to call the extract of the vegetable. And 
that these extracts are endowed with very differing 
qualities according to the nature of the particular bodies 
that afforded them (though I fear seldom with so much 
of the specifick vertues as is wont to be imagined) is freely 
confessed both by physitians and chymists. But Eleu- 
therius (saies Carneades) we may here take notice that 
the chymists do as well in this case, as in many others 
allow themselves a license to abuse words: for not again 
to argue from the differing properties of tinctures, that 
they are not exactly pure and elementary sulphurs ; they 
would easily appear not to be so much as sulphur's, 
although we should allow chymical oyles to deserve that 
name. For however in some mineral tinctures the 
natural fixtness of the extracted body does not alwaies 
suffer it to be easily further resoluble into differing sub- 
stances ; yet in very many extracts drawn from vegetables, 
it may very easily be manifested that the spirit of wine 
has not sequestred the sulphureous ingredient from the 
saline and mercurial ones; but has dissolved (for I take 
it to be a solution) the finer parts of the concrete (without 
making any nice distinction of their being perfectly 
sulphureous or not) and united itself with them into 
a kind of magistery which consequently must contain 
ingredients or parts of several sorts. For we see that the 
stones that are rich in vitriol, being often drenched with 
rain-water, the liquor will then extract a fine and trans- 
parent substance coagulable into vitriol; and yet though 
this vitriol be readily dissoluble in water, it is not a true 
elementary salt, but, as you know, a body resoluble into 
very differing parts, whereof one (as I shall have occasion 
to tell you anon) is yet of a metalline, and consequently 



144 The Sceptical Chymist 

not of an elementary nature. You may consider also, 
that common sulphur is readily dissoluble in oyle of 
turpentine, though notwithstanding its name it abounds 
as well, if not as much, in salt as in true sulphur; witness 
the great quantity of saline liquor it affords being set to 
flame away under a glass bell. Nay I have, which perhaps 
you will think strange, with the same oyle of turpentine 
alone easily enough dissolved crude antimony finely 
powdered into a blood-red balsam, wherewith perhaps 
considerable things may be performed in surgery. And 
if it were now requisite, I could tell you of some other 
bodies, (such as perhaps you would not suspect) that I 
have been able to work upon with certain chymical oyles. 
But instead of digressing further I shall make this use of 
the example I have named. That 'tis not unlikely, but 
that spirit of wine which by its pungent taste, and by 
some other qualities that argue it better, (especially its 
reducibleness, according to Helmont, into alcali and 
water), seems to be as well of a saline as of a sulphureous 
nature, may well be supposed capable of dissolving sub- 
stances that are not merely elementary sulphurs, though 
perhaps they may abound with parts that are of kin 
thereunto. For I find that spirit of wine will dissolve 
gumm lacca, benzoine, and the resinous parts of jallap, and 
even of guajacum ; whence we may well suspect that it 
may from spices, herbs, and other less compacted vege- 
tables, extract substances that are not perfect sulphurs 
but mixt bodies. And to put it past dispute, there is 
many a vulgar extract drawn with spirit of wine, which 
committed to distillation will afford such differing sub- 
stances as will loudly proclaim it to have been a very 
compounded body. So that we may justly suspect, that 
even in mineral tinctures it will not alwaies follow, that 
because a red substance is drawn from the concrete by 
spirit of wine, that substance is its true and elementary 
sulphur. And though some of these extracts may perhaps 
be inflamable; yet, besides that others are not, and be- 
sides that their being reduced to such minuteness of parts 
may much facilitate their taking fire; besides this, I say, 
we see that common sulphur, common oyle, gumm lac, 



The Sceptical Chymist 145 

and many unctuous and resinous bodies, will flame well 
enough, though they be of very compounded natures: 
nay travellers of unsuspected credit assure us, as a known 
thing, that in some northern countries where firr trees and 
pines abound, the poorer sort of inhabitants use long 
splinters of those resinous woods to burn instead of 
candles. And as for the redness wont to be met with in 
such solutions, I could easily shew, that 'tis not necessary 
it should proceed from the sulphur of the concrete, dis- 
solved by the spirit of wine; if I had leasure to manifest 
how much chymists are wont to delude themselves and 
others, by the ignorance of those other causes, upon whose 
account spirit of wine and other menstruum may acquire 
a red or some other high colour. But to returne to our 
chymical oyles, supposing that they were exactly pure ; yet 
I hope they would be, as the best spirit of wine is, but the 
more inflamable and deflagrable. And therefore since 
an oyle can be by the fire alone immediately turned into 
flame, which is something of a very differing nature from 
it: I shall demand how this oyle can be a primogeneal 
and incorruptible body, as most chymists would have 
their principles ; since it is further resoluble into flame, 
which whether or no it be a portion of the element of fire, 
as an Aristotelian would conclude, is certainly something 
of a very differing nature from a chymical oyle, since it 
burnes, and shines, and mounts swiftly upwards; none 
of which a chymical oyle does, whilst it continues such. 
And if it should be objected, that the dissipated parts of 
this flaming oyle may be caught and collected again into 
oyl or sulphur; I shall demand, what chymist appears 
to have ever done it; and without examining whether 
it may not hence be as well said that sulphur is but com- 
pacted fire, as that fire is but diffused sulphur, I shall 
leave you to consider whether it may not hence be argued, 
that neither fire nor sulphur are primitive and indestruc- 
tible bodies; and I shall further observe that at least 
it will hence appear, that a portion of matter may, without 
being compounded with new ingredients, by having the 
texture and motion of its small parts changed, be easily, 
by the means of the fire, endowed with new qualities, more 

K 



146 The Sceptical Chymist 

differing from them it had before, than are those which 
suffice to discriminate the chymists principles from one 
another. 

We are next to consider, whether in the anatomy of 
mixt bodies, that which chymists call the mercurial part 
of them be uncompounded, or no. But to tell you true, 
though chymists do unanimously affirm that their reso- 
lutions discover a principle, which they call mercury, yet 
I find them to give of it descriptions so differing, and so 
aenigmatical, that I, who am not ashamed to confess that 
I cannot understand what is not sence, must acknowledge 
to you that I know not what to make of them. Paracelsus 
himself, and therefore, as you will easily believe, many 
of his followers, does somewhere call that mercury which 
ascends upon the burning of wood, as the peripateticks 
are wont to take the same smoake for air; and so seems 
to define mercury by volatility, or (if I may coyne such 
a word) effumability. But since, in this example, both 
volatile salt and sulphur make part of the smoake, which 
does indeed consist also both of phlegmatick and terrene 
corpuscles, this notion is not to be admitted; and I find 
that the more sober chymists themselves disavow it. Yet 
to shew you how little of clearness we are to expect in the 
accounts even of later spagyrists, be pleased to take 
notice, that Beguinus, even in his Tyrocinium Chymicum, 
written for the instruction of novices, when he comes to 
tell us what are meant by the tria prima, which for their 
being principles ought to be defined the more accurately 
and plainly, gives us this description of mercury; " Mer- 
curius (saies he) est liquor ille acidus, permeabilis, penetra- 
bilis, aethereus, ac purissimus, a quo omnis nutricatio, 
sensus, motus, vires, colores, senectutisque prseproperse 
retardatio." Which words are not so much a definition 
of it, as an encomium : and yet Quercetanus in his descrip- 
tion of the same principle adds to these divers other 
epithets. But both of them, to skip very many other 
faults that may be found with their metaphorical de- 
scriptions, speak incongruously to the chymists own 
principles. For if mercury be an acid liquor, either 
hermetical philosophy must err in ascribing all tastes 



The Sceptical Chymist 147 

to salt, or else mercury must not be a principle, but 
compounded of a saline ingredient and somewhat else. 
Libavius, though he find great fault with the obscurity 
of what the chymists write concerning their mercurial 
principle, does yet but give us such a negative description 
of it, as Sennertus, how favourable soever to the tria prima, 
is not satisfied with. And this Sennertus himself, though 
the learnedest champion for the hypostatical principles, 
does almost as frequently as justly complain of the 
unsatisfactoriness of what the chymists teach concerning 
their mercury; and yet he himself (but with his wonted 
modesty) substitutes instead of the description of Libavius, 
another, which many readers, especially if they be not 
peripateticks, will not know what to make of. For scarce 
telling us any more, than that in all bodies that which is 
found besides salt and sulphur, and the elements, or, as 
they call them, phlegm and dead earth, is that spirit 
which in Aristotle's language may be called ova-La dvaAoyw 
rfi aa-rpuv oroix<p. He saies that which I confess 
is not at all satisfactory to me, who do not love to seem 
to acquiesce in any man's mystical doctrines, that I may 
be thought to understand them. 

If (saies Eleutherius) I durst presume that the same 
thing would be thought clear by me, and those that are 
fond of such cloudy expressions as you justly tax the 
chymists for, I should venture to offer to consideration, 
whether or no, since the mercurial principle that arises 
from distillation is unanimously asserted to be distinct 
from the salt and sulphur of the same concrete, that may 
not be called the mercury of a body, which though it 
ascend in distillation, as do the phleg;me and sulphur, is 
neither insipid like the former, nor inflamable like the 
latter. And therefore I would substitute to the too much 
abused name of mercury, the more clear and familiar 
appellation of spirit^ which is also now very much made 
use of even b~y"~tne chymists themselves of our times, 
though they have not given us so distinct an explication, 
as were fit, of what may be called the spirit of a mixt 
body. 

I should not perhaps (saies Carneades) much quarrel 



148 The Sceptical Chymist 

with your notion of mercury. But as for the chymists, 
what they can mean, with congruity to their own principles, 
by the mercury of animals and vegetables, 'twill not be so 
easie to find out; for they ascribe tastes only to the saline 
principle, and consequently would be much put to it to 
shew what liquor it is, in the resolution of bodies, that 
not being insipid, for that they call phlegme, neither is 
inflamable as oyle or sulphur, nor has any taste; which 
according to them must proceed from a mixture, at least, 
of salt. And if we should take spirit in the sence of the 
word received among modern chymists and physitians, 
for any distilled liquor that is neither phlegme nor oyle, 
the appellation would yet appear ambiguous enough. 
For plainly, that which first ascends in the distillation 
of wine and fermented liquors, is generally as well by 
chymists as others reputed a spirit. And yet pure spirit 
of wine being wholly inflamable ought according to them 
to be reckoned to the sulphureous, not the mercurial 
principle. And among the other liquors that go under 
the name of spirits, there are divers which seem to belong 
to the family of salts, such as are the spirits of nitre, 
vitriol, sea-salt and others, and even the spirit of harts- 
horn, being, as I have tryed, in great part, if not totally 
reducible into salt and phlegme, may be suspected to be 
but a volatile salt disguised by the phlegme mingled with 
it into the forme of a liquor. However if this be a spirit, 
it manifestly differs very much from that of vinegar, the 
taste of the one being acid, and the other salt, and their 
mixture in case they be very pure, sometimes occasioning 
an effervescence like that of those liquors the chymists 
count most contrary to one another. And even among 
those liquors that seem to have a better title, than those 
hitherto mentioned, to the name of spirits, there appears 
a sensible diversity; for spirit of oak, for instance, differs 
from that of tartar, and this from that of box, or of 
guajacum. And in short, even these spirits as well as 
other distilled liquors manifest a great disparity betwixt 
themselves, either in their actions on our senses, or in their 
other operations. 
And (continues Carneades) besides this disparity that 



The Sceptical Chymist 149 

is to be met with among those liquors that the moderns 
call spirits, and take for similar bodies, what I have 
formerly told you concerning the spirit of boxwood may 
let you see that some of those liquors not only have 
qualities very differing from others, but may be further 
resolved into substances differing from one another. 

And since many moderne chymists and other naturalists 
are pleased to take the mercurial spirit of bodies for the 
same principle, under differing names, I must invite you 
to observe, with me, the great difference that is conspi- 
cuous betwixt all the vegetable and animal spirits I have 
mentioned and running mercury. I speak not of that 
which is commonly sold in shops that many of themselves 
will confesse to be a mixt body; but of that which is 
separated from metals, which by some chymists that 
seem more philosophers than the rest, and especially by 
the above mentioned Claveus, is (for distinction sake) 
called mercurius corporum. Now this metalline liquor 
being one of those three principles of which mineral bodies 
are by spagyrists affirmed to be composed and to be 
resoluble into them, the many notorious differences 
betwixt them and the mercuries, as they call them, of 
vegetables and animals will allow me to inferr, either that 
minerals and the other two sorts of mixt bodies consist 
not of the same elements, or that those principles where- 
into minerals are immediately resolved, which chymists 
with great ostentation shew us as the true principles of 
them, are but secondary principles, or mixts of a peculiar 
sort, which must be themselves reduced to a very differing 
forme, to be of the same kind with vegetable and animal 
liquors. 

But this is not all; for although I formerly told you 
how little credit there is to be given to the chymical 
processes commonly to be met with, of extracting the 
mercuries of metals, yet I will now add, that supposing 
that the more judicious of them do not untruly affirme 
that they have really drawn true and running mercury 
from several metals (which I wish they had clearly taught 
us how to do also,) yet it may be still doubted whether 
such extracted mercuries do not as well differ from 



150 The Sceptical Chymist 

common quicksilver, and from one another, as from the 
mercuries of vegetables and animals. Claveus, in his 
Apology, speaking of some experiments whereby metalline 
mercuries may be fixt into the nobler metals, adds, that 
he spake of the mercuries drawn from metals; because 
common quicksilver by reason of its excessive coldness 
and moisture is unfit for that particular kind of operation; 
for which though a few lines before he prescribes in general 
the mercuries of metalline bodies, yet he chiefly commends 
that drawn by art from silver. And elsewhere, in the 
same book, he tells us, that he himself tryed, that by 
bare coction the quicksilver of tin or pewter (argentum 
vivum ex stanno prolicitum) may by an efficient cause, 
(as he speaks) be turned into pure gold. And the experi- 
enced Alexander van Suchten, somewhere tells us, that 
by a way he intimates may be made a mercury of copper, 
not of the silver colour of other mercuries, but green; 
to which I shall add, that an eminent person, whose name 
his travells and learned writings have made famous, lately 
assured me that he had more than once seen the mercury 
of lead (which whatever authors promise, you will find 
it very difficult to make, at least in any considerable 
quantity) fixt into perfect gold. And being by me 
demanded whether or no any other mercury would not 
as well have been changed by the same operations, he 
assured me of the negative. 

And since I am fallen upon the mention of the mercuries 
of metals, you will perhaps expect, (Eleutherius) that I 
should say something of their two other principles; but 
I must freely confess to you, that what disparity there 
may be between the salts and sulphurs of metals or other 
minerals, I am not myself experienced enough in the 
separations and examens of them, to venture to determine : 
(for as for the salts of metals, I formerly represented it 
as a thing much to be questioned, whether they have any 
at all.) And for the processes of separation I find in 
authors, if they were (what many of them are not) success- 
fully practicable, as I noted above, yet they are to be 
performed by the assistance of other bodies, so hardly, 
if upon any termes at all, separable from them, that it is 



The Sceptical Chymist 151 

very difficult to give the separated principles all their due, 
and no more. But the sulphur of antimony which is 
vehemently vomitive, and the strongly scented anodyne 
sulphur of vitriol inclines me to think that not only 
mineral sulphurs differ from vegetable ones, but also 
from one another, retaining much of the nature of their 
concretes. The salts of metals, and of some sort of 
minerals, you will easily guesse (by the doubts I formerly 
expressed, whether metals have any salt at all) that I 
have not been so happy as yet to see, perhaps not for want 
of curiosity. But if Paracelsus did alwaies write so 
consentaneously to himself that his opinion were confi- 
dently to be collected from every place of his writings 
where he seems to expresse it, I might safely take upon 
me to tell you, that he both countenances in general what 
I have delivered in my fourth main consideration, and in 
particular warrants me to suspect that there may be a 
difference in metalline and mineral salts, as well as we 
find it in those of other bodies. For, " Sulphur (saies he) 
aliud in auro, aliud in argento, aliud in ferro, aliud in 
plumbo,stanno,etc. sic aliud in saphyro, aliud in smaragdo, 
aliud in rubino, chrysolitho, amethysto, magnete, etc. 
Item aliud in lapidibus, silice, salibus, fontibus, etc. nee 
vero tot sulphura tan turn, sed et totidem salia; sal aliud 
in metallis, aliud in gemmis, aliud in lapidibus, aliud in 
salibus, aliud in vitriolo, aliud in alumine: similis etiam 
mercurii est ratio. Alius in metallis, alius in gemmis, etc. 
Ita ut unicuique speciei suus peculiaris mercurius sit. 
Et tamen res saltern tres sunt; una essentia est sulphur; 
una est sal; una est mercurius. Addo quod et specialius 
adhuc singula dividantur; aurum enim non unum, sed 
multiplex, ut et non unum pyrum, pomum, sed idem 
multiplex, totidem etiam sulphura auri, salia auri, 
mercurii auri; idem competit etiam metallis et gemmis; 
ut quot saphyri prsestantiores, laeviores, etc. tot etiam 
saphyrica sulphura, saphyrica salia, saphyrici mercurii, etc. 
Idem verum etiam est de turconibus et gemmis aliis 
universis." From which passage (Eleutherius) I suppose 
you will think I might without rashness conclude, either 
that my opinion is favoured by that of Paracelsus, or that 



152 The Sceptical Chymist 

Paracelsus his opinion was not alwaies the same. But 
because in divers other places of his writings he seems to 
talk at a differing rate of the three principles and the four 
elements, I shall content myself to inferr from the alledged 
passage, that if his doctrine be not consistent with that 
part of mine which it is brought to countenance, it is very 
difficult to know what his opinion concerning salt, sulphur 
and mercury, was; and that consequently we had reason 
about the beginning of our conferences, to decline taking 
upon us, either to examine or oppose it. 

I know not whether I should on this occasion add, that 
those very bodies, the chymists call phlegme and earth, 
do yet recede from an elementary simplicity. That 
common earth and water frequently do so, notwithstand- 
ing the received contrary opinion, is not denyed by the 
more wary of the moderne peripateticks themselves: 
and certainly most earths are much less simple bodies 
than is commonly imagined even by chymists, who do not 
so considerately to prescribe and employ earths promis- 
cuously in those distillations that require the mixture 
of some caput mortuum, to hinder the flowing together 
of the matter, and to retain its grosser parts. For I have 
found some earths to yeeld by distillation a liquor very 
far from being inodorous or insipid; and 'tis a known 
observation that most kinds of fat earth kept covered 
from the rain, and hindred from spending themselves 
in the production of vegetables, will in time become 
impregnated with salt petre. 

But I must remember that the water and earths I 
ought here to speak of, are such as are separated from 
mixt bodies by the fire; and therefore to restrain my 
discourse to such, I shall tell you, that we see the phlegme 
of vitriol (for instance) is a very effectual remedie against 
burnes; and I know a very famous and experienced 
physitian, whose unsuspected secret (himself confessed 
to me) it is, for the discussing of hard and obstinate 
tumours. The phlegme of vinegar, though drawn exceed- 
ing leasurely in a digesting furnace, I have purposely 
made tryal of; and sometimes found it able to draw, 
though slowly, a saccharine sweetness out of lead; and 



The Sceptical Chymist 1 5 3 

as I remember by long digestion, I dissolved corals in it. 
The phlegme of the sugar of saturne is said to have very 
peculiar properties. Divers eminent chymists teach, 
that it will dissolve pearls, which being precipitated by 
the spirit of the same concrete are thereby (as they say) 
rendred volatile; which has been confirmed to me, upon 
his own observation, by a person of great veracity. The 
phlegme of wine, and indeed divers other liquors that are 
indiscriminately condemned to be cast away as phlegm, 
are endowed with qualities that make them differ both 
from mere water, and from each other; and whereas the 
chymists are pleased to call the caput mortuum of what 
they have distilled (after they have by affusion of water 
drawn away its salt) terra damnata, or earth, it may be 
doubted whether or no those earths are all of them 
perfectly alike: and it is scarce to be doubted, but that 
there are some of them which remain yet unreduced to an 
elementary nature. The ashes of wood deprived of all 
the salt, and bone-ashes, or calcined hartshorn, which 
refiners choose to make tests of, as freest from salt, seem 
unlike : and he that shall compare either of these insipid 
ashes to lime, and much more to the calx of talck, (though 
by the affusion of water they be exquisitely dulcifyed) 
will perhaps see cause to think them things of a somewhat 
differing nature. And it is evident in colcothar that the 
exactest calcination, followed by an exquisite dulcification, 
does not alwaies reduce the remaining body into elemen- 
tary earth; for after the salt or vitriol (if the calcination 
have been too faint) is drawn out of the calcothar, the 
residue is not earth, but a mixt body, rich in medical 
vertues (as experience has informed me) and which 
Angelus Sala afnrmes to be partly reducible into malleable 
copper; which I judge very probable; for though when 
I was making experiments upon colcothar, I was destitute 
of a furnace capable of giving a heat intense enough to 
bring such a calx to fusion; yet having conjectured that 
if colcothar abounded with that metal, aquafortis would 
find it out there, I put some dulcified colcothar into that 
menstruum, and found the liquor according to my expec- 
tation presently coloured as highly as if it had been an 
ordinary solution of copper. 



THE FIFTH PART 

HERE Carneades making a pause, I must not deny (saies 
, his friend to him) that I think you have sufficiently proved 
*** that these distinct substances which chymists are wont 
to obtain from mixt bodies, by their vulgar distillation, 
are not pure and simple enough to deserve, in rigor of 
speaking, the name of elements, or principles. But I 
suppose you have heard, that there are some modern 
spagyrists, who give out that they can by further and 
more skilfull purifications, so reduce the separated 
ingredients of mixt bodies to an elementary simplicity, 
that the oyles (for instance) extracted from all mixts shall 
as perfectly resemble one another, as the drops of water do. 
If you remember (replies Carneades) that at the begin- 
ning of our conference with Philoponus, I declared to him 
before the rest of the company, that I would not engage 
myself at present to do any more than examine the usual 
proofs alledged by chymists, for the vulgar doctrine of 
their three hypostatical principles; you will easily 
perceive that I am not obliged to make answer to what 
you newly proposed; and that it rather grants, than 
disproves what I have been contending for: since by 
pretending to make so great a change in the reputed 
principles that distillation affords the common spagyrists, 
'tis plainly enough presupposed, that before such artificial 
depurations be made, the substances to be made more 
simple were not yet simple enough to be looked upon as 
elementary; wherefore in case the artists you speak of 
could perform what they give out they can, yet I should 
not need to be ashamed of having questioned the vulgar 
opinion touching the tria prima. And as to the thing 
itself, I shall freely acknowledge to you, that I love not 
to be forward in determining things to be impossible, till 
I know and have considered the means by which they are 
proposed to be effected. And therefore I shall not 
peremptorily deny either the possibility of what these 

154 



The Sceptical Chymist 155 

artists promise, or my assent to any just inference; how- 
ever destructive to my conjectures, that may be drawn 
from their performances. But give me leave to tell you 
withall, that because such promises are wont (as experi- 
ence has more than once informed me) to be much 
more easily made, than made good by chymists, I must 
withhold my belief from their assertions, till their experi- 
ments exact it; and must not be so easie as to expect 
beforehand, an unlikely thing upon no stronger induce- 
ments than are yet given me : besides that I have not yet 
found by what I have heard of these artists, that though 
they pretend to bring the several substances into which 
the fire has divided the concrete, to an exquisite sim- 
plicity, they pretend also to be able by the fire to divide 
all concretes, minerals, and others, into the same number 
of distinct substances. And in the meantime I must 
think it improbable, that they can either truly separate 
as many differing bodies from gold (for instance) or 
ostiocolla, as we can do from wine, or vitriol; or that 
the mercury (for example) of gold or saturn would be 
perfectly of the same nature with that of hartshorn; and 
that the sulphur of antimony would be but numerically 
different from the distilled butter or oyle of roses. 

But suppose (saies Eleutherius) that you should meet 
with chymists, who would allow you to take in earth and 
water into the number of the principles of mixt bodies; 
and being also content to change the ambiguous name 
of mercury for that more intelligible one of spirit, should 
consequently make the principles of compound bodies 
to be five; "would you not think it something hard to 
reject so plausible an opinion, only because the five 
substances into which the fire divides mixt bodies are not 
exactly pure, and homogeneous ? For my part (continues 
Eleutherius) I cannot but think it somewhat strange, in 
case this opinion be not true, that it should fall out so 
luckily, that so great a variety of bodies should be 
analyzed by the fire into just five distinct substances; 
which so little differing from the bodies that bear those 
names, may so plausibly be called oyle, spirit, salt, water, 
and earth. 



156 The Sceptical Chymist 

The opinion you now propose (answers Carneades) 
being another than that I was engaged to examine, it is 
not requisite for me to debate at this present; nor should 
I have leasure to do it thoroughly. Wherefore I shall 
only tell you in general, that though I think this opinion 
in some respects more defensible than that of the vulgar 
chymists : yet you may easily enough learn from the past 
discourse what may be thought of it: since many of the 
objections made against the vulgar doctrine of the 
chymists seem, without much alteration, employable 
against this hypothesis also. For, besides that this 
doctrine does as well as the other take it for granted, 
(what is not easie to be proved) that the fire is the true 
and adequate analyzer of bodies, and that all the distinct 
substances obtainable from a mixt body by the fire, were 
so pre-existent in it, that they were but extricated from 
each other by the analysis ; besides that this opinion, too, 
ascribes to the productions of the fire an elementary 
simplicity, which I have shewn not to belong to them; 
and besides that this doctrine is lyable to some of the 
other difficulties, wherewith that of the tria prima is 
incumbered; besides all this, I say, this quinary number 
of elements, (if you pardon the expression) ought at least 
to have been restrained to the generality of animal and 
vegetable bodies, since not only among these there are 
some bodies, (as I formerly argued) which, for ought yet 
has been made to appear, do consist, either of fewer or 
more similar substances than precisely five. But in the 
mineral kingdom, there is scarce one concrete that has 
been evinced to be adequately divisible into such five 
principles or elements, and neither more nor lesse, as this 
opinion would have every mixt body to consist of. 

And this very thing (continues Carneades) may serve 
to take away or lessen your wonder, that just so many 
bodies as five should be found upon the resolution of 
concretes. For since we find not that the fire can make 
any such analysis (into five elements) of metals and other 
mineral bodies whose texture is more strong and per- 
manent, it remains that the five substances under con- 
sideration be obtained from vegetable and animal bodies, 



The Sceptical Chymist 157 

which (probably by reason of their looser contexture) 
are capable of being distilled. And as to such bodies, 
'tis natural enough, that, whether we suppose that there 
are, or are not, precisely five elements, there should 
ordinarily occur in the dissipated parts a five-fold diversity 
of scheme (if I may so speak) : for if the parts do not remain 
all fixed, as in gold, calcined talck, etc. nor all ascend, 
as in the sublimation of brimstone, camphire, etc. but 
after their dissipation do associate themselves into new 
schemes of matter; it is very likely, that they will by the 
fire be divided into fixed and volatile (I mean, in reference 
to that degree of heat by which they are distilled) and 
those volatile parts will, for the most part, ascend either 
in a dry forme, which chymists are pleased to call, if they 
be tasteless, flowers; if sapid, volatile salt; or in a liquid 
forme. And this liquor must be either inflamable, and 
so pass for oyl, or not inflamable, and yet subtile and 
pungent, which may be called spirit; or else strengthless 
or insipid, which may be named phlegme, or water. And 
as for the fixt part, or caput mortuum, it will most com- 
monly consist of corpuscles, partly soluble in water, or 
sapid, (especially if the saline parts were not so volatile, 
as to fly away before) which make up its fixt salt; and 
partly insoluble and insipid, which therefore seems to 
challenge the name of earth. But although upon this 
ground one might easily enough have foretold, that the 
differing substances obtained from a perfectly mixt body 
by the fire would for the most part be reducible to the 
five newly mentioned states of matter; yet it will not 
presently follow, that these five distinct substances were 
simple and primogeneal bodies, so pre-existent in the * 
concrete that the fire does but take them asunder. Be- 
sides that it does not appear, that all mixt bodies (witness, 
gold, silver, mercury, etc.) nay nor perhaps all vegetables, 
which may appear by what we said above of camphire, 
benzoin, etc., are resoluble by fire into just such differing 
schemes of matter. Nor will the experiments formerly 
alledged permit us to look upon these separated substances 
as elementary, or uncompounded. Neither will it be a 
sufficient argument of their being bodies that deserve the 



158 The Sceptical Chymist 

names which chymists are pleased to give them, that 
they have an analogy in point of consistence, or either 
volatility or fixtness, or else some other obvious quality, 
with the supposed principles, whose names are ascribed 
to them. For, as I told you above, notwithstanding this 
resemblance in some one quality, there may be such a 
disparity in others, as may be more fit to give them 
differing appellations, than the resemblance is to give 
them one and the same. And indeed it seems but some- 
what a gross way of judging of the nature of bodies, to 
conclude without scruple, that those must be of the same 
nature that agree in some such general quality, as fluidity, 
dryness, volatility, and the like: since each of those 
qualities, or states of matter, may comprehend a great 
variety of bodies, otherwise of a very differing nature; 
as we may see in the calxes of gold, of vitriol, and of 
Venetian talck, compared with common ashes, which yet 
are very dry, and fixed by the vehemence of the fire, as 
well as they. And as we may likewise gather from what 
I have formerly observed, touching the spirit of box- 
wood, which though a volatile, sapid, and not inflamable 
liquor, as well as the spirits of hartshorn, of blood and 
others, (and therefore has been hitherto called, the spirit, 
and esteemed for one of the principles of the wood that 
affords it) may yet, as I told you, be subdivided into two 
liquors, differing from one another, and one of them at 
least, from the generality of other chymical spirits. 

But you may yourself, if you please, (pursues Carneades) 
accomodate to the hypothesis you proposed what other 
particulars you shall think applicable to it, in the fore- 
going discourse. For I think it unseasonable for me to 
medle now any further with a controversie, which since 
it does not now belong to me, leaves me at liberty to take 
my own time to declare myself about it. 

Eleutherius perceiving that Carneades was somewhat 
unwilling to spend any more time upon the debate of this 
opinion, and having perhaps some thoughts of taking 
hence a rise to make him discourse it more fully another 
time, thought not fit as then to make any further mention 
to him of the proposed opinion, but told him ; 



The Sceptical Chymist 159 

I presume I need not mind you, Carneades, that both 
the patrons of the ternary number of principles, and those 
that would have five elements, endeavour to back their 
experiments with a specious reason or two; and especially 
some of those embracers of the opinion last named (whom 
I have conversed with, and found them learned men) 
assigne this reason of the necessity of five distinct elements ; 
that otherwise mixt bodies could not be so compounded 
and tempered as to obtain a due consistence and com- 
petent duration. For salt (say they) is the basis of 
solidity; and permanency in compound bodies, without 
which the other four elements might indeed be variously 
and loosly blended together, but would remain incom- 
pacted; but that salt might be dissolved into minute 
parts, and conveyed to the other substances to be com- 
pacted by it, and with it, there is a necessity of water. 
And that the mixture may not be too hard and brittle, 
a sulphureous or oyly principle must intervene to make 
the mass more tenacious; to this a mercurial spirit must 
be superadded; which by its activity may for a while 
permeate, and as it were leaven the whole mass, and 
thereby promote the more exquisite mixture and incor- 
poration of the ingredients. To all which (lastly) a 
portion of earth must be added, which by its dryness 
and porosity may soak up part of that water wherein 
the salt was dissolved, and eminently concurr with the 
other ingredients to give the whole body the requisite 
consistence. 

I perceive (saies Carneades smiling) that if it be true, 
as 'twas lately noted from the proverb, " That good wits 
have bad memories," you have that title, as well as a 
better, to a place among the good wits. For you have 
already more than once forgot, that I declared to you 
that I would at this conference examine only the experi- 
ments of my adversaries, not their speculative reasons. 
Yet 'tis not (subjoynes Carneades) for fear of medling 
with the argument you have proposed, that I decline 
the examining it at present. For if when we are more at 
leasure, you shall have a mind that we may solemnly 
consider of it together; I am confident we shall scarce 



160 The Sceptical Chymist 

finde it insoluble. And in the meantime we may observe, 
that such a way of arguing may, it seems, be speciously 
accommodated to differing hypotheses. For I find that 
Beguinus, and other assertors of the tria prima, pretend 
to make out by such a way, the requisiteness of their 
salt, sulphur and mercury, to constitute mixt bodies, 
without taking notice of any necessity of an addition of 
water and earth. 

And indeed neither sort of chymists seem to have duly 
considered how great variety there is in the textures and 
consistences of compound bodies; and how little the 
consistence and duration of many of them seem to 
accommodate and be explicable by the proposed notion. 
And not to mention those almost incorruptible substances 
obtainable by the fire, which I have proved to be some- 
what compounded, and which the chymists will readily 
grant not to be perfectly mixt bodies: (not to mention 
these, I say) if you will but recall to mind some of those 
experiments, whereby I shewed you that out of common 
water only mixt bodies (and even living ones) of very 
differing consistences, and resoluble by fire into as many 
principles as other bodies acknowledged to be perfectly 
mixt; may be produced if you do this, I say, you will 
not, I suppose, be averse from believing, yet nature by 
a convenient disposition of the minute parts of a portion 
of matter may contrive bodies durable enough, and of 
this, or that, or the other consistence, without being 
obliged to make use of all, much less of any determinate 
quantity of each of the five elements, or of the three 
principles to compound such bodies of. And I have 
(pursues Carneades) something wondered, chymists should 
not consider, that there is scarce any body in nature so 
permanent and indissoluble as glass; which yet them- 
selves teach us may be made of bare ashes, brought to 
fusion by the mere violence of the fire; so that, since 
ashes are granted to consist but of pure salt and simple 
earth, sequestred from all the other principles or elements, 
they must acknowledge, that even art itself can of two 
elements only, or, if you please, one principle and one 
element, compound a body more durable than almost 



The Sceptical Chymist 161 

any in the world. Which being undeniable, how will 
they prove that nature cannot compound mixt bodies, 
and even durable ones, under all the five elements or 
material principles. 

But to insist any longer on this occasional disquisition, 
touching their opinion that would establish five elements, 
were to remember as little as you did before, that the 
debate of this matter is no part of my first undertaking; 
and consequently, that I have already spent time enough 
in what I look back upon but as a digression, or at best 
an excursion. 

And thus, Eleutherius, (saies Carneades) having at 
length gone through the four considerations I proposed 
to discourse unto you, I hold it not unfit, for fear my 
having insisted so long on each of them may have made 
you forget their series, briefly to repeat them by telling 
you, that 

Since, in the first place, it may justly be doubted \ 
whether or no the fire be, as chymists suppose it, the 
genuine and universal resolver of mixt bodies; 

Since we may doubt, in the next place, whether or no 
all the distinct substances that may be obtained from a 
mixt body by the fire were pre-existent there in the formes 
in which they were separated from it; 

Since also, though we should grant the substances 
separable from mixt bodies by the fire to have been their 
component ingredients, yet the number of such substances 
does not appear the same in all mixt bodies; some of them 
being resoluble into more differing substances than three, 
and others not being resoluble into so many as three; 

And since, lastly, those very substances that are thus 
separated are not for the most part pure and elementary 
bodies, but new kinds of mixts; 

Since, I say, these things are so, I hope you will allow 
me to inferr, that the vulgar experiments (I might per- 
chance have added, the arguments too) wont to be 
alledged by chymists to prove, that their three hypo- 
statical principles do adequately compose all mixt bodies, 
are not so demonstrative as to induce a wary person to 
acquiesce in their doctrine, which, till they explain and 

L 



162 The Sceptical Chymist 

prove it better, will by its perplexing darkness be more 
apt to puzzle than satisfy considering men, and will to 
r ^hem appear incumbered with no small difficulties. 

And from what has been hitherto deduced (continues 
Carneades) we may learn, what to judge of the common 
practice of those chymists, who because they have found 
that diverse compound bodies (for it will not hold in all) 
can be resolved into, or rather can be brought to afford 
two or three differing substances more than the soot and 
ashes, whereinto the naked fire commonly divides them 
in our chymnies, cry up their own sect for the invention 
of a new philosophy, some of them, as Helmont, etc. 
styling themselves philosophers by the fire; and the most 
part not only ascribing, but as far as in them lies, engross- 
ing to those of their sect the title of PHILOSOPHERS. 

But alas, how narrow is this philosophy, that reaches 
but to some of those compound bodies, which we find but 
upon, or in the crust or outside of our terrestrial globe, 
^ which is itself but a point in comparison of the vast 
extended universe, of whose other and greater parts the 
doctrine of the tria prima does not give us an account! 
For what does it teach us, either of the nature of the sun, 
which astronomers affirme to be eight-score and odd times 
bigger than the whole earth ? or of that of those numerous 
fixt Starrs, which, for ought we know, would very few, 
if any of them, appear inferiour in bulke and brightness 
to the sun, if they were as near us as he? What does 
the knowing that salt, sulphur and mercury, are the 
principles of mixt bodies, informe us of the nature of that 
vast, fluid, and aetherial substance, that seems to make 
up the interstellar, and consequently much the greatest 
part of the world? for as for the opinion commonly 
ascribed to Paracelsus, as if he would have not only the 
four peripatetick elements, but even the celestial parts 
of the universe to consist of his three principles, since 
the modern chymists themselves have not thought so 
groundless a conceit worth their owning, I shall not think 
it worth my confuting. 

But I should perchance forgive the hypothesis I have 
been all this while examining, if, though it reaches but 



The Sceptical Chymist 163 

to a very little part of the world, it did at least give us 
a satisfactory account of those things to which 'tis said 
to reach. But find not, that it gives us any other 
than a very imperfect information even about mixt 
bodies themselves: for how will the knowledge of the 
tria prima discover to us the reason, why the loadstone 
drawes a needle, and disposes it to respect the poles, and 
yet seldom precisely points at them? How will this 
hypothesis teach us how a chick is formed in the egge, 
or how the seminal principles of mint, pompions, and 
other vegetables, that I mentioned to you above, can 
fashion water into various plants, each of them endowed 
with its peculiar and determinate shape, and with divers 
specifick and discriminating qualities? How does this 
hypothesis shew us, how much salt, how much sulphur, 
and how much mercury must be taken to make a chick 
or a pompion? and if we know that: what principle is it 
that manages these ingredients, and contrives (for in- 
stance), such liquors as the white and yolk of an egge into 
such a variety of textures as is requisite to fashion the 
bones, veines, arteries, nerves, tendons, feathers, blood, 
and other parts of a chick; and not only to fashion each 
limbe, but to connect them altogether, after that manner 
that is most congruous to the perfection of the animal 
which is to consist of them? For to say, that some more 
fine and subtile part of either or all the hypostatical 
principles is the director in all this business, and the 
architect of all this elaborate structure, is to give one 
occasion to demand again, what proportion and way of 
mixture of the tria prima afforded this architectonick 
spirit, and what agent made so skilful and happy a 
mixture ? And the answer to this question, if the chymists 
will keep themselves within their three principles, will be 
lyable to the same inconvenience, that the answer to the 
former was. And if it were not to intrench upon the 
theame of a friend of ours here present, I could easily 
prosecute the imperfections of the vulgar chymists 
philosophy, and shew you, that by going about to expli- 
cate by their three principles, I say not, all the abstruse 
properties of mixt bodies, but even such obvious and more 



164 The Sceptical Chymist 

familiar phenomena as fluidity and firmness, the colours 
and figures of stones, minerals, and other compound 
bodies, the nutrition of either plants or animals, the 
gravity of gold or quicksilver compared with wine or 
spirit of wine; by attempting, I say, to render a reason 
of these (to omit a thousand others as difficult to account 
for) from any proportion of the three simple ingredients, 
chymists will be much more likely to discredit themselves 
and their hypothesis, than satisfy an intelligent inquirer 
after truth. 

But (interposes Eleutherius) this objection seems no 
more than may be made against the four peripatetick 
elements. And indeed almost against any other hypo- 
thesis, that pretends by any determinate number of 
material ingredients to render a reason of the phae- 
nomena of nature. And as for the use of the chymical 
doctrine of the three principles, I suppose you need not 
be told by me, that the great champion of it, the learned 
Sennertus, assignes this noble use of the tria prima, that 
from them, as the nearest and most proper principles, 
may be deduced and demonstrated the properties which 
are in mixt bodies, and which cannot be proximately 
(as they speak) deduced from the elements. And this, 
saies he, is chiefly apparent, when we inquire into the 
properties and faculties of medicines. And I know 
(continues Eleutherius) that the person you have assumed, 
of an opponent of the hermetick doctrine, will not so far 
prevaile against your native and wonted equity, as to keep 
^you from acknowledging that philosophy is much beholden 
to the notions and discoveries of chymists. 

If the chymists you speak of (replyes Carneades) had 
been so modest, or so discreet, as to propose their opinion 
of the tria prima, but as a notion useful among others, 
to increase humane knowledge, they had deserved more 
| of our thanks, and less of our opposition; but since the 
thing, that they pretend, is not so much to contribute 
a notion toward the improvement of philosophy, as to 
make this notion (attended by a few less considerable ones) 
pass for a new philosophy itself; nay, since they boast 
so much of this phancie of theirs, that the famous Quer- 



The Sceptical Chymist 165 

cetanus scruples not to write, that if his most certain 
doctrine of the three principles were sufficiently learned, 
examined, and cultivated, it would easily dispel all the 
darkness that benights our minds, and bring in a clear 
light, that would remove all difficulties: this school 
affording theorems and axioms irrefragable, and to be 
admitted without dispute by impartial judges; and so 
useful withal, as to exempt us from the necessity of having 
recourse, for want of the knowledge of causes, to that 
sanctuary of the ignorant, occult qualities; since I say, 
this domestick notion of the chymists is so much over- 
valued by them, I cannot think it unfit, they should be 
made sensible of their mistake; and be admonished to 
take in more fruitful and comprehensive principles, if they 
mean to give us an account of the phsenomena of nature ; 
and not confine themselves, and (as far as they can) others, 
to such narrow principles, as I fear will scarce enable them 
to give an account (I mean an intelligible one) of the 
tenth part (I say not) of all the phsenomena of nature; 
but even of all such as by the Leucippian or some of the 
other sorts of principles may be plausibly enough expli- 
cated. And though I be not unwilling to grant, that the 
incompetency I impute to the chymical hypothesis is but 
the same which may be objected against that of the four 
elements, and divers other doctrines that have been 
maintained by learned men; yet since 'tis the chymical 
hypothesis only which I am now examining, I see not 
why, if what I impute to it be a real inconvenience, either 
it should cease to be so, or I should scruple to object it, 
because other theories are lyable thereunto, as well as the 
hermetical. For I know not why a truth should be 
thought less a truth for the being fit to overthrow variety 
of errors. 

I am obliged to you (continues Carneades, a little 
smiling) for the favourable opinion you are pleased to 
express of my equity, if there be no designe in it. But 
I need not be tempted by an artifice, or invited by a 
complement, to acknowledge the great service that the 
labours of chymists have done the lovers of useful learning; 
nor even on this occasion shall their arrogance hinder 



1 66 The Sceptical Chymist 

my gratitude. But since we are as well examining the 
truth of their doctrine, as the merit of their industry, 
I must in order to the investigation of the first, continue 
a reply, to talk at the rate of the part I have assumed; 
and tell you, that when I acknowledge the usefulness of 

/the labours of spagyrists to natural philosophy, I do it 
upon the score of their experiments, not upon that of 
their speculations ; for it seems to me, that their writings, 
as their furnaces, afford as well smoak as light; and do 
little less obscure some subjects, than they illustrate 
others. And though I am unwilling to deny, that 'tis 
difficult for a man to be an accomplisht naturalist, that 
is a stranger to chymistry; yet I look upon the common 
operations and practices of chymists, almost as I do on 
the letters of the alphabet, without whose knowledge 'tis 
very hard for a man to become a philosopher; and yet 
that knowledge is very far from being sufficient to make 
him one. 

But (saies Carneades, resuming a more serious look) 
to consider a little more particularly what you alledge 
in favour of the chymical doctrine of the tria prima, 
though I shall readily acknowledge it not to be unuseful, 
and that the divisers and embracers of it have done the 
commonwealth of learning some service, by helping to 
destroy that excessive esteem, or rather veneration, 
wherewith the doctrine of the four elements was almost 
*/ as generally, as undeservedly entertained; yet what has 
been alledged concerning the usefulness of the tria prima, 
seems to me liable to no contemptible difficulties. 

And first, as for the very way of probation, which the 
more learned and more sober champions of the chymical 
cause employ to evince the chymical principles in mixt 
bodies, it seems to me to be farr enough from being con- 
vincing. This grand and leading argument, your Sen- 
nertus himself, who layes great weight upon it, and tells 
us, that the most learned philosophers employ this way 
of reasoning to prove the most important things, pro- 
poses thus: "Ubicunque (saies he) pluribus esedem 
affectiones et qualitates insunt, per commune quoddam 
principium insint necesse est, sicut omnia sunt gravia 



The Sceptical Chymist 167 

propter terrain, calida propter ignem. At colores, odores, 
sapores, esse < Aoy urrt v, et similia alia, mineralibus, metallis, 
gemmis, lapidibus, plantis, animalibus insunt. Ergo per 
commune aliquod principium, et subjectum, insunt. 
At tale principium non sunt elementa. Nullam enim 
habent ad tales qualitates producendas potentiam. Ergo 
alia principia, unde fluant, inquirenda sunt." 

In the recital of this argument, (saies Carneades) I 
therefore thought fit to retain the language wherein the 
author proposes it, that I might also retaine the propriety 
of some Latine termes, to which I do not readily remember 
any that fully answer in English. But as for the argu- 
mentation itself, 'tis built upon a precarious supposition, 
that seems to me neither demonstrable nor true; for, 
how does it appear that where the same quality is to be 
met with in many bodies, it must belong to them upon 
the account of some one body whereof they all partake ? 
(For that the major of our authors argument is to be 
understood of the material ingredients of bodies, appears 
by the instances of earth and fire he annexes to explain 
it.) For to begin with that very example which he is 
pleased to alledge for himself; how can he prove, that the 
gravity of all bodies proceeds from what they participate 
of the element of earth? Since we see, that not only 
common water, but the more pure distilled rain water 
is heavy; and quicksilver is much heavier than earth 
itself; though none of my adversaries has yet proved, 
that it contains any of that element. And I the rather 
make use of this example of quicksilver, because I see 
not how the assertors of the elements will give any better 
account of it than the chymists. For if it be demanded 
how it comes to be fluid, they will answer, that it partici- 
pates much of the nature of water. And indeed, accord- 
ing to them, water may be the predominant element in 
it, since we see, that severall bodies, which by distillation 
afford liquors that weigh more than their caput mortuum, 
do not yet consist of liquor enough to be fluid. Yet if it 
be demanded how quicksilver comes to be so heavy, then 
'tis replyed, that 'tis by reason of the earth that abounds 
in it; but since, according to them, it must consist also 



1 68 The Sceptical Chymist 

of air, and partly of fire, which they affirme to be light 
elements, how comes it that it should be so much heavier 
than earth of the same bulk, though to fill up the porosities 
and other cavities it be made up into a mass or paste 
with water, which itself they allow to be a heavy element. 
But to returne to our spagyrists, we see that chymical 
oyles and fixt salts, though never so exquisitely purifyed 
and freed from terrestrial parts, do yet remain ponderous 
enough. And experience has informed me, that a pound 
(for instance) of some of the heaviest woods, as guajacum, 
that will sinke in water, being burnt to ashes will yeeld 
a much less weight of them (whereof I found but a small 
part to be alcalizate) than much lighter vegetables: as 
also that the black charcoal of it will not sink as did the 
wood, but swim; which argues that the differing gravity 
* of bodies proceeds chiefly from the particular texture, 
as is manifest in gold, the closest and compactest of 
bodies, which is many times heavier than we can possibly 
make any parcel of earth of the same bulk. I will not 
examine, what may be argued touching the gravity or 
quality analogous thereunto, of even celestial bodies, 
from the motion of the spots about the sun, and from the 
appearing equality of the supposed seas in the moon; 
nor consider how little those phenomena would agree 
with what Sennertus presumes concerning gravity. But 
further to invalidate his supposition, I shall demand, upon 
what chymical principle fluidity depends? And yet 
fluidity is, two or three perhaps excepted, the most diffused 
quality of the universe, and far more general than almost 
any other of those that are to be met with in any of the 
chymical principles, or Aristotelian elements; since not 
only the air, but that vast expansion we call heaven, 
in comparison of which our terrestrial globe (supposing 
it were all solid) is but a point; and perhaps too the sun 
and the fixt stars are fluid bodies. I demand also, from 
which of the chymical principles motion flowes; which 
yet is an affection of matter much more general than any 
that can be deduced from any of the three chymical 
principles. I might ask the like question concerning 
light, which is not only to be found in the kindled sulphur 



The Sceptical Chymist 169 

of mixt bodies but (not to mention those sorts of rotten 
woods, and rotten fish that shine in the dark) in the tails 
of living glow-wormes, and in the vast bodies of the sun 
and stars. I would gladly also know, in which of the 
three principles the quality, we call sound, resides as in 
its proper subject; since either oyl falling upon oyle, or 
spirit upon spirit, or salt upon salt, in a great quantity, 
and from a considerable height, will make a noise, or if 
you please, create a sound, and (that the objection may 
reach the Aristotelians) so will also water upon water, 
and earth upon earth. And I could name other qualities 
to be met with in divers bodies, of which I suppose my 
adversaries will not in haste assign any subject, upon 
whose account in must needs be, that the quality belongs 
to all the other several bodies. 

And, before I proceed any further, I must here invite 
you to compare the supposition we are examining, with 
some other of the chyrnical tenents. For, first they do 
in effect teach, that more than one quality may belong 
to, and be deduced from, one principle. For, they ascribe 
to salt, tastes, and the power of coagulation; to sulphur, 
as well odours as inflamableness ; and some of them 
ascribe to mercury, colours; as all of them do effumability, 
as they speak. And on the other side, it is evident that 
volatility belongs in common to all the three principles, 
and to water too. For 'tis manifest that chymical oyles 
are volatile; that also divers salts, emerging upon the 
analysis of many concretes, are very volatile, is plain from 
the fugitiveness of salt, of hartshorn, flesh, etc. ascending 
in the distillation of those bodies. How easily water 
may be made to ascend in vapours, there is scarce any- 
body that has not observed. And as for what they call 
the mercurial principle of bodies, that is so apt to be 
raised in the form of steam, that Paracelsus and others 
define it by that aptness to fly up; so that (to draw that 
inference by the way) it seems not that chymists have 
been accurate in their doctrine of qualities, and their 
respective principles, since they both derive several 
qualities from the same principle, and must ascribe the 
same quality to almost all their principles and other 



i jo The Sceptical Chymist 

bodies besides. And thus much for the first thing taken 
for granted, without sufficient proof, by your Sennertus: 
and to add that upon the by (continues Ca,rneades) we 
may hence learn what to judge of the way of argumenta- 
tion, which that fierce champion of the Aristotelians 
against the chymists, Anthonius Guntherus Billichius 
employes, where he pretends to prove against Beguinus, 
that not only the four elements do immediately concurr 
to constitute every mixt body, and are both present in it, 
and obtainable from it upon its dissolution; but that in 
the tria prima themselves, whereinto chymists are wont 
to resolve mixt bodies, each of them clearly discovers 
itself to consist of four elements. The ratiocination itself 
(pursues Carneades) being somewhat unusual, I did the 
other day transcribe it, and (saies he, pulling a paper 
out of his pocket) it is this. " Ordiamur, cum Beguino, 
a ligno viridi, quod si concremetur, videbis in sudore 
aquam, in fumo aerem, inflamma et prunis ignem, terram 
in cineribus: quod si Beguino placuerit ex eo colligere 
humidum aquosum, cohibere humidum oleaginosum, 
extrahere ex cineribus salem; ego ipsi in unoquoque 
horum seorsim quatuor elementa ad oculum demonstrate, 
eodem artificio quo in ligno viridi ea demonstravi. 
Humorem aquosum admoveho igni. Ipse aquam ebullire 
videbit, in vapore aerem conspiciet, ignem sentiet in 
sestu, plus minus terrae in sedimento apparebit. Humor 
porro oleaginosus aquam humiditate et fluiditate per se, 
accensus vero ignem flamma prodit, fumo aerem, fuligine, 
nidore et amurca terram. Salem denique ipse Beguinus 
siccum vocat et terrestrem, qui tamen nee fusus aquam, 
nee caustica vi ignem celare potest; ignis vero violentia 
in halitus versus nee ab acre se alienum esse demonstrat; 
idem de lacte, de ovis, de semine lini, de garyophyllis, 
de nitro, de sale marino, denique de antimonio, quod 
fuit de ligno viridi judicium; eadem de illorum partibus, 
quas Beguinus adducit, sententia, quae de viridis ligni 
humore aquoso, quae de liquore ejusdem oleoso, quse 
de sale fuit." 

This bold discourse (resumes Carneades, putting up 
again his paper) I think it were not very difficult to con- 



The Sceptical Chymist 171 

fute, if his arguments were as considerable, as our time 
will probably prove short for the remaining and more 
necessary part of my discourse; wherefore referring you 
for an answer to what was said concerning the dissipated 
parts of a burnt piece of green wood, to what I told 
Themistius on the like occasion, I might easily shew you, 
how slightly and superficially our Guntherus talks of the 
dividing the flame of green wood into his four elements; 
when he makes that vapour to be air, which being caught 
in glasses and condensed, presently discovers itself to have 
been but an aggregate of innumerable very minute drops 
of liquor; and when he would prove the phlegmes being 
composed of fire by that heat which is adventitious to the 
liquor, and ceases upon the absence of what produced it 
(whether that be an agitation proceeding from the motion 
of the external fire, or the presence of a multitude of 
igneous atonies pervading the pores of the vessel, and 
nimbly permeating the whole body of the water) I might, 
I say, urge these and divers other weaknesses of his dis- 
course. But I will rather take notice of what is more 
pertinent to the occasion of this digression, namely, that 
taking it for granted, that fluidity (with which he unwarily 
seems to confound humidity) must proceed from the 
element of water, he makes a chymical oyle to consist of 
that elementary liquor; and yet in the very next words 
proves, that it consists also of fire, by its inflamability; 
not remembring that exquisitely pure spirit of wine is 
both more fluid than water itself, and yet will flame all 
away without leaving the least aqueous moisture behind 
it; and without such an amurca and soot as he would 
deduce the presence of earth from. So that the same 
liquor may according to his doctrine be concluded by its 
great fluidity to be almost all water; and by its burning 
all away to be all disguised fire. And by the like way of 
probation our author would shew that the fixt salt of 
wood is compounded of the four elements. For (saies he) 
being turned by the violence of the fire into steames, it 
shews itself to be of kin to air; whereas I doubt whether 
he ever saw a true fixt salt (which to become so, must 
have already endured the violence of an incinerating fire) 



172 The Sceptical Chymist 

brought by the fire alone to ascend in the forme of exhala- 
tions ; but I do not doubt that if he did, and had caught 
those exhalations in convenient vessels, he would have 
found them as well as the steames of common salt, etc. 
of a saline, and not an aereal nature. And whereas our 
author takes it also for granted, that the fusibility of salt 
must be deduced from water it is indeed so much the 
effect of heat variously agitating the minute parts of a 
body, without regard to water, that gold (which by its 
being the heaviest and fixtest of bodies, should be the 
most earthy) will be brought to fusion by a strong fire; 
which sure is more likely to drive away, than increase its 
aqueous ingredient, if it have any; and on the other side, 
for want of a sufficient agitation of its minute parts, ice 
is not fluid, but solid; though he presumes also that the 
mordicant quality of bodies must proceed from a fiery 
ingredient; whereas, not to urge that the light and 
inflamable parts, which are the most likely to belong 
to the element of fire, must probably be driven away by 
that time the violence of the fire has reduced the body 
to ashes; not to urge this, I say, nor that oyle of vitriol 
which quenches fire, burnes the tongue and flesh of those 
that unwarily taste or apply it, as a caustick doth, it is 
precarious to prove the presence of fire in fixt salts from 
their caustick power, unless it were first shewn, that all 
the qualities ascribed to salts must be deduced from those 
of the elements; which, had I time, I could easily manifest 
to be no easy task. And not to mention that our author 
makes a body, as homogeneous, as any he can produce for 
elementary, belong both to water and fire, though it be 
neither fluid nor insipid, like water; nor light and volatile, 
like fire; he seems to omit in this anatomy the element 
of earth, save that he intimates, that the salt may pass for 
that: but since a few lines before, he takes ashes for earth, 
I see not how he will avoid an inconsistency either betwixt 
the parts of his discourse, or betwixt some of them and his 
doctrine. For since there is a manifest difference betwixt 
the saline and the insipid parts of ashes, I see not how 
substances, that disagree in such notable qualities, can 
be both said to be portions of an element, whose nature 



The Sceptical Chymist 173 

requires that it be homogeneous, especially in this case 
where an analysis by the fire is supposed to have separated 
it from the admixture of other elements, which are 
confessed by most Aristotelians to be generally found 
in common earth, and to render it impure. And sure if 
when we have considered for how little a disparities sake 
the peripateticks make these symbolizing bodies, aire 
and fire, to be two distinct elements, we shall also consider 
that the saline part of ashes is very strongly tasted, and 
easily soluble in water; whereas the other part of the 
same ashes is insipid and indissoluble in the same liquor: 
not to add, that the one substance is opacous, and the 
other somewhat diaphanous, nor that they differ in - 
divers other particulars; if we consider those things, I * 
say, we shall hardly think that both these substances are 
elementary earth; and as to what is sometimes objected, 
that their saline taste is only an effect of incineration and 
adustion, it has been elsewhere fully replyed to, when 
proposed by Themistius, and where it has been proved 
against him, that however insipid earth may perhaps 
by additaments be turned into salt, yet 'tis not like it 
should be so by the fire alone: for we see that when we 
refine gold and silver, the violentest fires we can employ 
on them give them not the least relish of saltness. And 
I think Philoponus has rightly observed, that the ashes 
of some concretes contain very little salt if any at all; 
for refiners suppose that bone-ashes are free from it, and 
therefore make use of them for tests and cuppels, which 
ought to be destitute of salt, lest the violence of the fire 
should bring them to vitrification; and having purposely 
and heedfully tasted a cuppel made of only bone-ashes 
and fair water, which I had caused to be exposed to a 
very violent fire, actuated by the blast of a large pair of 
double bellows, I could not perceive that the force of the 
fire had imparted to it the least saltness, or so much as 
made it less insipid. 

But (saies Carneades) since neither you nor I love 
repetitions, I shall not now make any of what else was 
urged against Themistius, but rather invite you to take 
notice with me, that when our authour, though a learned 



174 The Sceptical Chymist 

man, and one that pretends skill enough in chymistry 
to ref orme the whole art, comes to make good his confident 
undertaking, to give us an ocular demonstration of the 
immediate presence of the four elements in the resolution 
of green wood, he is fain to say things that agree very 
little with one another. For about the beginning of that 
passage of his lately recited to you, he makes the sweat, 
as he calls it, of the green wood to be water, the smoak 
aire, the shining matter fire, and the ashes earth ; whereas 
a few lines after, he will in each of these, nay (as I just 
now noted) in one distinct part of the ashes, shew the 
four elements. So that either the former analysis must 
be incompetent to prove that number of elements, since 
by it the burnt concrete is not reduced into elementary 
bodies, but into such as are yet each of them compounded 
of the four elements; or else these qualities, from which 
he endeavours to deduce the presence of all the elements 
in the fixt salt, and each of the other separated substances, 
will be but a precarious way of probation: especially if 
you consider, that the extracted alcali of wood, being, 
for ought appears, at least as similar a body, as any that 
the peripateticks can shew us, if its differing qualities 
must argue the presence of distinct elements, it will scarce 
be possible for them by any way they know of employing 
the fire upon any body, to shew that any body is a portion 
of a true element : and this recals to my mind, that I am 
now but in an occasional excursion, which aiming only 
to shew, that the peripateticks as well as the chymists 
take in our present controversie something for granted, 
which they ought to prove, I shall returne to my excep- 
tions, where I ended the first of them, and further tell 
you, that neither is that the only precarious thing that 
I take notice of in Sennertus his argumentation; for 
when he inferrs, that because the qualities he mentions, 
as colours, smels, and the like, belong not to the elements, 
they therefore must to the chymical principles; he takes 
that for granted, which will not in haste be proved; as 
I might here manifest, but that I may by and by have 
a fitter opportunity to take notice of it. And thus much 
at present may suffice to have discoursed against the 



The Sceptical Chymist 175 

supposition, that almost every quality must have some 
SKTLKOV Tr/awToi/, as they speak, some native receptacle, 
wherein as in its proper subject of inhesion it peculiarly 
resides; and on whose account that quality belongs to 
the other bodies, wherein it is to be met with. Now this 
fundamental supposition being once destroyed, whatso- 
ever is built upon it, must fall to mine of itself. 

But I consider further, that chymists are (for ought 
I have found) far from being able to explicate by any of 
the trio, prima, those qualities which they pretend to 
belong primarily unto it, and in mixt bodies to deduce 
from it. 'Tis true indeed, that such qualities are not 
explicable by the four elements; but it will not therefore 
follow that they are so by the three hermetical principles ; 
and this is it that seems to have deceived the chymists, ^ 
and is indeed a very common mistake amongst most 
disputants, who argue as if there could be but two opinions 
concerning the difficulty about which they contend; and 
consequently they inferr, that if their adversaries opinion 
be erroneous, their' s must needs be the truth; whereas 
many questions, and especially in matters physiological, 
may admit of so many differing hypotheses, that 'twill 
be very inconsiderate and fallacious to conclude (except 
where the opinions are precisely contradictory) the truth 
of one from the falsity of another. And in our particular 
case 'tis no way necessary, that the properties of mixt 
bodies must be explicable either by the hermetical, or the 
Aristotelian hypothesis; there being divers other and 
more plausible waies of explaining them, and especially 
that, which deduces qualities from the motion, figure, 
and contrivance of the small parts of bodies; as I think 
might be shewn, if the attempt were as seasonable, as I 
fear it would be tedious. 

I will allow then, that the chymists do not causelesly 
accuse the doctrine of the four elements of incompetency 
to explain the properties of compound bodies. And for 
this rejection of a vulgar error, they ought not to be 
denyed what praise men may deserve for exploding 
a doctrine whose imperfections are so conspicuous, that 
men needed but not to shut their eyes, to discover them. 



176 The Sceptical Chymist 

But I am mistaken, if our hermetical philosophers them- 
selves need not, as well as the peripateticks, have recourse 
to more fruitfull and comprehensive principles than the 
tria prtma, to make out the properties of the bodies they 
converse with. Not to accumulate examples to this 
purpose (because I hope for a fitter opportunity to prose- 
cute this subject) let us at present only point at colour, 
that you may guess by what they say of so obvious and 
familiar a quality, how little instruction we are to expect 
from the tria prima in those more abstruse ones, which 
they with the Aristotelians stile occult. For about 
colours, neither do they at all agree among themselves, 
nor have I met with any one, of which of the three 
' persv/asions soever, that does intelligibly explicate them. 
The vulgar chymists are wont to ascribe colours to 
mercury; Paracelsus in divers places attributes them 
to salt; and Sennertus, having recited their differing 
opinions, dissents from both; and referrs colours rather 
unto sulphur. But how colours do, nay, how they may, 
arise from either of these principles, I think you will 
scarce say that any has yet intelligibly explicated. And 
if Mr. Boyle will allow me to shew you the experiments 
which he has collected about colours, you will, I doubt 
not, confess that bodies exhibite colours, not upon the 
account of the predominancy of this or that principle in 
them, but upon that of their texture, and especially the 
disposition of their superficial parts, whereby the light 
rebounding thence to the eye is so modified, as by differing 
impressions variously to affect the organs of sight. I 
might here take notice of the pleasing variety of colours 
exhibited by the triangular glass (as 'tis wont to be called) 
and demand, what addition or decrement of either salt, 
sulphur, or mercury, befalls the body of the glass by being 
prismatically figured; and yet 'tis known, that without 
that shape it would not afford those colours as it does. 
But because it may be objected, that these are not real, 
but apparent colours ; that I may not lose time in examin- 
ing the distinction, I will alledge against the chymists, a 
couple of examples of real and permanent colours drawn 
from metalline bodies; and represent, that without the 



The Sceptical Chymist 177 

addition of any extraneous body, quicksilver may by the 
fire alone, and that in glasse vessels, be deprived of its 
silver-like colour, and be turned into a red body; and 
from this red body without addition likewise may be 
obtained a mercury bright and specular as it was before; 
so that I have here a lasting colour generated and de- 
stroyed (as I have seen) at pleasure, without adding or 
taking away either mercury, salt, or sulphur; and if you 
take a clean and slender piece of hardened steel, and apply 
to it the flame of a candle at some little distance short 
of the point, you shall not have held the steel long in the 
flame, but you shall perceive divers colours, as yellow, 
red and blew, to appear upon the surface of the metal, and 
as it were run along in chase of one another towards the 
point; so that the same body, and that in one and the 
same part, may not only have a new colour produced 
in it, but exhibite successively divers colours within 
a minute of an hour, or thereabouts; and any of these 
colours may by removing the steel from the fire, become 
permanent, and last many years, and this production 
and variety of colours cannot reasonably be supposed to 
proceed from the accession of any of the three principles, 
to which of them soever chymists will be pleased to ascribe 
colours; especially considering, that if you but suddenly 
refrigerate that iron, first made red hot, it will be hardened 
and colourless again; and not only by the flame of a 
candle, but by any other equivalent heat conveniently 
applied, the like colours will again be made to appear and 
succeed one another, as at the first. But I must not any 
further prosecute an occasional discourse, though that 
were not so difficult for me to do, as I fear it would be 
for the chymists to give a better account of the other 
qualities, by their principles, than they have done of 
colours. And your Sennertus himself (though an author 
I much value) would I fear have been exceedingly puzled 
to resolve, by the tria prima, halfe that catalogue of 
problems, which he challenges the vulgar peripateticks 
to explicate by their four elements. And supposing it 
were true, that salt or sulphur were the principle to which 
this or that quality may be peculiarly referred, yet though 



178 The Sceptical Chymist 

he that teaches us this, teaches us something concerning 
that quality, yet he teaches us but something. For 
indeed he does not teach us that which can in any tolerable 
measure satisfie an inquisitive searcher after truth. For 
what is it to me to know, that such a quality resides in 
such a principle or element, whilst I remain altogether 
ignorant of the cause of that quality, and the manner of its 
production and operation? How little do I know more 
than any ordinary man of gravity, if I know but that the 
heaviness of mixt bodies proceeds from that of the earth 
they are composed of, if I know not the reason why the 
earth is heavy? And how little does the chymist teach 
the philosopher of the nature of purgation, if he only 
tells him that the purgative vertue of medicines resides 
in their salt: for, besides that this must not be conceded 
without limitation, since the purging parts of many 
vegetables extracted by the water wherein they are 
infused, are at most but such compounded salts (I mean 
mingled with oyle, and spirit, and earth, as tartar and 
divers other subjects of the vegetable kingdom afford) 
and since too that quicksilver precipitated either with 
gold, or without addition, into a powder, is wont to be 
strongly enough cathartical, though the chymists have not 
yet proved, that either gold or mercury have any salt at 
all, much less any that is purgative; besides this, I say, 
how little is it to me, to know that 'tis the salt of the 
rhubarb (for instance) that purges, if I find that it does 
not purge as salt; since scarce any elementary salt is in 
small quantity cathartical. And if I know not how 
purgation in general is effected in a humane body? In 
a word, as 'tis one thing to know a man's lodging, and 
another, to be acquainted with him ; so it may be one thing 
to know the subject wherein a quality principally resides, 
and another thing to have a right notion and knowledge 
of the quality itself. Now that which I take to be the 
reason of this chymical deficiency, is the same upon whose 
account I think the Aristotelian and divers other theories 
incompetent to explicate the origine of qualities. For 
I am apt to think, that men will never be able to explain 
the phenomena of nature, while they endeavour to 



The Sceptical Chymist 179 

deduce them only from the presence and proportion of 
such or such material ingredients, and consider such 
ingredients or elements as bodies in a state of rest; where- 
as indeed the greatest part of the affections of matter, 
and consequently of the phenomena of nature, seems to 
depend upon the motion and the contrivance of the small 
parts of bodies. For 'tis by motion that one part of 
matter acts upon another; and 'tis, for the most part, 
the texture of the body upon which the moving parts 
strike, that modifies the motion or impression, and 
concurrs with it to the production of those effects which 
make up the chief part of the naturalists theme. 

But (saies Eleutherius) methinks for all this, you have 
left some part of what I alledged in behalf of the three 
principles, unanswered. For all that you have said will 
not keep this from being a useful discovery, that since in 
the salt of one concrete, in the sulphur of another, and 
the mercury of a third, the medicinal vertue of it resides ; 
that principle ought to be separated from the rest, and 
there the desired faculty must be sought for. 

I never denyed (replies Carneades) that the notion of 
the tria prima may be of some use, but (continues he 
laughing) by what you now alledge for it, it will but appear / 
that it is useful to apothecaries rather than to philosophers : 
the being able to make things operative being sufficient 
to those, whereas the knowledge of causes is the thing 
looked after by these. And let me tell you, Eleutherius, 
even this itself will need to be entertained with some 
caution. 

For first, it will not presently follow, that if the purga- 
tive or other vertue of a simple may be easily extracted 
by water or spirit of wine, it resides in the salt or sulphur 
of the concrete; since unless the body hath before been 
resolved by the fire, or some other powerful agent, it will, 
for the most part, afford in the liquors I have named, 
rather the finer compounded parts of itself, than the 
elementary ones. As I noted before, that water will 
dissolve not only pure salts, but chrystals of tartar, 
gumme arabick, myrrhe and other compound bodies. 
As also spirit of wine will dissolve not only the pure 



i8o The Sceptical Chymist 

sulphur of concretes, but likewise the whole substance 
of divers resinous bodies, as benzoin, the gummous parts 
of jalap, gumme lacca, and other bodies that are counted 
perfectly mixt. And we see that the extracts made 
either with water or spirit of wine are not of a simple 
and elementary nature, but masses consisting of the 
looser corpuscles, and finer parts of the concretes whence 
they are drawn ; since by distillation they may be divided 
into more elementary substances. 

Next, we may consider that even when there intervenes 
a chymical resolution by the fire, 'tis seldom in the saline 
or sulphureous principle, as such, that the desired faculty 
of the concrete resides ; but, as that titular salt or sulphur 
is yet a mixt body, though the saline or sulphureous 
nature be predominant in it. For, if in chymical resolu- 
tions the separated substances were pure and simple 
bodies, and of a perfect elementary nature; no one would 
be indued with more specifick vertues, than another; 

^and their qualities would differ as little as do those of 
water. And let me add this upon the by, that even 
eminent chymists have suffered themselves to be repre- 
hended by me for their over great diligence in purifying 
some of the things they obtain by fire from mixt bodies. 
For though such compleatly purifyed ingredients of 
bodies might perhaps be more satisfactory to our under- 
standing; yet others are often more useful to our lives; 
the efficacy of such chymical productions depending most 
upon what they retain of the bodies whence they are 
separated, or gain by the new associations of the dissi- 
pated among themselves; whereas if they were merely 
elementary, their uses would be comparatively very small; 
and the vertues of sulphurs, salts, or other such substances 
of one denomination, would be the very same. 
And by the way (Eleutherius) I am inclined upon this 

, ground to think, that the artificial resolution of compound 
bodies by fire does not so much enrich mankind, as it 
divides them into their supposed principles; as upon the 
score of its making new compounds by new combinations 
of the dissipated parts of the resolved body. For by 
this means the number of mixt bodies is considerably 



The Sceptical Chymist 181 

increased; and many of those new productions are 
endowed with useful qualities; divers of which they owe 
not to the body from which they were obtained, but to 
their newly acquired texture. 

But thirdly, that which is principally to be noted is this, 
that as there are divers concretes, whose faculties reside 
in some one or other of those differing substances, that 
chymists call their sulphurs, salts, and mercuries, and 
consequently may be best obtained, by analyzing the 
concrete whereby the desired principles may be had 
severed or freed from the rest; so there are others wherein 
the noblest properties lodge not in the salt, or sulphur, 
or mercury, but depend immediately upon the form, or 
(if you will) result from the determinate structure of the 
whole concrete ; and consequently they that go about to 
extract the vertues of such bodies, by exposing them to 
the violence of the fire, do exceedingly mistake, and take 
the way to destroy what they would obtain. 

I remember that Helmont himself somewhere confesses, 
that as the fire betters some things and improves their 
vertues, so it spoyles others and makes them degenerate. 
And elsewhere he judiciously affirmes, that there may 
be sometimes greater vertue in a simple, such as nature 
has made it, than in anything that can by the fire be 
separated from it. And lest you should doubt whether 
he means by the vertues of things those that are medical: 
he has in one place this ingenuous confession; " Credo 
(saies he) simplicia in sua simplicitate esse sufficientia 
pro sanatione omnium morborum." Nay, Barthius, 
even in a comment upon Beguinus, scruples not to make 
this acknowledgment; " Valde absurdum est (saies he) 
ex omnibus rebus extracta facere, salia, quintas essentias; 
prgesertim ex substantiis per se plane vel subtilibus vel 
homogeneis, quales sunt uniones, corallia, moscus, 
ambra, etc.' ' Consonantly whereunto he also tells us, (and 
vouches the famous Platerus, for having candidly given 
the same advertisement to his auditors), that some things 
have greater vertues, and better suited to our humane 
nature, when unprepared, than when they have past the 
chymists fire; as we see, saies my author, in pepper; of 



1 82 The Sceptical Chymist 

which some grains swallowed perform more towards the 
relief of a distempered stomack, than a great quantity 
of the oyle of the same spice. 

It has been (pursues Carneades) by our friend here 
present observed concerning salt-petre, that none of the 
substances into which the fire is wont to divide it, retaines 
either the taste, the cooling vertue, or some other of the 
properties of the concrete; and that each of those sub- 
stances acquires new qualities not to be found in salt- 
petre itself. The shining property of the tayls of glow- 
worms does survive but so short a time the little animal 
made conspicuous by it, that inquisitive men have not 
scrupled publickly to deride Baptista Porta and others; 
who, deluded perhaps with some chymical surmises, have 
ventured to prescribe the distillation of a water from 
the tayles of glowwormes, as a sure way to obtain a liquor 
shining in the dark. To which I shall now add no other 
example than that afforded us by amber; which, whilst 
it remains an intire body, is endowed with an electrical 
faculty of drawing to itself feathers, strawes, and such 
like bodies ; which I never could observe either in its salt, 
its spirit, its oyle, or in the body I remember I once made 
by the reunion of its divided elements; none of these 
having such a texture as the intire concrete. And how- 
ever chymists boldly deduce such and such properties 
from this or that proportion of their component principles; 
yet in concretes that abound with this or that ingredient, 
'tis not alwaies so much by vertue of its presence, nor its 
plenty, that the concrete is qualifyed to perform such 
and such effects; as upon the account of the particular 
texture of that and the other ingredients, associated after 
a determinate manner into one concrete : though possibly 
such a proportion of that ingredient may be more con- 
venient than another for the constituting of such a body. 
Thus in a clock the hand is moved upon the dyal, the bell 
is struck, and the other actions belonging to the engine 
are performed, not because the wheeles are of brass or 
iron, or part of one metal and part of another, or because 
the weights are of lead, but by vertue of the size, shape, 
bigness, and co-aptation of the several parts; which would 



The Sceptical Chymist 183 

performe the same things though the wheels were of 
silver, or lead, or wood, and the weights of stone or clay; 
provided the fabrick or contrivance of the engine were 
the same : though it be not to be denyed, that brass and 
steel are more convenient materials to make clock-wheels 
of than lead, or wood. And to let you see, Eleutherius, 
that 'tis sometimes at least, upon the texture of the small 
parts of a body, and not alwaies upon the presence, or 
recess, or increase, or decrement of any one of its principles, 
that it may loose some such qualities, and acquire some 
such others as are thought very strongly inherent to the 
bodies they reside in; I will add to what may from my 
past discourse be referred to this purpose, this notable 
example, from my own experience; That lead may without 
any additament, and only by various applications of the 
fire, lose its colour; and acquire sometimes a gray, some- 
times a yellowish, sometimes a red, sometimes an ame- 
thystine colour ; and after having past through these, and 
perhaps divers others, again recover its leaden colour, 
and be made a bright body. That also this lead, which 
is so flexible a metal, may be made as brittle as glasse, 
and presently be brought to be again flexible and malleable 
as before. And besides, that the same lead, which I find 
by microscopes to be one of the most opacous bodies in 
the world, may be reduced to a fine transparent glass; 
whence yet it may return to an opacous nature again; 
and all this, as I said, without the addition of any ex- 
traneous body, and merely by the manner and method 
of exposing it to the fire. 

But (saies Carneades) after having already put you 
to so prolix a trouble, it is time for me to relieve you 
with a promise of putting speedily a period to it; and to 
make good that promise, I shall from all that I have 
hitherto discoursed with you, deduce but this one pro- 
position by way of corollary. [That it may as yet be 
doubted, whether or no there be any determinate number 
of elements ; or, if you please, whether or no all compound 
bodies, do consist of the same number of elementary 
ingredients or material principles] 

This being but an inference from the foregoing discourse, 



1 84 The Sceptical Chymist 

it will not be requisite to insist at large on the proofs of 
it; but only to point at the chief of them, and referr you 
for particulars to what has been already delivered. 

In the first place, then, from what has been so largely 
discoursed, it may appear, that the experiments wont to 
be brought, whether by the common peripateticks, or 
by the vulgar chymists, to demonstrate, that all mixt 
bodies are made up precisely either of the four elements, 
or the three hypostatical principles, do not evince what 
they are alledged to prove. And as for the other common 
arguments, pretended to be drawn from reason in favour 
of the Aristotelian hypothesis (for the chymists are wont 
to rely almost altogether upon experiments) they are 
commonly grounded upon such unreasonable or precarious 
suppositions, that 'tis altogether as easie and as just for 
any man to reject them, as for those that take them 
for granted to assert them, being indeed all of them as 
indemonstrable as the conclusion to be inferred from 
them; and some of them so manifestly weak and proof- 
lesse; that he must be a very courteous adversary, that 
can be willing to grant them; and as unskilful a one, that 
can be compelled to do so. 

In the next place, it may be considered, if what those 
patriarchs of the spagyrists, Paracelsus and Helmont, do 
on divers occasions positively deliver, be true; namely 
that the alkahest does resolve all mixt bodies into other 
principles than the fire, it must be decided which of the 
two resolutions (that made by the alkahest, or that made 
by the fire) shall determine the number of the elements, 
before we can be certain how many there are. 

And in the meantime, we may take notice in the last 
place, that as the distinct substances whereinto the 
alkahest divides bodies, are affirmed to be differing in 
nature from those whereunto they are wont to be reduced 
by fire, and to be obtained from some bodies more in 
number than from some others; since he tells us, he could 
totally reduce all sorts of stones into salt only, whereas 
of a coal he had two distinct liquors. So although we 
should acquiesce in that resolution which is made by fire, 
we find not that all mixt bodies are thereby divided into 



The Sceptical Chymist 185 

the same number of elements and principles; some con- 
cretes affording more of them than others do; nay and 
sometimes this or that body affording a greater number 
of differing substances by one way of management, than 
the same yeelds by another. And they that out of gold, 
or mercury, or muscovy-glass, will draw me as many 
distinct substances, as I can separate from vitriol, or 
from the juice of grapes variously ordered, may teach me 
that which I shall very thankfully learn. Nor does it 
appear more congruous to that variety that so much 
conduceth to the perfection of the universe, that all 
elemented bodies be compounded of the same number of 
elements, than it would be for a language, that all its 
words should consist of the same number of letters. 



THE SIXTH PART 

A PARADOXICAL APPENDIX TO THE FOREGOING TREATISE 

HERE Carneades having dispacht what he thought 
requisite to oppose against what the chymists are wont 
to alledge for proof of their three principles, paused 
a while, and looked about him, to discover whether it 
were time for him and his friend to rejoyne the rest of 
the company. But Eleutherius perceiving nothing yet 
to forbid them to prosecute their discourse a little further, 
said to his friend, (who had likewise taken notice of the 
same thing) I halfe expected, Carneades, that after you 
had so freely declared your doubting, whether there be 
any determinate number of elements, you would have 
proceeded to question whether there be any elements at 
all. And I confess it will be a trouble to me if you defeat 
me of my expectation ; especially since you see the leasure 
we have allowed us may probably suffice to examine that 
paradox; because you have so largely deduced already 
many things pertinent to it, that you need but intimate 
how you would have them applyed, and what you would 
inferr from them. 

Carneades having in vain represented that their leasure 
could be but very short, that he had already prated very 
long, that he was unprepared to maintain so great and 
so invidious a paradox, was at length prevailed with to 
tell his friend; Since, Eleutherius, you will have me 
discourse ex tern-pore of the paradox you mention, I am 
content, (though more perhaps to express my obedience, 
than my opinion) to tell you that (supposing the truth 
of Helmont's and Paracelsus's alkahestical experiments, 
if I may so call them) though it may seem extravagant, 
- yet it is not absurd to doubt, whether, for ought has been 
v proved, there be a necessity to admit any elements, or 
hypostatical principles, at all. 

And, as formerly, so now, to avoid the needless trouble 
1 86 



The Sceptical Chymist 187 

of disputing severally with the Aristotelians and the 
chymists, I will address myself to oppose them I have 
last named, because their doctrine about the elements 
is more applauded by the moderns, as pretending highly 
to be grounded upon experience. And, to deal not only 
fairly but favourably with them, I will allow them to 
take in earth and water to their other principles. Which 
I consent to the rather, that my discourse may the better 
reach the tenents of the peripateticks ; who cannot plead 
for any so probably as for those two elements; that of 
fire above the air being generally by judicious men 
exploded as an imaginary thing; and the air not con- 
curring to compose mixt bodies as one of their elements, 
but only lodging in their pores, or rather replenishing, 
by reason of its weight and fluidity, all those cavities of 
bodies here below, whether compounded or not, that are 
big enough to admit it, and are not filled up with any 
grosser substance. 

And, to prevent mistakes, I must advertize you, that 
I now mean by elements, as those chymists that speak 
plainest do by their principles, certain primitive and 
simple, or perfectly unmingled bodies; which not being 
made of any other bodies, or of one another, are the 
ingredients of which all those called perfectly mixt bodies 
are immediately compounded, and into which they are 
ultimately resolved: now whether there be any one such 
body to be constantly met with in all, and each, of those 
that are said to be elemented bodies, is the thing I now 
question. 

By this state of the controversie you will, I suppose, 
guess, that I need not be so absurd, as to deny that there 
are such bodies as earth and water, and quicksilver, and 
sulphur : but I look upon earth and water, as component 
parts of the universe, or rather of the terrestrial globe, 
not of all mixt bodies. And though I will not peremp- 
torily deny that there may sometimes either a running 
mercury, or a combustible substance be obtained from 
a mineral, or even a metal; yet I need not concede either 
of them to be an element in the sence above declared; 
as I shall have occasion to shew you by and by. 



1 88 The Sceptical Chymist 

To give you then a brief account of the grounds I intend 

to proceed upon, I must tell you, that in matters of 

philosophy, this seems to me a sufficient reason to doubt 

, of a known and important proposition, that the truth 

* of it is not yet by any competent proof made to appear. 

And congruously hereunto, if I shew that the grounds, 

upon which men are perswaded that there are elements, 

are unable to satisfie a considering man, I suppose my 

doubts will appear rational. 

Now the considerations that induce men to think, that 
there are elements, may be conveniently enough referred 
to two heads. Namely, the one, that it is necessary that 
nature make use of elements to constitute the bodies that 
are reputed mixt. And the other, that the resolution 
of such bodies manifests that nature had compounded 
them of elementary ones. 

In reference to the former of these considerations, there 
are two or three things that I have to represent. 

And I will begin with reminding you of the experiments 
I not long since related to you concerning the growth of 
pompions, mint, and other vegetables out of fair water. 
For by those experiments it seems evident, that water 
may be transmuted into all the other elements; from 
whence it may be inferred, both, that 'tis not everything 
chymists will call salt, sulphur, or spirit, that needs 
alwaies be a primordiate and ingenerable body. And, 
that nature may contex a plant (though that be a perfectly 
mixt concrete) without having all the elements previously 
presented to her to compound it of. And, if you will 
allow the relation I mentioned out of Mounsieur De 
Rochas to be true ; then may not only plants, but animals 
and minerals too, be produced out of water. And how- 
ever there is little doubt to be made, but that the plants 
my tryals afforded me, as they were like in so many other 
respects to the rest of the plants of the same denomination; 
so they would, in case I had reduced them to putrefaction, 
have likewise produced wormes or other insects, as well 
as the resembling vegetables are wont to do; so that 
water may, by various seminal principles, be successively 
transmuted into both plants and animals. And if we 



The Sceptical Chymist 189 

consider that not only men, but even sucking children 
are, but too often, tormented with solid stones; and that 
divers sorts of beasts themselves, (whatever Helmont 
against experience think to the contrary) may be troubled 
with great and heavy stones in their kidneys and bladders, 
though they feed but upon grass and other vegetables, 
that are perhaps but disguised water, it will not seem 
improbable that even some concretes of a mineral nature, 
may likewise be formed of water. 

We may further take notice, that as a plant may be 
nourisht, and consequently may consist of common water; 
so may both plants and animals, (perhaps even from their 
seminal rudiments) consist of compound bodies, without 
having anything merely elementary brought them by 
nature to be compounded by them: this is evident in 
divers men, who whilst they were infants were fed only 
with milk, afterwards live altogether upon flesh, fish, 
wine, and other perfectly mixt bodies. It may be seen 
also in sheep, who on some of our English downs or plains, 
grow very fat by feeding upon the grass, without scarce 
drinking at all. And yet more manifestly in the magots 
that breed and grow up to their full bignesse within the 
pulps of apples, pears, or the like fruit. We see also, 
that dungs that abound with a mixt salt give a much 
more speedy increment to corn and other vegetables, 
than water alone would do : and it hath been assured me, 
by a man experienced in such matters, that sometimes 
when to bring up roots very early, the mould they were 
planted in was made over-rich, the very substance of the 
plant has tasted of the dung. And let us also consider 
a graft of one kind of fruit upon the upper bough of a tree 
of another kind. As (for instance) the scion of a pear 
upon a white-thorne; for there the ascending liquor 
is already altered, either by the root, or in its ascent by 
the bark, or both wayes, and becomes a new mixt body: 
as may appear by the differing qualities to be met with in 
the saps of several trees; as particularly, the medicinal 
vertue of the birch-water, which I have sometimes drunk 
upon Helmont' s great and not undeserved commendation. 
Now the graft, being fastened to the stock, must neces- 



190 The Sceptical Chymist 

sarily nourish itself, and produce its fruit, only out of this 
compound juice prepared for it by the stock, being unable 
to come at any other aliment. And if we consider, how 
much of the vegetable he feeds upon may (as we noted 
above) remain in an animal; we may easily suppose, that 
the blood of that animal who feeds upon this, though 
it be a well constituted liquor, and have all the differing 
corpuscles, that make it up, kept in order by one presiding 
form, may be a strangly decompounded body, many of 
its parts being themselves decompounded. So little is it 
necessary that even in the mixtures which nature herself 
makes in animal and vegetable bodies, she should have 
pure elements at hand to make her compositions of. 

Having said thus much touching the constitution of 
plants and animals, I might perhaps be able to say as 
much touching that of minerals, and even metals, if it 
were as easy for us to make experiment in order to the 
production of these, as of those. But the growth or 
increment of minerals being usually a work of excessively 
long time, and for the most part performed in the bowels 
of the earth, where we cannot see it, I must instead of 
experiments make use, on this occasion, of observations. 

That stones were not all made at once, but that some 
of them are nowadayes generated, may (though it be 
denyed by some) be fully proved by several examples, 
of which I shall now scarce alledge any other, than that 
famous place in France known by the name of Les Caves 
Goutieres, where the water falling from the upper parts 
of the cave to the ground does presently there condense 
into little stones, of such figures as the drops, falling 
either severally or upon one another, and coagulating 
presently into stone, chance to exhibit. Of these stones 
some ingenious friends of ours, that went a while since 
to visit that place, did me the favour to present me with 
some that they brought thence. And I remember that 
both that sober relator of his voyages, Van Linschoten, 
and another good author, inform us that in the diamond 
mines (as they call them) in the East-Indies, when having 
diged the earth, though to no great depth, they find 
diamonds and take them quite away; yet in a very few 



The Sceptical Chymist 191 

years they find in the same place new diamonds produced 
there since. From both which relations, especially the 
first, it seems probable that nature does not alwaies stay 
for divers elementary bodies, when she is to produce 
stones. And as for metals themselves, authors of good 
note assure us, that even they were not in the beginning 
produced at once altogether, but have been observed 
to grow; so that what was not a mineral or metal before, 
became one afterwards. Of this it were easie to alledge 
many testimonies of professed chymists. But that they 
may have the greater authority, I shall rather present 
you with a few borrowed from more unsuspected writers. 
" Sulphuris mineram (as the inquisitive P. Fallopius 
notes) quse nutrix est caloris subterranei fabri seu archsei 
fontium et mineralium, infra terram citissim renasci tes- 
tantur historiae metallicse. Sunt enim loca quibus si 
hoc anno sulphur effossum fuerit; intermissa fossione 
per quadriennium redeunt fossores et omnia sulphure, 
ut antea, rursus inveniunt plena." Pliny relates, " In 
Italiae insula Ilva, gigni ferri metallum. Strabo multo 
expressius; effossum ibi metallum semper regenerari. 
Nam si effossio spatio centum annorum intermittebatur, 
et iterum illuc revertebantur, fossores reperisse maximam 
copiam ferri regeneratam." Which history not only is 
countenanced by Fallopius, from the income which the 
iron of that island yeelded the Duke of Florence in his 
time; but is mentioned more expressely to our purpose, 
by the learned Cesalpinus. " Vena (saies he) ferri copio- 
sissima est in Italia; ob earn nobilitata Ilva Tyrrheni 
maris . insula incredibili copia etiam nostris temporibus 
earn gignens : nam terra quse eruitur, dum vena off oditur 
tota, procedente tempore in venam convertitur." Which 
last clause is therefore very notable, because from thence 
we may deduce, that earth, by a metalline plastick 
principle latent in it, may be in processe of time changed 
into a metal. And even Agricola himself, though the 
chymists complain of him as their adversary, acknow- 
ledges thus much and more; by telling us that at a town 
called Saga in Germany, they dig up iron in the fields, 
by sinking ditches two foot deep; and adding, that within 



192 The Sceptical Chymist 

the space of ten years the ditches are digged again for 
iron since produced, as the same metal is wont to be 
obtained in Ilva. Also concerning lead, not to mention 
what even Galen notes, that it will increase both in bulk 
and weight if it be long kept in vaults or sellers, where 
the air is gross and thick, as he collects from the swelling 
of those pieces of lead that were imployed to fasten to- 
gether the parts of old statues. Not to mention this, I 
say, Boccacius Certaldus, as I find him quoted by a 
diligent writer, has this passage touching the growth 
of lead. " Fessularum mons (saies he) in Hetruria, 
Florentiae civitati imminens, lapides plumbarios habet; 
qui si excidantur, brevi temporis spatio, novis increments 
instaurantur; ut (annexes my author) tradit Boccacius 
Certaldus, qui id compertissimum esse scribit. Nihil hoc 
novi est; sed de eodem Plinius, lib. 34. Hist. Natur. cap. 
17. dudum prodidit, inquiens, mirum in his solis plumbi 
metallis, quod derelicta fertilius reviviscunt. In plum- 
bariis secundo lapide ab amberga dictis ad asylum recre- 
menta congesta in cumulos, exposita solibus pluviisque 
paucis annis, reddunt suum metallum cum fcenore." I 
might add to these (continues Carneades) many things 
that I have met with concerning the generation of gold 
and silver. But for fear of wanting time, I shall mention 
but two or three narratives. The first you may find 
recorded by Gerhardus the physick professor, in these 
words. " In valle (saies he) Joachimica argentum 
graminis modo et more lapidibus minerae velut e radice 
excrevisse digiti longitudine, testis est Dr. Schreterus, 
qui ejusmodi venas aspectu jucundas et admirabiles domi 
suae aliis ssepe monstravit et donavit. Item aqua cserulea 
inventa est Annebergse, ubi argentum erat adhuc in 
primo ente, quae coagulata redacta est in calcem fixi et 
boni argenti." 

The other two relations I have not met with in Latine 
authors, and yet they are both very memorable in them- 
selves, and pertinent to our present purpose. 

The first I meet with in the commentary of Johannes 
Valehius upon the Kleine Baur, in which that industrious 
chymist relates, with many circumstances, that at a mine- 



The Sceptical Chymist 193 

town (if I may so English the German Bergstat) eight 
miles or leagues distant from Strasburg called Mariakirch, 
a workman came to the overseer, and desired employment ; 
but he telling him that there was not any of the best sort 
at present for him, added that till he could be preferred 
to some such, he might in the meantime, to avoid idle- 
ness, work in a grove or mine-pit thereabouts, which at 
that time was little esteemed. This workman after some 
weeks labour, had by a crack appearing in the stone upon 
a stroak given near the wall, an invitation given him to 
work his way through, which as soon as he had done, 
his eyes were saluted by a mighty stone or lump which 
stood in the middle of the cleft (that had a hollow place 
behind it) upright, and in shew like an armed-man; but 
consisted of pure fine silver having no vein or ore by it, 
or any other additament, but stood there free, having 
only underfoot something like a burnt matter; and yet 
this one lump held in weight above a 1000 marks, which, 
according to the Dutch account, makes 500 pound weight 
of fine silver. From which and other circumstances my 
author gathers ; that by the warmth of the place, the noble 
metalline spirits, (sulphureous and mercurial) were carried 
from the neighbouring galleries or vaults, through other 
smaller cracks and clefts into that cavity, and there 
collected as in a close chamber or cellar; whereinto when 
they were gotten, they did in process of time settle into 
the forementioned precious mass of metal. 

The other Germane relation is of that great traveller 
and laborious chymist Johannes (not Georgius) Agricola; 
who in his notes upon what Poppius has written of 
antimony, relates, that when he was among the Hungarian 
mines in the deep groves, he observed that there would 
often arise in them a warm steam, (not of that malignant 
sort which the Germans call Shwadt, which (saies he) is 
a meer poyson, and often suffocates the diggers) which 
fastened itself to the walls; and that coming again to 
review it after a couple of dayes, he discerned that it was 
all very fast, and glistering; whereupon having collected 
it and distilled it per retortam, he obtained from it a fine 

N 



194 The Sceptical Chymist 

spirit: adding, that the mine-men informed him, that 
this steam, or damp (as the English men also call it, 
retaining the Dutch term) would at last have become 
a metal, as gold or silver. 

I referr (saies Carneades) to another occasion, the use 
that may be made of these narratives towards the explicat- 
ing the nature of metalls; and that of fixtness, malleable- 
ness, and some other qualities conspicuous in them. And 
in the meantime, this I may at present deduce from these 
observations; That 'tis not very probable, that, whenso- 
ever a mineral, or even a metal, is to be generated in the 
bowels of the earth, nature needs to have at hand both 
salt, and sulphur, and mercury to compound it of; for, 
not to urge that the two last relations seem less to favour 
the chymists than Aristotle, who would have metals 
generated of certain halitus or steams, the forementioned 
observations together, make it seem more likely that the 
mineral earths or those metalline steams (wherewith 
probably such earths are plentifully imbued) do contain 
in them some seminal rudiment, or something equivalent 
thereunto; by whose plastick power the rest of the 
matter, though perhaps terrestrial and heavy, is in tract 
of time fashioned into this or that metalline ore; almost 
(as I formerly noted) as that fair water was by the seminal 
principle of mint, pompions, and other vegetables, con- 
trived into bodies answerable to such seeds. And that 
such alterations of terrestrial matter are not impossible, 
seems evident from that notable practice of the boylers of 
salt-petre, who unanimously observe, as well here in 
England as in other countries, that if an earth pregnant 
with nitre be deprived, by the affusion of water, of all 
its true and dissoluble salt, yet the earth will after some 
years yeeld them salt-petre again; for which reason some 
of the eminent and skilfullest of them keep it in heaps as 
a perpetual mine of salt-petre; whence it may appear, 
that the seminal principle of nitre latent in the earth does 
by degrees transforme the neighbouring matter into a 
nitrous body; for though I deny that some volatile nitre 
may by such earths be attracted (as they speak) out of 
the air, yet that the innermost parts of such great heaps 



The Sceptical Chymist 195 

that lye so remote from the air should borrow from it all 
the nitre they abound with, is not probable, for other 
reasons besides the remoteness of the air, though I have 
not the leasure to mention them. 

And I remember, that a person of great credit, and well 
acquainted with the wayes of making vitriol, affirmed to 
me, that he had observed, that a kind of mineral which 
abounds in that salt, being kept within doors and not 
exposed (as is usual) to the free air and rains, did of itself 
in no very long time turn into vitriol, not only in the 
outward or superficial, but even in the internal and most 
central parts. 

And I also remember, that I met with a certain kind 
of marchasite that lay together in great quantities under 
ground, which did, even in my chamber, in so few hours 
begin of itself to turne into vitriol, that we need not 
distrust the newly recited narrative. But to return to 
what I was saying of nitre; as nature made this salt- 
petre out of the once almost an inodorous earth it was 
bread in and did not find a very stinking and corrosive 
acid liquor, and a sharp alcalizate salt to compound it of, 
though these be the bodies into which the fire dissolves it; 
so it were not necessary that nature should make up all 
metals and other minerals of pre-existent salt, and sulphur, 
and mercury, though such bodies might by fire be obtained 
from it. Which one consideration duly weighed is very 
considerable in the present controversy: and to this 
agree well the relations of our two German chymists; 
for besides that it cannot be convincingly proved, it is 
not so much as likely that so languid and moderate a 
heat as that within the mines, should carry up to so great 
a height, though in the forme of fumes, salt, sulphur, and 
mercury; since we find in our distillations, that it requires 
a considerable degree of fire to raise so much as to the 
height of one foot not only salt, but even mercury itself, 
in close vessels. And if it be objected, that it seems by 
the stink that is sometimes observed when lightning falls 
down here below, that sulphureous steams may ascend 
very high without any extraordinary degree of heat; it 
may be answered, among other things, that the sulphur 



196 The Sceptical Chymist 

of silver is by chymists said to be a fixt sulphur, though 
not altogether so well digested as that of gold. 

But, (proceeds Carneades) if it had not been to afford 
you some hints concerning the origine of metals, I need 
not have deduced anything from these observations; it 
not being necessary to the validity of my argument that 
my deductions from them should be irrefragable, because 
my adversaries the Aristotelians and vulgar chymists do 
not, I presume, know any better than I, a priori, of what 
ingredients nature compounds metals and minerals. For 
their argument to prove that those bodies are made up 
of such principles, is drawn a posteriori ; I mean from 
this, that upon the analysis of mineral bodies they are 
resolved into those differing substances. That we may 
therefore examine this argument, let us proceed to con- 
sider what can be alledged in behalf of the elements from 
the resolutions of bodies by the fire ; which you remember 
was the second topick whence I told you the arguments 
of my adversaries were desumed. 

And that I may first dispatch what I have to say con- 
cerning minerals, I will begin the remaining part of my 
discourse with considering how the fire divides them. 

And first, I have partly noted above, that though 
chymists pretend from some to draw salt, from others 
running mercury, and from others a sulphur; yet they 
have not hitherto taught us by any way in use among 
them to separate any one principle, whether salt, sulphur, 
or mercury, from all sorts of minerals without exception. 
And thence I may be allowed to conclude that there is not 
any of the elements that is an ingredient of all bodies, 
since there are some of which it is not so. 

In the next place, supposing that either sulphur or 
mercury were obtainable from all sorts of minerals. Yet 
still this sulphur or mercury would be but acompounded, 
not an elementary body, as I told you already on another 
occasion. And certainly he that takes notice of the 
wonderful operations of quicksilver, whether it be common, 
or drawn from mineral bodies, can scarce be so incon- 
siderate as to think it of the very same nature with that 
immature and fugitive substance which in vegetables 



The Sceptical Chymist 197 

and animals chymists have been pleased to call their 
mercury. So that when mercury is got by the help of the 
fire out of a metal or other mineral body, if we will not 
suppose that it was not pre-existent in it, but produced 
by the action of the fire upon the concrete, we may at 
least suppose this quicksilver to have been a perfect body 
of its own kind (though perhaps less heterogeneous than 
more secondary mixts) which happened to be mingled 
per minima, and coagulated with the other substances, 
whereof the metal or mineral consisted. As may be 
exemplyfied partly by native vermilion wherein the 
quicksilver and sulphur being exquisitely blended both 
with one another, and that other course mineral stuff 
(whatever it be) that harbours them, make up a red body 
differing enough from both; and yet from which part 
of the quicksilver, and of the sulphur, may be easily 
enough obtained; partly by those mines wherein nature 
has so curiously incorporated silver with lead, that 'tis 
extremely difficult, and yet possible, to separate the 
former out of the latter; and partly too by native vitriol, 
wherein the metalline corpuscles are by skill and industry 
separable from the saline ones, though they be so con- 
coagulated with them, that the whole concrete is reckoned 
among salts. 

And here I further observe, that I never could see any 
earth or water, properly so called, separated from either 
gold or silver (to name now no other metalline bodies) 
and therefore to retort the argument upon my adversaries, 
I may conclude, that since there are some bodies in which, 
for ought appears, there is neither earth nor water; I 
may be allowed to conclude, that neither of those two is 
an universal ingredient of all those bodies that are counted 
perfectly mixt, which I desire you would remember 
against anon. 

It may indeed be objected, that the reason why from 
gold or silver we cannot separate any moisture, is, because 
that when it is melted out of the oar, the vehement fire 
requisite to its fusion forced away all the aqueous and 
fugitive moisture; and the like fire may do from the 
materials of glass. To which I shall answer, that I 



198 The Sceptical Chymist 

remember I read not long since in the learned Josephus 
Acosta, who relates it upon his own observation; that in 
America (where he long lived) there is a kind of silver 
which the Indians call papas, and sometimes (saies he) 
they find pieces very fine and pure like to small round 
roots, the which is rare in that metal, but usual in gold 
concerning which metal he tells us, that besides this they 
find some which they call gold in grains, which he tells us 
are small morsells of gold that they find whole without 
mixture of any other metal, which hath no need of melting 
or refining in the fire. 

I remember that a very skilful and credible person 
affirmed to me, that being in the Hungarian mines he had 
the good fortune to see a mineral that was there digged 
up, wherein pieces of gold of the length, and also almost 
of the bigness of a humane finger, grew in the oar, as if 
they had been parts and branches of trees. 

And I have myself seen a lump of whitish mineral, that 
was brought as a rarity to a great and knowing prince, 
wherein there grew here and there in the stone, which 
looked like a kind of sparr, divers little lumps of fine gold, 
(for such I was assured that tryal had manifested it to be) 
some of them seeming to be about the bigness of pease. 

But that is nothing to what our Acosta subjoynes, which 
is indeed very memorable, namely, that of the morsels 
of native and pure gold, which we lately heard him men- 
tioning, he had now and then seen some that weighed 
many pounds; to which I shall add, that I myself have 
seen a lump of oar not long since digged up, in whose 
stony part there grew, almost like trees, divers parcels 
though not of gold, yet of (what perhaps mineralists will 
more wonder at) another metal which seemed to be very 
pure or unmixt with any heterogeneous substances, and 
were some of them as big as my finger, if not bigger. But 
upon observations of this kind, though perhaps I could, 
yet I must not at present, dwell any longer. 

To proceed therefore now (saies Carneades) to the con- 
sideration of the analysis of vegetables, although my 
tryals give me no cause to doubt but that out of most of 
them five differing substances may be obtained by the 



The Sceptical Chymist 199 

fire, yet I think it will not be so easily demonstrated that 
these deserve to be called elements in the notion above 
explained. 

And before I descend to particulars, I shall repeat and 
premise this general consideration, that these differing 
substances that are called elements or principles, differ 
not from each other as metals, plants and animals, or as 
such creatures as are immediately produced each by its 
peculiar seed, and constitutes a distinct propagable sort 
of creatures in the universe; but these are only various 
schemes of matter or substances that differ from each 
other, but in consistence (as running mercury and the 
same metal congealed by the vapor of lead) and some 
very few other accidents, as taste, or smell, or inflamability. 
or the want of them. So that by a change of texture 
not impossible to be wrought by the fire and other agents 
that have the faculty, not only to dissociate the small 
parts of bodies, but afterwards to connect them after a 
new manner, the same parcel of matter may acquire or 
lose such accidents as may suffice to denominate it salt, 
or sulphur, or earth. If I were fully to clear to you my 
apprehensions concerning this matter, I should perhaps 
be obliged to- acquaint you with divers of the conjectures 
(for I must yet call them no more) I have had concerning 
the principles of things purely corporeal: for though 
because I seem not satisfied with the vulgar doctrines, 
either of the peripatetick or Paracelsian schooles, many 
of those that know me, (and perhaps, among them, 
Eleutherius himself) have thought me wedded to the 
Epicurean hypothesis, (as others have mistaken me for 
an Helmontian) yet if you knew how little conversant 
I have been with Epicurean authors, and how great a part 
of Lucretius himself I never yet had the curiosity to read, 
you would perchance be of another mind; especially if 
I were to entertain you at large, I say not, with my present 
notions; but with my former thoughts concerning the 
principles of things. But, as I said above, fully to clear 
my apprehensions would require a longer discourse than 
we can now have. 

For, I should tell you that I have sometimes thought 



200 The Sceptical|Chymist 

it not unfit, that to the principles which may be assigned 
to things, as the world is now constituted, we should, if we 
consider the great mass of matter as it was whilst the 
. universe was in making, add another, which may con- 
/ veniently enough be called an architectonick principle 
or power; by which I mean those various determinations, 
and that skilfull guidance of the motions of the small 
parts of the universal matter by the most wise Author of 
things, which were necessary at the beginning to turn 
that confused chaos into this orderly and beautiful world; 
and especially, to contrive the bodies of animals and 
plants, and the seeds of those things whose kinds were 
to be propagated. For I confess I cannot well conceive, 
how from matter, barely put into motion, and then left 
to itself, there could emerge such curious fabricks as the 
bodies of men and perfect animals, and such yet more 
admirably contrived parcels of matter, as the seeds of 
living creatures. 

I should likewise tell you upon what grounds, and in 
what sence, I suspected the principles of the world, as it 
v/ now is, to be three, matter, motion, and rest. I say, as 
the world now is, because the present fabrick of the 
universe, and especially the seeds of things, together with 
the establisht course of nature, is a requisite or condition, 
upon whose account divers things may be made out by 
our three principles, which otherwise would be very hard, 
if possible, to explicate. 

I should moreover declare in general (for I pretend 
not to be able to do it otherwise) not only why I conceive 
that colours, odours, tastes, fluidness and solidity, and 
those other qualities that diversifie and denominate bodies 
/ may intelligibly be deduced from these three; but how two 
of the three Epicurean principles (which, I need not tell 
you, are magnitude, figure, and weight) are themselves 
deducible from matter and motion; since the latter of 
these variously agitating, and, as it were, distracting the 
former, must needs disjoyne its parts; which being 
actually separated must each of them necessarily both 
be of some size, and obtain some shape or other. Nor 
did I add to our principles the Aristotelian privation, 



The Sceptical Chymist 201 

partly for other reasons, which I must not now stay to 
insist on; and partly because it seems to be rather an 
antecedent, or a terminus a quo, than a true principle, 
as the starting-post is none of the horses legs or limbs. 

I should also explain why and how I made rest, to be, 
though not so considerable a principle of things, as motion; 
yet a principle of them; partly because it is (for ought we 
know) as ancient at least as it, and depends not upon 
motion, nor any other quality of matter; and partly, 
because it may enable the body in which it happens to be, 
both to continue in a state of rest till some external force 
put it out of that state, and to concur to the production 
of divers changes in the bodies that hit against it, by 
either quite stopping or lessening their motion (whilst the 
body formerly at rest receives all or part of it into itself) 
or else by giving a new byass, or some other modification, 
to motion, that is, to the grand and primary instrument 
whereby nature produces all the changes and other 
qualities that are to be met with in the world. 

I should likewise, after all this, explain to you how, 
although matter, motion and rest, seemed to me to be 
the catholick principles of the universe, I thought the 
principles of particular bodies might be commodiously 
enough reduced to two, namely matter, and (what com- 
prehends the two other, and their effects) the result, or 
aggregate, or complex of those accidents, which are the 
motion or rest, (for in some bodies both are not to be 
found) the bigness, figure, texture, and the thence resulting 
qualities of the small parts, which are necessary to intitle 
the body whereto they belong to this or that peculiar * 
denomination ; and discriminating it from others to appro- 
priate it to a determinate kind of things, (as yellowness, 
fixtness, such a degree of weight, and of ductility, do 
make the portion of matter wherein they concur, to be 
reckoned among perfect metals, and obtain the name of 
gold) this aggregate or result of accidents you may if you 
please, call either structure, or texture, (though indeed, 
that do not so properly comprehend the motion of the 
constituent parts especially in case some of them be fluid) 
or what other appellation shall appear most expressive. 



202 The Sceptical Chymist 

Or if, retaining the vulgar terme, you will call it the 
jorme of the thing it denominates, I shall not much oppose 
it; provided the word be interpreted to mean but what 
I have expressed, and not a scholastick substantial jorme, 
which so many intelligent men profess to be to them 
altogether unintelligible. 

But, (saies Carneades) if you remember that 'tis a 
sceptick speaks to you, and that 'tis not so much my 
present talk to make assertions as to suggest doubts, 
I hope you will look upon what I have proposed, rather 
as a narrative of my former conjectures touching the 
principles of things, than as a resolute declaration of 
my present opinions of them; especially since although 
they cannot but appear very much to their disadvantage, 
if you consider them as they are proposed without those 
reasons and explanations by which I could perhaps make 
them appear much less extravagant; yet I want time to 
offer you what may be alledged to clear and countenance 
these notions; my design in mentioning them unto you 
at present being, partly, to bring some light and confirma- 
tion to divers passages of my discourse to you; partly 
to shew you, that I do not (as you seem to have suspected) 
f embrace all Epicurus his principles; but dissent from 
him in some main things, as well as from Aristotle and 
the chymists, in others ; and partly also, or rather chiefly, 
to intimate to you the grounds upon which I likewise 
differ from Helmont in this, that whereas he ascribes 
almost all things, and even diseases themselves, to their 
determinate seeds; I am of opinion, that besides the 
peculiar fabricks of the bodies of plants and animals (and 
perhaps also of some metals and minerals) which I take 
to be effects of seminal principles, there are many other 
bodies in nature which have and deserve distinct and 
proper names, but yet do but result from such contextures 
of the matter they are made of, as may without determi- 
nate seeds be effected by heat, cold, artificial mixtures and 
compositions, and divers other causes which sometimes 
nature imployes of her own accord; and oftentimes man 
by his power and skill makes use of to fashion the matter 
according to his intentions. This may be exemplified 



The Sceptical Chymist 203 

both in the productions of nature, and in those of art; 
of the first sort I might name multitudes; but to shew 
how slight a variation of textures without addition of 
new ingredients may procure a parcel of matter divert 
names, and make it be lookt upon as different things; 

I shall invite you to observe with me, that clouds, rain, 
hail, snow, frost, and ice, may be but water, having its 
parts varyed as to their size and distance in respect of 
each other, and as to motion and rest. And among 
artificial productions we may take notice (to skip the 
chrystals of tartar) of glass, regulus martis stellatus, and 
particularly of the sugar of lead, which though made of 
that insipid metal and sowre salt of vinegar, has in it 
a sweetness surpassing that of common sugar, and divers 
other qualities, which being not to be found in either of 
its two ingredients, must be confessed to belong to the 
concrete itself, upon the account of its texture. 

This consideration premised, it will be, I hope, the more 
easie to perswade you that the fire may as well produce 
some new textures in a parcel of matter, as destroy the 
old. 

Wherefore hoping that you have not forgot the argu- 
ments formerly imployed against the doctrine of the 
tria prima ; namely that the salt, sulphur, and mercury, 
into which the fire seems to resolve vegetable and animal 
bodies, are yet compounded, not simple and elementary 
substances; and that (as appeared by the experiment 
of pompions) the tria prima may be made out of water; 
hoping I say, that you remember these and the other 
things that I formerly represented to the same purpose, 
I shall now add only, that if we doubt not the truth of 
some of Helmont's relations, we may well doubt whether 
any of these heterogeneities be (I say not pre-existent, 
so as to convene together, when a plant or animal is to be 
constituted, but) so much as inexistent in the concrete 
whence they are obtained, when the chymist first goes 
about to resolve it; ^or, not to insist upon the uninflam- 
able spirit of such concretes, because that may be pre- 
tended to be but a mixture of phlegme and salt; the oyle 
or sulphur of vegetables or animals is, according to him, 



204 The Sceptical Chymist 

reducible by the help of lixiviate salts into sope; as that 
sope is by the help of repeated distillations from a caput 
mortuum of chalk into insipid water. And as for the 
saline substance that seems separable from mixt bodies; 
the same Helmont's tryals give us cause to think, that it 
may be a production of the fire which by transporting 
and otherwise altering the particles of the matter, does 
bring it to a saline nature. 

For I know (saies he, in the place formerly alledged 
to another purpose) a way to reduce all stones into a mere 
salt of equal weight with the stone whence it was produced, 
and that without any of the least either sulphur or 
mercury; which asseveration of my author would perhaps 
seem less incredible to you, if I durst acquaint you with 
all I could say upon that subject. And hence by the way 
you may also conclude that the sulphur and mercury, as 
they call them, that chymists are wont to obtain from 
compound bodies by the fire, may possibly in many cases 
be the productions of it; since if the same bodies had 
been wrought upon by the agents employed by Helmont, 
they would have yielded neither sulphur nor mercury; 
and those portions of them, which the fire would have 
presented us in the forme of sulphureous and mercurial 
bodies, would have, by Helmont's method, been exhibited 
to us in the form of salt. 

But though (saies Eleutherius) you have alledged yery 
plausible arguments against the tria prima, yet I see not 
how it will be possible for you to avoid acknowledging 
that earth and water are elementary ingredients, though 
not of mineral concretes, yet of all animal and vegetable 
bodies; since if any of these of what sort soever be com- 
mitted to distillation, there is regularly and constantly 
separated from it a phlegme or aqueous part, and a caput 
mortuum or earth. 

I readily acknowledge (answers Carneades) it is not so 
easy to reject water and earth (and especially the former) 
as 'tis to reject the tria prima, from being the elements 
of mixt bodies; but 'tis not every difficult thing that is 
impossible. 

I consider then, as to water, that the chief qualities 



The Sceptical Chymist 205 

which make men give that name to any visible substance, 
are that it is fluid or liquid, and that it is insipid and 
inodorous. Now as for the taste of these qualities, I think 
you have never seen any of those separated substances 
that the chymists call phlegme which was perfectly devoid 
both of taste and smell: and if you object, that yet it may 
be reasonably supposed, that since the whole body is 
liquid, the mass is nothing but elementary water faintly 
imbued with some of the saline or sulphureous parts of 
the same concrete, which it retained with it upon its 
separation from the other ingredients. To this I answer, 
that this objection would not appear so strong as it is 
plausible, if chymists understood the nature of fluidity 
and compactness; and that, as I formerly observed, to a 
bodies being fluid there is nothing necessary, but that 
it be divided into parts small enough; and that these 
parts be put into such a motion among themselves as to 
glide some this way and some that way, along each other's 
surfaces. So that although a concrete were never so dry, 
and had not any water or other liquor inexistent in it, 
yet such a comminution of its parts may be made, by the 
fire or other agents, as to turn a great portion of them 
into liquor. Of this truth I will give an instance, 
employed by our friend here present as one of the most 
conducive of his experiments to illustrate the nature of 
salts. If you take then sea salt, and melt it in the fire 
to free it from the aqueous parts, and afterwards distill 
it with a vehement fire from burnt clay, or any other, 
as dry a caput mortuum as you please, you will, as chymists 
confess by teaching it, drive over a good part of the salt 
in the form of a liquor. And to satisfy some ingenious 
men, that a great part of this liquor was still true sea salt 
brought by the operation of the fire into corpuscles so 
small, and perhaps so advantageously shaped, as to be 
capable of the forme of a fluid body, he did in my presence 
poure to such spiritual salts a due proportion of the spirit 
(or salt and phlegme) of urine, whereby having evaporated 
the superfluous moisture, he soon obtained such another 
concrete, both as to taste and smell, and casie sublimable- 
ness as common salt armoniack, which you know is made 



206 The Sceptical Chymist 

up of gross and undistilled sea salt united with the salts 
or urine and of soot, which two are very near of kin to 
each other. And further, to manifest that the corpuscles 
of sea salt and the saline ones of urine retain their several 
natures in this concrete, he mixt it with a convenient 
quantity of salt of tartar, and committing it to distillation 
soon regained his spirit of urine in a liquid form by itself, 
the sea salt staying behind with the salt of tartar. Where- 
fore it is very possible that dry bodies may by the fire be 
reduced to liquors without any separation of elements, 
but barely by a certain kind of dissipation and com- 
minution of the matter, whereby its parts are brought 
into a new state. And if it be still objected, that the 
phlegme of mixt bodies must be reputed water, because 
so weak a taste needs but a very small proportion of salt 
to impart it; it may be replyed, that for ought appears, 
common salt and divers other bodies, though they be 
distilled never so dry, and in never so close vessels, will 
yeeld each of them pretty store of a liquor, wherein 
though (as I lately noted) saline corpuscles abound, yet 
there is besides a large proportion of phlegme, as may 
easily be discovered by coagulating the saline corpuscles 
with any convenient body; as I lately told you, our friend 
coagulated part of the spirit of salt with spirit of urine: 
and as I have divers times separated a salt from oyle of 
vitriol itself (though a very ponderous liquor and drawn 
from a saline body) by boyling it with a just quantity of 
mercury, and then washing the newly coagulated salt 
from the precipitate with fair water. Now to what can 
we more probably ascribe this plenty of aqueous substance 
afforded us by the distillation of such bodies, than unto 
this, that among the various operations of the fire upon 
the matter of a concrete divers particles of that matter 
are reduced to such a shape and bigness, as is requisite 
to compose such a liquor as chymists are wont to call 
phlegme or water. How I conjecture this change may 
be effected, 'tis neither necessary for me to tell you, nor 
possible to do so without a much longer discourse than 
were now seasonable. But I desire you would with me 
reflect upon what I formerly told you concerning the 



The Sceptical Chymist 207 

change of quicksilver into water; for that water having 
but a very faint taste, if any whit more than divers of 
those liquors that chymists referr to phlegme, by that 
experiment it seems evident, that even a metalline body, 
and therefore much more such as are but vegetable or 
animal, may by a simple operation of the fire be turned 
in great part into water. And since those I dispute with 
are not yet able out of gold, or silver, or divers other 
concretes to separate anything like water; I hope I may 
be allowed to conclude against them, that water itself is 
not an universal and pre-existent ingredient of mixt 
bodies. 

But as for those chymists that, supposing with me the 
truth of what Helmont relates of the alkahest's wonderful 
effects, have a right to press me with his authority con- 
cerning them, and to alledge that he could transmute all 
reputed mixt bodies into insipid and mere water; to 
those I shall represent, that though his affirmations 
conclude strongly against the vulgar chymists (against 
whom I have not therefore scrupled to employ them) 
since they evince that the commonly reputed principles 
or ingredients of things are not permanent and inde- 
structible, since they may be further reduced into insipid 
phlegme differing from them all; yet till we can be 
allowed to examine this liquor, I think it not unreasonable 
to doubt whether it be not something else than mere 
water. For I find not any other reason given by Helmont 
of his pronouncing it so, than that it is insipid. Now 
sapour being an accident or an affection of matter that 
relates to our tongue, palate and other organs of taste, 
it may very possibly be, that the small parts of a body 
may be of such a size and shape, as either by their extream 
littleness, or by their slenderness, or by their figure, to be 
unable to pierce into and make perceptible impression 
upon the nerves or membranous parts of the organs of 
taste, and yet may be fit to work otherwise upon divers 
other bodies than mere water can, and consequently to 
disclose itself to be of a nature fair enough from elemen- 
tary. In silke dyed red or of any other colour, whilst 
many contiguous threads make up a skein, the colour of 



208 The Sceptical Chymist 

the silke is conspicuous; but if only a very few of them 
be lookt upon, the colour will appear much fainter than 
before. But if you take out one simple thread, you shall 
not easily be able to discern any colour at all; so subtile 
an object having not the force to make upon the optick 
nerve an impression great enough to be taken notice of. 
It is also observed, that the best sort of oyl-olive is almost 
tasteless, and yet I need not tell you how exceedingly 
distant in nature oyle is from water. The liquor into 
which I told you, upon the relation of Lully an eye-witness, 
that mercury might be transmuted, has sometimes but 
a very languid, if any taste ; and yet its operations even 
upon some mineral bodies are very peculiar. Quicksilver 
itself also, though the corpuscles it consists of be so very 
small, as to get into the pores of that closest and com- 
pactest of bodies, gold, is yet (you know) altogether 
tasteless. And our Helmont several times tells us, that 
fair water, wherein a little quantity of quicksilver has lain 
for some time, though it acquire no certain taste or other 
sensible quality from the quicksilver; yet it has a power 
to destroy wormes in human bodies ; which he does much, 
but not causelessly extoll. And I remember, a great 
lady, that had been eminent for her beauty in divers 
courts, confessed to me, that this insipid liquor was of all 
innocent washes for the face the best that she ever met 
with. 

And here let me conclude my discourse, concerning 
such waters or liquors as I have hitherto been examining, 
with these two considerations. Whereof the first is, That 
by reason of our being wont to drink nothing but wine, 
bear, cider, or other strongly tasted liquors, there may be 
in several of those liquors, that are wont to pass for insipid 
phlegme, very peculiar and distinct tastes, though unheeded 
(and perhaps not to be perceived) by us. For to omit 
what naturalists affirm of apes, (and which probably may 
be true of divers other animals) that they have a more 
exquisite palate than men: among men themselves, 
those that are wont to drink nothing but water, may 
(as I have tryed in myself) discern very sensibly a great 
difference of tastes in several waters, which one unaccus- 



The Sceptical Chymist 209 

tomed to drink water would take to be all alike insipid. 
And this is the first of my two considerations. The 
other is, That it is not impossible that the corpuscles, 
into which a body is dissipated by the fire, may by the 
operation of the same fire have their figures so altered, 
or may be by associations with one another brought into 
little, masses of such a size and shape, as not to be fit to 
make sensible impressions on the tongue. And that you 
may not think such alterations impossible, be pleased 
to consider with me, that not only the sharpest spirit of 
vinegar having dissolved as much corall as it can, will 
coagulate with it into a substance, which, though soluble 
in water like salt, is incomparably less strongly tasted 
than the vinegar was before; but (what is more consider- 
able) though the acid salts that are carried up with quick- 
silver in the preparation of common sublimate are so 
sharp, that being moistened with water it will corrode 
some of the metals themselves; yet this corrosive sub- 
limate being twice or thrice re-sublimed with a full 
proportion of insipid quicksilver, constitutes (as you 
know) that factitious concrete which the chymists call 
mercurius dulcis ; not because it is sweet, but because the 
sharpness of the corrosive salts is so taken away by their 
combination with the mercurial corpuscles, that the 
whole mixture when it is prepared is judged to be insipid. 

And thus (continues Carneades) having given you some 
reasons why I refuse to admit elementary water for a 
constant ingredient of mixt bodies, it will be easie for me 
to give you an account why I also reject earth. 

For first, it may well be suspected that many substances 
pass among chymists under the name of earth, because, 
like it, they are dry, and heavy, and fixt, which yet are 
very farr from an elementary nature. This you will not 
think improbable, if you recall to mind what I formerly 
told you concerning what chymists call the dead earth of 
things, and especially touching the copper to be drawn 
from the caput mortuum of vitriol; and if also you allow 
me to subjoyne a casual but memorable experiment made 
by Johannes Agricola upon the terra damnata of brim- 
stone. Our author then tells us (in his notes upon 

o 



210 The Sceptical Chymist 

Popius) that in the year 1621 he made an oyle of sulphur; 
the remaining faeces he reverberated in a moderate fire 
fourteen dayes; afterwards he put them well luted up 
in a wind oven, and gave them a strong fire for six hours, 
purposing to calcine the faeces to a perfect whiteness, that 
he might make something else out of them. But coming 
to break the pot, he found above but very little faeces, 
and those grey and not white; but beneath there lay a 
fine red regulus which he first marvelled at and knew 
not what to make of, being well assured that not the least 
thing, besides the faeces of the sulphur, came into the pot; 
and that the sulphur itself had only been dissolved in 
linseed oyle; this regulus he found heavy and malleable 
almost as lead; having caused a goldsmith to draw him 
a wire of it, he found it to be of the fairest copper, and so 
rightly coloured, that a Jew of Prague offered him a great 
price for it. And of this metal he saies he had 12 loth 
(or six ounces) out of one pound of ashes or faeces. And 
this story may well incline us to suspect that since the 
caput mortuum of the sulphur was kept so long in the fire 
before it was found to be anything else than a terra 
damnata, there may be divers other residences of bodies 
which are wont to pass only for the terrestrial faeces of 
things, and therefore to be thrown away as soon as the 
distillation or calcination of the body that yeelded them 
is ended; which yet, if they were long and skilfully 
examined by the fire, would appear to be differing from 
elementary earth. And I have taken notice of the 
unwarrantable forwardness of common chymists to pro- 
nounce things useless faeces, by observing how often they 
reject the caput mortuum of verdegrease; which is yet so 
farr from deserving that name, that not only by strong 
fires and convenient additaments it may in some hours 
be reduced into copper, but with a certain flux powder 
I sometimes make for recreation, I have in two or three 
minutes obtained that metal from it. To which I may 
add, that having for tryall sake kept Venetian talck in 
no less a heat than that of a glass furnace, I found after 
all the brunt of the fire it had indured, the remaining 
body, though brittle and discoloured, had not lost very 



The Sceptical Chymist 2 1 1 

much of its former bulke, and seemed still to be nearer 
of kin to talck than to mere earth. And I remember too, 
that a candid mineralist, famous for his skill in trying of 
oars, requesting me one day to procure him a certain 
American mineral earth of a virtuoso, who he thought 
would not refuse me; I enquired of him why he seemed 
so greedy of it: he confessed to me that this gentleman 
having brought that earth to the publick say-masters; 
and they upon their being unable by any means to bring 
it to fusion or make it fly away, he (the relator) had pro- 
cured a little of it; and having tryed it with a peculiar 
flux, separated from it near a third part of pure gold; so 
great mistakes may be committed in hastily concluding 
things to be useless earth. 

Next, it may be supposed, that as in the resolution of 
bodies by the fire some of the dissipated parts may, by 
their various occursion occasioned by the heat, be brought 
to stick together so closely as to constitute corpuscles 
too heavy for the fire to carry away; the aggregate of 
which corpuscles is wont to be called ashes or earth; so 
other agents may resolve the concrete into minute parts 
after so differing a manner, as not to produce any caput 
mortuum, or dry and heavy body. As you may remember 
Helmont above informed us, that with his great dissolvent 
he divided a coal into two liquid and volatile bodies, 
aequiponderant to the coal, without any dry or fixt 
residence at all. 

And indeed, I see not why it should be necessary that 
all agents that resolve bodies into portions of differing 
qualified matter must work on them the same way, and 
divide them into just such parts, both for nature and 
number, as the fire dissipates them into. For since, 
(as I noted before) the bulk and shape of the small parts 
of bodies, together with their fitness and unfitness to be 
easily put into motion, may make the liquors or other 
substances such corpuscles compose, as much to differ 
from each other as do some of the chymical principles: 
why may not something happen in this case, not unlike 
what is usuall in the grosser divisions of bodies by mecha- 
nical instruments ? Where we see that some tools reduce 



2 1 2 The Sceptical Chymist 

wood, for instance, into parts of several shapes, bigness, 
and other qualities, as hatchets and wedges divide it into 
grosser parts; some more long and slender, as splinters; 
and some more thick and irregular, as chips; but all of 
considerable bulk ; but files and saws make a comminution 
of it into dust; which, as all the others, is of the more 
solid sort of parts ; whereas others divide it into long and 
broad, but thin and flexible parts, as do planes : and of 
this kind of parts itself there is also a variety according 
to the difference of the tools employed to work on the 
wood; the shavings made by the plane being in some 
things differing from those shives or thin and flexible 
pieces of wood that are obtained by borers, and these 
from some others obtainable by other tools. Some 
chymical examples applicable to this purpose I have 
elsewhere given you. To which I may add, that whereas, 
in a mixture of sulphur and salt of tartar well melted and 
incorporated together, the action of pure spirit of wine 
digested on it is to separate the sulphureous from the 
alcalizate parts, by dissolving the former and leaving the 
latter: the action of wine (probably upon the score of its 
copious phlegme) upon the same mixture is to divide it 
into corpuscles consisting of both alcalizate and sul- 
phureous parts united. And if it be objected, that this 
is but a factitious concrete; I answer, that however the 
instance may serve to illustrate what I proposed, if not 
to prove it; and that nature herself doth in the bowels 
of the earth make decompounded bodies, as we see in 
vitriol, cinnaber, and even in sulphur itself; I will not 
urge that the fire divides new milk into five differing 
substances; but runnet and acid liquors divide it into 
a coagulated matter and a thin whey: and on the other 
side churning divides it into butter and buttermilk, which 
may either of them yet be reduced to other substances 
differing from the former. I will not press this, I say, 
nor other instances of this nature, because I cannot in few 
words answer what may be objected, that these concretes 
sequestred without the help of the fire may by it be further 
divided into hypostatical principles. But I will rather 
represent, that whereas the same spirit of wine will 



The Sceptical Chymist 2 1 3 

dissociate the parts of camphire, and make them one 
liquor with itself; aquajortis will also disjoyne them, and 
put them into motion; but so as to keep them together, 
and yet alter their texture into the form of an oyle. I 
know also an uncompounded liquor, tha,t an extra- 
ordinary chymist would not allow to be so much as 
saline, which doth (as I have tryed) from coral itself 
(as fixt as divers judicious writers assert that concrete 
to be) not only obtain a noble tincture without the inter- 
vention of nitre or other salts; but will carry over the 
tincture in distillation. And if some reasons did not 
forbid me, I could now tell you of a menstruum I make 
myself, that doth more odly dissociate the parts of minerals 
very fixt in the -fire. So that it seems not incredible, 
that there may be some agent or way of operation found, 
whereby this or that concrete, if not all firme bodies, may 
be resolved into parts so very minute and so apt to stick 
close to one another, that none of them may be fixt enough 
to stay behind in a strong fire, and to be incapable of 
distillation; nor consequently to be looked upon as earth. 
But to return to Helmont; the same author somewhere 
supplys me with another argument against the earth's 
being such an element as my adversaries would have it. 
For he somewhere affirmes, that he can reduce all the 
terrestrial parts of mixt bodies into insipid water; whence 
we may argue against the earth's being one of their 
elements, even from that notion of elements, which you 
may remember Philoponus recited out of Aristotle him- 
self, when he lately disputed for his chymists against 
Themistius. And here we may on this occasion consider, 
that since a body, from which the fire hath driven away 
its looser parts, is wont to be looked upon as earth, upon 
the account of its being endowed with both these qualities, 
tastlesnesse and fixtnesse, (for salt of tartar, though fixt, 
passes not among the chymists for earth, because 'tis 
strongly tasted) if it be in the power of natural agents to 
deprive the caput mortuum of a body of either of those 
two qualities, or to give them both to a portion of matter 
that had them not both before, the chymists will not 
easily define what part of a resolved concrete is earth, 



214 The Sceptical Chymist 

and make out, that that earth is a primary, simple, and 
indestructible body. Now there are some cases wherein 
the more skilful of the vulgar 'chymists themselves pretend 
to be able, by repeated cohobations and other fit opera- 
tions, to make the distilled parts of a concrete bring its 
own caput mortuum over the.helme, in the forme of a 
liquor, in which state being both fluid and volatile, you 
will easily believe it would not be taken for earth. And 
indeed by a skilful, but not vulgar, way of managing 
some concretes, there may be more effected in this kind, 
than you perhaps would easily think. And on the other 
side, that either earth may be generated, or at least bodies 
that did not before appear to be near totally earth, may 
be so altered as to pass for it, seems very possible, if 
Helmont have done that by art which he mentions in 
several places; especially where he saies that he knowes 
waies whereby sulphur once dissolved is all of k fixed 
into a terrestrial powder, and the whole body of salt- 
petre may be turned into earth : which last he elsewhere 
saies is done by the odour only of a certain sulphureous 
fire. And in another place he mentions one way of doing 
this, which I cannot give you an account of; because 
the materials I had prepared for trying it, were by a 
servant's mistake unhappily thrown away. 

And these last arguments may be confirmed by the 
experiment I have often had occasion to mention con- 
cerning the mint I produced out of water. And partly 
by an observation of Rondeletius concerning the growth 
of animals also, nourished but by water, which I remem- 
bered not to mention, when I discoursed to you about 
the production of things out of water. This diligent 
writer then in his instructive book of fishes, affirmes that 
his wife kept a fish in a glass of water without any other 
food for three years; in which space it was constantly 
augmented, till at last it could not come out of the place 
at which it was put in, and at length was too big for the 
glass itself, though that were of a large capacity. And 
because there is no just reason to doubt, that this fish, 
if distilled would have yeelded the like differing substances 
with other animals; and however, because the mint, 



The Sceptical Chymist 215 

which I had out of water, afforded me upon distillation 
a good quantity of charcoal; I think I may from thence 
inferr, that earth itself may be produced out of water; 
or if you please, that water may be transmuted into earth; 
and consequently, that though it could be proved, that 
earth is an ingredient actually inexistent in the vegetable 
and animal bodies whence it may be obtained by fire: 
yet it would not necessarily follow, that earth, as a pre- 
existent element does with other principles convene to 
make up those bodies whence it seems to have been 
separated. 

After all is said (saies Eleutherius) I have yet some- 
thing to object, that I cannot but think considerable, 
since Carneades himself alledged it as such; for, (continues 
Eleutherius smiling) I must make bold to try whether 
you can as luckily answer your own arguments, as those 
of your antagonists, I mean (pursues he) that part of your 
concessions, wherein you cannot but remember, that 
you supplyed your adversaries with an example to prove 
that there may be elementary bodies, by taking notice 
that gold may be an ingredient in a multitude of differing 
mixtures, and yet retain its nature, notwithstanding all 
that the chymists by their fires and corrosive waters are 
able to do to destroy it. 

I sufficiently intimated to you at that time (replies 
Carneades) that I proposed this example, chiefly to shew 
you how nature may be conceived to have made elements, 
not to prove that she actually has made any; and you 
know, that a posse ad esse the inference will not hold. 
But (continues Carneades) to answer more directly to the 
objection drawn from gold, I must tell you, that though 
I know very well that divers of the more sober chymists 
have complained of the vulgar chymists, as of mounte- 
banks or cheats, for pretending so vainly, as hitherto 
they have done, to destroy gold; yet I know a certain 
menstruum (which our friend has made, and intends 
shortly to communicate to the ingenious) of so piercing 
and powerful a quality, that if notwithstanding much 
care, and some skill, I did not much deceive myself, I 
have with it really destroyed even refined gold, and 



216 The Sceptical Chymist 

brought it into a metalline body of another colour and 
nature, as I found by tryals purposely made. And if 
some just considerations did not for the present forbid it, 
I could perchance here shew you by another experiment 
or two of my own trying, that such menstruums may be 
made as to entice away and retain divers parts from 
bodies, which even the more judicious and experienced 
spagyrists have pronounced irresoluble by the fire. 
Though (which I desire you would mark) in neither of 
these instances, the gold or precious stones be analyzed 
into any of the tria prima, but only reduced to new con- 
cretes. And indeed there is a great disparity betwixt 
the operations of the several agents whereby the parts 
of a body come to be dissipated. As if (for instance) you 
dissolve the purer sort of vitriol in common water, the 
liquor will swallow up the mineral, and so dissociate its 
corpuscles, that they will seem to make up but one liquor 
with those of the water; and yet each of these corpuscles 
retains its nature and texture, and remains a vitriolate 
and compounded body. But if the same vitriol be 
exposed to a strong fire, it will then be divided not only, 
as before, into smaller parts, but into heterogeneous 
substances, each of the vitriolate corpuscles that remained 
entire in the water, being itself upon the destruction of its 
former texture dissipated or divided into new particles of 
differing qualities. But instances more fitly applicable 
to this purpose I have already given you. Wherefore 
to return to what I told you about the destruction of gold; 
that experiment invites me to represent to you, that 
though there were either saline, or sulphureous, or terres- 
trial portions of matter, whose parts were so small, so 
firmly united together, or of a figure so fit to make them 
cohere to one another, (as we see that in quicksilver broken 
into little globes, the parts brought to touch one another 
do immediately reimbody) that neither the fire, nor the 
usual agents, employed by chymists, are piercing enough 
to divide their parts, so as to destroy the texture of the 
single corpuscles; yet it would not necessarily follow, 
that such permanent bodies were elementary; since 'tis 
possible there may be agents found in nature, some of 



The Sceptical Chymist 217 

whose parts may be of such a size and figure as to take 
better hold of some parts of these seemingly elementary 
corpuscles than these parts do of the rest, and conse- 
quently may carry away such parts with them, and so 
dissolve the texture of the corpuscle by pulling its parts 
asunder. And if it be said, that at least we may this way 
discover the elementary ingredients of things by observing 
into what substances these corpuscles, that were reputed 
pure are divided; I answer, that 'tis not necessary that 
such a discovery should be practicable. For if the 
particles of the dissolvent do take such firm hold of those 
of the dissolved body, they must constitute together new 
bodies, as well as destroy the old; and the strickt union, 
which according to this hypothesis may well be supposed 
betwixt the parts of the emergent body, will make it as 
little to be expected that they should be pulled asunder, 
but by little parts of matter, that to divide them associate 
themselves and stick extremely close to those of them 
which they sever from their former adherents, besides 
that it is not impossible, that a corpuscle supposed to be 
elementary may have its nature changed, without suffering 
a divorce of its parts, barely by a new texture effected 
by some powerful agent; as I formerly told you, the same 
portion of matter may easily by the operation of the fire 
be turned at pleasure into the form of a brittle and trans- 
parent, or an opacous and malleable body. 

And indeed, if you consider how farr the bare change 
of texture, whether made by art or nature (or rather by 
nature with or without the assistance of man) can go in 
producing such new qualities in the same parcel of matter, 
and how many inanimate bodies (such as are all the 
chymical productions of the fire) we know are denomi- 
nated and distinguished not so much by any imaginary 
substantial form, as by the aggregate of these qualities; 
if you consider these things, I say, and that the varying 
of either figure, or the size, or the motion, or the situation, 
or connexion of the corpuscles whereof any of these 
bodies is composed, may alter the fabrick of it, you will 
possibly be invited to suspect with me, that there is no 
great need that nature should alwaies have elements 



2 1 8 The Sceptical Chymist 

beforehand, whereof to make such bodies as we call 
mixts. And that it is not so easie as chymists and others 
have hitherto imagined, to discern, among the many 
differing substances that may without any extraordinary 
skill be obtained from the same portion of matter, which 
ought to be esteemed exclusively to all the rest, its 
inexistent elementary ingredients ; much less to determine 
what primogeneal and simple bodies convened together 
to compose it. To exemplify this, I shall add to what 
I have already on several occasions represented, but this 
single instance. 

You may remember (Eleutherius) that I formerly 
intimated to you, that besides mint and pompions, I 
produced divers other vegetables of very differing natures 
out of water. Wherefore you will not, I presume, think 
it incongruous to suppose, that when a slender vine-slip 
is set into the ground, and takes root there, it may likewise 
receive its nutriment from the water attracted out of the 
eartlxby its roots, or impelled by the warmth of the sun, 
or pressure of the ambient air into the pores of them. 
And this you will the more easily believe, if you ever 
observed what a strange quantity of water will drop out 
of a wound given to the vine, in a convenient place, at 
a seasonable time in the spring; and how little of taste 
or smell this aqua vitis, as physitians call it, is endowed 
with, notwithstanding what concoction or alteration it 
may receive in its passage through the vine, to dis- 
criminate it from common water. Supposing then this 
liquor, at its first entrance into the roots of the vine, to be 
common water; let us a little consider how many various 
substances may be obtained from it; though to do so, 
I must repeat somewhat that I had a former occasion to 
touch upon. And first, this liquor being digested in the 
plant, and assimilated by the several parts of it, is turned 
into the wood, bark, pith, leaves, etc. of the vine; the 
same liquor may be further dryed, and fashioned into 
vine-buds, and these a while after are advanced unto 
sowre grapes, which expressed yeeld verjuice, a liquor 
very differing in several qualities both from wine and 
other liquors obtainable from the vine: these sowre 



The Sceptical Chymist 219 

grapes, being by the heat of the sun concocted and 
ripened, turne to well tasted grapes; these, if dryed in 
the sun and distilled, afford a foetid oyle and a piercing 
empyreumatical spirit, but not a vinous spirit; these 
dryed grapes or raisins, boyled in a convenient proportion 
of water, make a sweet liquor, which, being betimes 
distilled, afford an oyle and spirit much like those of the 
raisins themselves; if the juice of the grapes be squeezed 
out and put to ferment, it first becomes a sweet and 
turbid liquor, then grows lesse sweet and more clear, and 
then affords in -common distillations not an oyle but 
a spirit, which, though inflamable like oyle, differs much 
from it, in that it is not fat, and that it will readily mingle 
with water. I have likewise without addition obtained 
in processe of time (and by an easie way which I am 
ready to teach you) from one of the noblest sorts of wine, 
pretty store of pure and curiously figured chrystals of 
salt, together with a great proportion of a liquor as sweet 
almost as honey; and these I obtained not from must, 
but true and sprightly wine; besides the vinous liquor, 
the fermented juice of grapes is partly turned into liquid 
dregs or leeze, and partly into that crust or dry feculancy 
that is commonly called tartar; and this tartar may by 
the fire be easily divided into five differing substances; 
four of which are not acid, and the other not so manifestly 
acid as the tartar itself; the same vinous juice after some 
time, especially if it be not carefully kept, degenerates 
into that very sowre liquor called vinegar; from which 
you may obtain by the fire a spirit and a chrystalline salt 
differing enough from the spirit and lixiviate salt of 
tartar. And if you poure the dephlegmed spirit of the 
vinegar upon the salt of tartar, there will be produced 
such a conflict or ebullition, as if there were scarce two 
more contrary bodies in nature; and oftentimes in this 
vinegar you may observe part of the matter to be turned 
into an innumerable company of swimming animals, 
which our friend having divers years ago observed, hath 
in one of his papers taught us how to discover clearly 
without the help of a microscope. 

Into all these various schemes of matter, or differingly 



220 The Sceptical Chymist * 

qualifyed bodies, besides divers others that I purposely 
forbear to mention, may the water, that is imbibed by the 
roots of the vine, be brought, partly by the formative 
power of the plant, and partly by supervenient agents or 
causes, without the visible concurrence of any extraneous 
ingredient; but if we be allowed to add to the productions 
of this transmuted water a few other substances, we may 
much encrease the variety of such bodies; although in 
this second sort of productions, the vinous parts seem 
scarce to retain anything of the much more fixed bodies 
wherewith they were mingled, but only to have by their 
mixture with them acquired such a disposition, that in 
their recess occasioned by the fire they came to be altered 
as to shape, or bigness, or both, and associated after a 
new manner. Thus, as I formerly told you, I did by the 
addition of a caput mortuum of antimony, and some other 
bodies unfit for distillation, obtain from crude tartar, store 
of a very volatile and chrystalline salt, differing very 
much in smell and other qualities from the usuall salts of 
tartar. 

But (saies Eleutherius, interrupting him at these words) 
if you have no restraint upon you, I would very gladly 
before you go any further, be more particularly informed, 
how you make this volatile salt, because (you know) that 
such multitudes of chymists have by a scarce imaginable 
variety of waies, attempted in vain the volatilization of 
the salt of tartar, that divers learned spagyrists speak 
as if it were impossible to make anything out of tartar, 
that shall be volatile in a saline forme, or, as some of them 
express it, in Jorma sicca. I am very farr from thinking 
(answers Carneades) that the salt I have mentioned is that 
which Paracelsus and Helmont mean, when they speak 
of sal tartan volatile, and ascribe such great things to it. 
For the salt I speak of falls extremely short of those 
vertues, not seeming in its taste, smel, and other obvious 
qualities, to differ very much (though something it does 
differ) from salt of hartshorn, and other volatile salts 
drawn from the distilled parts of animals. Nor have I 
yet made tryals enough to be sure, that it is a pure salt 
of tartar without participating anything at all of the 



The Sceptical Chymist 221 

nitre, or antimony. But because it seems more likely 
to proceed from the tartar, than from any of the other 
ingredients, and because the experiment is in itself not 
ignoble, and luciferous enough (as shewing a new way to 
produce a volatile salt, contrary to acid salts, from bodies 
that otherwise are observed to yeeld no such liquor, but 
either only, or chiefly, acid ones,) I shall, to satisfie you, 
acquaint you before any of my other friends with the 
way I now use (for I have formerly used some others) 
to make it. 

Take then of good antimony, salt-petre and tartar, of 
each an equal weight, and of quicklime halfe the weight 
of any one of them; let these be powdered and well 
mingled; this done, you must have in readiness a long 
neck or retort of earth, which must be placed in a furnace 
for a naked fire, and have at the top of it a hole of a con- 
venient bigness, at which you may cast in the mixture, 
and presently stop it up again; this vessel being fitted 
with a large receiver must have fire made under it, till 
the bottom of the sides be red hot, and then you must 
cast in the above prepared mixture, by about half a 
spoonful (more or less) at a time, at the hole made for 
that purpose; which being nimbly stopt, the fumes will 
pass into the receiver and condense there into a liquor, 
that being rectified will be of a pure golden colour, and 
carry up that colour to a great height; this spirit abounds 
in the salt I told you of, part of which may easily enough 
be separated by the way I use in such cases, which is, 
to put the liquor into a glass egg, or bolthead with a long 
and narrow neck. For if this be placed a little inclining 
in hot sand, there will sublime up a fine salt, which, as 
I told you, I find to be much of kin to the volatile salts 
of animals: for like them it has a saltish, not an acid 
salt; it hisses upon the affusion of spirit of nitre, or oyle 
of vitriol; it precipitates corals dissolved in spirit of 
vinegar; it turnes the blew syrup of violets immediately 
green; it presently turnes the solution of sublimate into 
a milkie whiteness; and in summ, has divers operations 
like those that I have observed in that sort of salts to 
which I have resembled it: and is so volatile, that for 



222 The Sceptical Chymist 

distinction sake, I call it sal tartari Jugitivus. What 
vertues it may have in physick I have not yet had the 
opportunity to try; but I am apt to think they will not 
be despicable. And besides that, a very ingenious friend 
of mine tells me he hath done great matters against the 
stone with a preparation not very much differing from 
ours: a very experienced Germane chymist finding that 
I was unacquainted with the waies of making this salt, 
told me that in a great city in his country, a noted chymist 
prizes it so highly, that he had a while since procured 
a priviledge from the magistrates, that none but he, or by 
his licence, should vent a spirit made almost after the 
same way with mine, save that he leaves out one of 
the ingredients, namely the quicklime. But, (continues 
Carneades) to resume my former discourse where your 
curiosity interrupted it; 

Tis also a common practice in France to bury thin 
plates of copper in the marc (as the French call it) or 
husks of grapes, whence the juice has been squeezed out 
in the wine-press; and by this means the more saline 
parts of those husks, working by little and little upon the 
copper, coagulate themselves with it into that blewish 
green substance we in English call verdigrease. Of 
which I therefore take notice, because having distilled 
it in a naked fire, I found, as I expected, that by the 
association of the saline with the metalline parts, the 
former were so altered, that the distilled liquor, even 
without rectification, seemed by smell and taste, strong 
almost like aqua Jortis, and very much surpassed the 
purest and most rectified spirit of vinegar that ever I 
made. And this spirit I therefore ascribe to the salt of 
the husks altered by their co-mixture with the copper 
(though the fire afterwards divorce and transmute them) 
because I found this latter in the bottom of the retort 
in the forme of a crocus or reddish powder: and because 
copper is of too sluggish a nature to be forced over in close 
vessels by no stronger a heat. And that which is also 
somewhat remarkable in the distillation of good verdi- 
grease, (or at least of that sort that I used) is this, that I 
never could observe that it yeelded me any oyl, (unless 



The Sceptical Chymist 223 

a little black slime which was separated in rectification 
may pass for oyle) though both tartar and vinegar (espe- 
cially the former) will by distillation yeeld a moderate 
proportion of it. If likewise you poure spirit of vinegar 
upon calcined lead, the acid salt of the liquor will by 
its commixture with the metalline parts, though insipid, 
acquire in few hours a more than saccharine sweetness; 
and these saline parts being by a strong fire distilled from 
the lead wherewith they were imbodyed, will, as I formerly 
also noted to a different purpose, leave the metal behind 
them altered in some qualities from what it was, and will 
themselves ascend, partly in the form of an unctuous 
body or oyle, partly in that of phlegme, but for the greatest 
part in the forme of a subtile spirit, indowed, besides 
divers new qualities which I am not now willing to take 
notice of, with a strong smell very much other than that 
of vinegar, and a piercing taste quite differing both from 
the sowreness of the spirit of vinegar, and the sweetness 
of the sugar of lead. 

To be short, as the difference of bodies may depend 
merely upon that of the schemes whereinto their common 
matter is put; so the seeds of things, the fire and the 
other agents are able to alter the minute parts of a body 
(either by breaking them into smaller ones of differing 
shapes, or by uniting together these fragments with the 
unbroken corpuscles, or such corpuscles among them- 
selves) and the same agents partly by altering the shape 
or bigness of the constituent corpuscles of a body, partly 
by driving away some of them, partly by blending others 
with them, and partly by some new manner of connecting 
them, may give the whole portion of matter a new texture 
of its minute parts, and thereby make it deserve a new 
and distinct name. So that according as the small parts 
of matter recede from each other, or work upon each other, 
or are connected together after this or that determinate 
manner, a body of this or that denomination is produced, 
as some other body happens thereby to be altered or 
destroyed. 



224 The Sceptical Chymist 

Since then those things which chymists produce by the 
help of the fire are but inanimate bodies: since such 
fruits of the chymists' skill differ from one another but 
in so few qualities that we see plainly that by fire, and 
other agents we can employ, we can easily enough work 
as great alterations upon matter, as those that are requisite 
to change one of these chymical productions into another; 
since the same portion of matter may without being com- 
pounded with any extraneous body, or at least element, 
be made to put on such a variety of formes, and conse- 
quently to be (successively) turned into so many differing 
bodies; and since the matter, cloathed with so many 
differing formes, was originally but water, and that in its 
passage through so many transformations, it was never 
reduced into any of those substances which are reputed 
to be the principles or elements of mixt bodies, except 
the violence of the fire, which itself divides not bodies 
into perfectly simple or elementary substances, but into 
new compounds; since, I say, these things are so, I see 
not why we must needs believe that there are any 
primogeneal and simple bodies, of which, as of pre- 
existent elements, nature is obliged to compound all 
others. Nor do I see why we may not conceive that she 
may produce the bodies accounted mixt out of one another 
by variously altering and contriving their minute parts, 
without resolving the matter into any such simple or 
homogeneous substances as are pretended. Neither, to 
dispatch, do I see why it should be counted absurd to 
think, that when a body is resolved by the fire into its 
supposed simple ingredients, those substances are not 
true and proper elements, but rather were, as it were, 
accidentally produced by the fire, which by dissipating 
a body into minute parts does, if those parts be shut up 
in close vessels, for the most part necessarily bring them 
to associate themselves after another manner than before, 
and so bring them in to bodies of such different consistences, 
as the former texture of the body and concurrent circum- 
stances make such disbanded particles apt to constitute; 
as experience shews us (and I have both noted it, and 
proved it already) that as there are some concretes whose 



The Sceptical Chymist 225 

parts, when dissipated by fire, are fitted to be put into 
such schemes of matter as we call oyle, and salt, and 
spirit; so there are others, such as are especially the 
greatest part of minerals, whose corpuscles being of 
another size or figure, or perhaps contrived another way, 
will not in the fire yeeld bodies of the like consistences, 
but rather others of differing textures; not to mention, 
that from gold and some other bodies, we see not that the 
fire separates any distinct substances at all; nor that 
even those similar parts of bodies, which the chymists 
obtain by the fire, are the elements whose names they 
bear, but compound bodies, upon which, for their resem- 
blance to them in consistence, or some other obvious 
quality, chymists have been pleased to bestow such 
appellations. 






THE CONCLUSION 

THESE last words of Carneades being soon after followed 
by a noise which seemed to come from the place where 
the rest of the company was, he took it for a warning, 
that it was time for him to conclude or break off his 
discourse; and told his friend; By this time I hope you 
see, Eleutherius, that if Helmont's experiments be true, 
it is no absurdity to question whether that doctrine be 
one, that doth not assert any elements in the sence before 
explained. But because that, as divers of my arguments 
suppose the marvellous power of the alkahest in the 
analyzing of bodies, so the effects ascribed to that power 
are so unparalleled and stupendous, that though I am 
not sure but that there may be such an agent, yet little 
less than dvro^La seems requisite to make a man sure 
there is. And consequently I leave it to you to judge, how 
farr those of my arguments that are built upon alkahes- 
tical operations are weakned by that liquors being 
matchless; and shall therefore desire you not to think 
that I propose this paradox that rejects all elements, 
as an opinion equally probable with the former part of 
my discourse. For by that, I hope, you are satisfied, 
that the arguments, wont to be brought by chymists to 
prove that all bodies consist of either three principles, 
or five, are far from being so strong as those that I have 
employed to prove, that there is not any certain and 
determinate number of such principles or elements to be 
met with universally in all mixt bodies. And I suppose 
I need not tell you, that these anti-chymical paradoxes 
might have been managed more to their advantage; but 
that having not confined my curiosity to chymical experi- 
ments, I, who am but a young man, and younger chymist, 
can yet be but slenderly furnished with them, in reference 
to so great and difficult a task as you imposed upon me : 
besides that, to tell you the truth, I durst not employ 
226 



The Sceptical Chymist 227 

some even of the best experiments I am acquainted with, 
because I must not yet disclose them; but, however, I 
think I may presume that what I have hitherto discoursed 
will induce you to think, that chymists have been much 
more happy in finding experiments than the causes of 
them; or in assigning the principles by which they may 
best be explained. And indeed, when in the writing of 
Paracelsus I meet with such phantastick and unintelligible 
discourses as that writer often puzzels and tires his reader 
with, fathered upon such excellent experiments, as 
though he seldom clearly teaches, I often find he knew; 
methinks the chymists, in their searches after truth, are 
not unlike the navigators of Solomon's Tarshish fleet, who 
brought home from their long and tedious voyages, not 
only gold, and silver, and ivory, but apes and peacocks 
too; for so the writings of several (for I say not, all) of 
your hermetick philosophers present us, together with 
divers substantial and noble experiments, theories, which 
either like peacocks' feathers make a great shew, but are 
neither solid nor useful; or else like apes, if they have 
some appearance of being rational, are blemished with 
some absurdity or other, that when they are attentively 
considered, make them appear ridiculous. 

Carneades having thus finished his discourse against 
the received doctrines of the elements, Eleutherius judging 
he should not have time to say much to him before their 
separation, made some haste to tell him; I confess, 
Carneades, that you have said more in favour of your 
paradoxes than I expected. For though divers of the 
experiments you have mentioned are no secrets, and were 
not unknown to me, yet besides that you have added 
many of your own unto them, you have laid them to- 
gether in such a way, and applyed them to such purposes, 
and made such deductions from them, as I have not 
hitherto met with. 

But though I be therefore inclined to think, that 
Philoponus, had he heard you, would scarce have been 
able in all points to defend the chymical hypothesis 
against the arguments wherewith you have opposed it; 
yet methinks that however your objections seem to 



228 The Sceptical Chymist 

evince a great part of what they pretend to, yet they 
evince it not all; and the numerous tryals of those you 
call the vulgar chymists, may be allowed to prove some- 
thing too. 

Wherefore, if it be granted you that you have made it 
probable, 

f First, that the differing substances into which mixt 
' bodies are wont to be resolved by the fire are not of a pure 
and an elementary nature, especially for this reason, that 
they yet retain so much of the nature of the concrete 
that afforded them, as to appear to be yet somewhat 
compounded, and oftentimes to differ in one concrete 
from principles of the same denomination in another: 

Next, that as to the number of these differing substances, 
neither is it precisely three, because in most vegetable 
and animal bodies earth and phlegme are also to be 
found among their ingredients; nor is there any one 
determinate number into which the fire (as it is wont 
to be employed) does precisely and universally resolve all 
compound bodies whatsoever, as well minerals as others 
that are reputed perfectly mixt. 

Lastly, that there are divers qualities which cannot 
well be referred to any of these substances, as if they 
primarily resided in it and belonged to it; and some other 
qualities, which though they seem to have their chief and 
most ordinary residence in some one of these principles 
or elements of mixt bodies, are not yet so deducible from 
it, but that also some more general principles must be 
L taken in to explicate them. 

If, I say, the chymists (continues Eleutherius) be so 
liberall as to make you these three concessions, I hope you 
will, on your part, be so civil and equitable as to grant 
them these three other propositions, namely; 

First, that divers mineral bodies, and therefore probably 
all the rest, may be resolved into a saline, a sulphureous, 
and a mercurial part; and that almost all vegetable and 
animal concretes may, if not by the fire alone, yet by 
a skilfull artist employing the fire as his chief instrument, 
be divided into five differing substances, salt, spirit, oyle, 
phlegme and earth; of which the three former by reason 



The Sceptical Chymist 229 

of their being so much more operative than the two latter, 
deserve to be lookt upon as the three active principles, 
and by way of eminence to be called the three principles 
of mixt bodies. 

Next, that these principles, though they be not per- 
fectly devoid of all mixture, yet may without incon- 
venience be stiled the elements of compounded bodies, 
and bear the names of those substances which they most 
resemble, and which are manifestly predominant in them ; 
and that especially for this reason, that none of these 
elements is divisible by the fire into four or five differing 
substances, like the concrete whence it was separated. 

Lastly, that divers of the qualities of a mixt body, and 
especially the medical virtues, do for the most part lodge 
in some one or other of its principles, and may therefore 
-usefully be sought for in that principle severed from the 
others. 

And in this also (pursues Eleutherius) methinks both 
you and the chymists may easily agree, that the surest 
way is to learn by particular experiments, what differing 
parts particular bodies do consist of, and by what wayes 
(either actual or potential fire) they may best and most 
conveniently be separated, as without relying too much 
upon the fire alone, for the resolving of bodies, so without 
fruitlessly contending to force them into more elements 
than nature made them up of, or strip the severed prin- 
ciples so naked, as by making them exquisitely elementary 
to make them almost useless. 

These things (subjoynes Eleu.) I propose, without 
despairing to see them granted by you ; not only because 
I know that you so much prefer the reputation of candour 
before that of subtility, that your having once supposed 
a truth would not hinder you from imbracing it when 
clearly made out to you; but because, upon the present 
occasion, it will be no disparagement to you to recede 
from some of your paradoxes, since the nature and 
occasion of your past discourse did not oblige you to 
declare your own opinions, but only to personate an 
antagonist of the chymists. So that (concludes he, with 
a smile) you may now by granting what I propose, add 



230 The Sceptical Chymist 

the reputation of loving the truth sincerely to that of 
having been able to oppose it subtilly. 

Carneades's haste forbidding him to answer this crafty 
piece of flattery; Till I shall (saies he) have an opportunity 
to acquaint you with my own opinions about the con- 
troversies I have been discoursing of, you will not I hope, 
expect I should declare my own sence of the argument 
I have employed. Wherefore I shall only tell you thus 
much at present; that though not only an acute natura- 
list, but even I myself could take plausible exceptions 
at some of them; yet divers of them too are such as will 
not perhaps be readily answered, and will reduce my 
adversaries, at least, to alter and reform their hypothesis. 
I perceive I need not mind you that the objections I made 
against the quaternary of elements and ternary of prin- 
ciples needed not to be opposed so much against the 
doctrines themselves, either of which, especially the 
latter, may be much more probably maintained than 
hitherto it seems to have been, by those writers for it I 
have met with) as against the unaccurateness and the 
unconcludingness of the analytical experiments vulgarly 
relyed on to demonstrate them. 

And therefore, if either of the two examined opinions, 
or any other theory of elements, shall upon rational and 
experimental grounds be clearly made out to me; 'tis 
obliging, but not irrational, in you to expect, that I shall 
not be so fair in love with my disquieting doubts, as not 
to be content to change them for undoubted truths. And 
(concludes Carneades smiling) it w r ere no great disparage- 
ment for a sceptick to confesse to you, that as unsatisfyed 
as the past discourse may have made you think me with 
the doctrines of the Peripateticks, and the chymists, about 
the elements and principles, I can yet so little discover 
what to acquiesce in, that perchance the enquiries of 
others have scarce been more unsatisfactory to me, than 
my own have been to myself. 



LETCHWORTH 

THE TEMPLE PRESS 

PRINTERS 



14 DAY USE 

RETURN TO DESK FROM WHICH BORROWED 



.uJ,JrS!ftSJSSS 



helnw. or 



h- 

I I 


jUL 2 5 2006 


UJ 


ZL 


UJ > 




-1 


S_ 


it 

to 
at 


gZ 

O. ^ 

4 

IS 

LJ 

I 


- - --^-^^rz : 



BEC'DLi JAN 9 73 -1 



LD 21A-60m-2 '67 

(H241s!0)476B 



General Library 

University of California 

Berkeley 



_YB 17041 

GENERAL LIBRARY -U.C. BERKELEY 







